Thoughts that are to be given up neither through vision (of the First Path) nor through development (of the rest of the Paths)
Thoughts that have roots that are to be given up through vision (of the First Path)
Thoughts that have roots that are to be given up through development (of the rest of the Paths)
Thoughts that have roots that are neither to be given up through vision (of the First Path) nor through development (of the rest of the Paths)
Thoughts that go towards increase
Thoughts that go towards decrease
Thoughts that go towards neither decrease nor increase
Those in training
Those no longer in training
Those neither in training nor no longer in training
Thoughts that are limited
Thoughts that are very great
Thoughts that are immeasurable
Thoughts that are limited sense-objects
Thoughts that are very great sense-objects
Thoughts that are immeasurable sense-objects
Thoughts that are inferior
Thoughts that are middling
Thoughts that are excellent
Thoughts that are wrongful and have a fixed destiny
Thoughts that are righteous and have a fixed destiny
Thoughts that do not have a fixed destiny
Thoughts that have Path as their objects
Thoughts that have Path as their roots
Thoughts that have Path as their predominant (factor)
Thoughts that have arisen
Thoughts that have not arisen
Thoughts that are arising
Thoughts that are past
Thoughts that are future
Thoughts that are present
Thoughts that are past objects
Thoughts that are future objects
Thoughts that are present objects
Thoughts that are his own
Thoughts that are another’s
Thoughts that are his own and another’s
Thoughts that are internal objects
Thoughts that are external objects
Thoughts that are internal and external objects
Thoughts that are visible and have impingement
Thoughts that are not visible and have impingement
Thoughts that are not visible and do not have impingement
In the eighth (story), “Amongst those who have the divine eye, that is to say, Sakulā,”
it shows why the Elder Nun Sakulā, amongst those who had the divine eye, was said to be foremost.
At the time of the Buddha Padumuttara, it seems,
she was reborn in a good family home in Haṁsavatī,
and when she was mature, while listening to the Teacher talk about Dhamma,
seeing the Teacher place a certain nun as being foremost amongst those who have the divine eye,
she did a great deed and aspired for that position herself.
In this auspicious aeon, a very famous brāhmaṇa
arose in the noble and well-known Kassapa clan.
I was a female wanderer at that time, solitary,
and after wandering for alms I received a little oil.
Having lighted a lamp with that (oil), I attended all night
with a confident mind at the Foremost Human’s shrine.
Through performing that good deed with excellent intentions,
after throwing off the human body I went to the (Realm of) the Thirty Three.
On account of that deed I shone forth in whatever place I was,
like a great light blazing, wherever I went.
Beyond the walls, beyond the rocks, rising above the mountain,
whatever I wanted (to see) I saw, as the result of that gift of light,
I had a purified eye, I shone forth with fame,
I was endowed with faith and wisdom, as the result of that gift of light.
She was reborn amongst gods and humans (only) for one hundred thousand aeons,
and when this (Gotama) Buddha arose she was reborn in a good family home in Sāvatthī,
and later, while listening to the Teacher teach the Dhamma,
she gained faith and went forth, and in no long time she attained Liberation.
From then on she became well-practiced in the divine eye.
Later, while the Teacher was sitting in Jeta’s Wood,
as he was assigning the places of the nuns in order,
he placed this Elder Nun in the foremost position amongst those who had the divine eye.
Translation
In the third (story), about “Uppalavaṇṇā”,
as she was endowed with a colour similar to a blue lily’s heart
At the time of the Buddha Padumuttara, it seems,
she was conceived in a good family home in Haṁsavatī,
and later, after going with the populace into the presence of the Teacher, while listening to the Dhamma,
seeing the Teacher place a certain nun as being foremost in spiritual powers,
and giving a great donation to the Community of monastics with the Buddha at their head for seven days,
she aspired for that position herself.
She did good deeds for the rest of her life and being reborn amongst gods and humans (only),
in the city of Bārāṇasī, at the time of the Buddha Kassapa,
she was conceived in the home of Kiki, the King of Kāsi,
and became (one) amongst seven sisters,
lived as a celibate for twenty-thousand years,
had a residence made for the Community of monks, and was reborn in the world of the gods.
Passing away from there,
she was reborn in a certain little village, and made a living in that place by doing
One day, while going to the hut in the field,
on the highway near a lake in the morning time,
she saw a blossoming lotus flower and descended into the lake,
and took that flower in a lotus leaf used to wrap puffed rice,
cut the tips of rice in the field, and while sitting in the field, she roasted the rice,
and counted five-hundred pieces of puffed rice.
At that time, having arisen from the attainment of cessation on Mount Gandhamādana,
a certain Independent Buddha came and stood not far away from her.
Having seen the Independent Buddha,
she took a lotus flower together with the puffed rice, descended from her hut,
placed the puffed rice in the Independent Buddha’s bowl,
and covered the bowl over with the lotus flower.
When the Independent Buddha had departed a short way she thought:
‘One who has gone forth surely has no use for a flower,
I will take the flower and adorn (myself).’
She went to the Independent Buddha and took the flower from his hand, but thought again:
‘If this Noble One had no use for a flower,
he wouldn’t have allowed me to place it on the top of the bowl,
indeed there will be a use for the Noble One,’ and she went back again,
placed it (back) on the top of the bowl, and begged the Independent Buddha for forgiveness,
saying: “Reverend Sir, may the result of my puffed rice be as many sons as there were pieces of rice,
and the result of (giving) the lotus flower be that wherever I am reborn
lotus flowers arise under my feet.” She made this aspiration.
As she was watching him, that Independent Buddha
went through the air to Mount Gandhamādana,
° and washing his feet near to the Independent Buddhas’ rope ladder,
he placed the lotus on Mount Nandamūlaka.
As a result of that deed, she gained conception in the world of the gods,
and from the time of her rebirth great lotus flowers appeared under her feet.
She passed away from there and was reborn on a lotus heart in one lotus lake at the foot of a mountain.
A certain ascetic lived near there, and in the morning time,
he went to the lake in order to wash his face, saw the flower and thought:
‘This flower’s head is the largest of (all) the heads of flowers,
through what reason did the bud come to be here?’
After descending into the water he took the flower.
As soon as he had taken it, it flowered,
and the ascetic saw a young girl lying in the heart of the lotus.
From the time of (first) seeing her, paternal love
and he carried her with the lotus to his leaf-hut and lay her down on his couch.
Through the power of her merit milk sprung from his thumb.
When that flower had faded, he brought a new flower and lay her in that.
Then from the time she began to play by running around here and there
at every step there arose a lotus flower,
and the colour of her body was like rays of saffron.
Without having attained the radiance of a god she (nevertheless) surpassed the radiance of a human.
When her Father had gone to gather various kinds of fruit she remained behind in the leaf-hut.
Then one day, when she had reached maturity,
her Father having gone to gather various kinds of fruit, a certain forester saw her and thought:
“Amongst mankind there is none as beautiful as this, I will enquire about her,”
and he sat down looking for the coming of the ascetic.
As her Father was coming, she went out to meet (him),
took the carrying pole and water pot from his hand,
and after he had come, while sitting she showed him the duties she had done.
Then the forester understood she was human,
worshipped the ascetic and sat down.
The ascetic invited the forester with forest roots and various kinds of fruits and water,
and asked: “Good sir! Will you stay in this place, or will you go?”
“I will go, reverend Sir, what will I do here?”
“After going from here will you be able to keep quiet
“If the Noble One does not wish (it), for what reason will I speak?”
And after worshipping the ascetic, so as to recognise the path again when he returned,
he went away making marks on the branches and on the trees.
After going to Bārāṇasī he saw the King, and the King asked: “Why have you come?”
“God-King, your forester,
having seen a wonderful treasure of a woman at the foot of a mountain, has returned,”
and he told him all that had happened.
(The King) heard his report and quickly went to the foot of the mountain,
set up camp not far from that place,
together with the forester and the other men,
and after the ascetic had finished his meal duties,
at a time when he was sitting, he went and worshipped him there,
was received in a friendly manner, and sat down on one side.
The King, after placing the requisite goods for one gone forth at the feet of the ascetic,
said: “Reverend Sir, what will we do in this place, shall we go?”
“Please go, Great King.”
“Yes, I will go, reverend Sir,
(but) we have heard: ‘The Noble One has the company of the opposite sex nearby’,
and this is unsuitable for those gone forth, please let her go with me, reverend Sir.”
“People’s minds are surely hard to please,
how will she live in the midst of so many (people)?”
“Beginning from any time we please,
I will place (her) in a position senior to the rest and look after (her), reverend Sir.”
Having heard the King’s speech, because of the name she had taken in her youth,
he called his daughter, saying: “Dear Padumavatī.”
She emerged from the leaf hut at that single word, worshipped her Father and stood (there).
Then her Father said: “Dear, you have reached maturity in this place,
(but) from the time you were seen by the King, it has been inappropriate to live (here),
you should go with the King, Dear.”
She replied to this word of her Father, saying: “Very well, Father,”
worshipped (him), and stood there crying.
The King, (thinking): ‘I will win over her Father’s heart,’
placed a heap of money in that place and anointed her.
Then after taking her, and leading her to the city,
from the time they returned, without even looking at the rest of the women, he took delight with her alone.
Those women, being jealous by nature,
and desiring to break her close connection with the King, said this:
“This is not one born of humans, Great King!
° Where in the past did you see amongst humans
that lotuses would arise in the place they were walking?
Surely this is a demoness, you must drive her away, Great King!”
The King listened to their speech but was silent.
Then at another time there was a border disturbance.
Thinking: ‘Padumavatī is advanced in pregnancy,’
he left her in the city and went to the border area.
Then those women, having given a bribe to her nurse,
said: “Remove her child as soon as it is born,
and having smeared a log of wood with blood, place it near her.”
Not long after Padumavatī was delivered (of her child).
The prince Mahāpaduma alone dwelt in her womb,
another four-hundred and ninety-nine sons,
after the boy Mahāpaduma exited his Mother’s womb and was laying there,
were reborn from moisture.
Then understanding: ‘(I must act) before she recovers her mindfulness,’
the nurse smeared a log of wood with blood,
placed it near her, and signalled to those women.
Those five hundred women each took a child,
employed nearby weavers,
had them bring baskets, and each took her own child,
lay him down there, made a seal on the outside and placed them aside.
When Padumavatī had recovered her senses
she asked her nurse: “What have I delivered, Lady?”
Menacing her she said: “Where will your son be found?”
Saying: “This is the child that exited from your womb,”
she placed the blood-smeared log of wood in front of her.
Seeing that she became depressed
and said: “Having chopped it up, quickly remove it, if someone should see it, it would be a cause of shame.”
She listened to her speech as though wishing her well,
chopped it up and threw it on the fire-place.
Returning from the border areas, the King waited outside the city for the auspicious time,
made camp and sat down.
Then the five-hundred women went out to meet the King as he was coming and said:
“You do not have faith in us, Great King, as though we speak without reason.
After calling your Consort’s nurse,
ask whether your Queen delivered a log of wood!”
The King, without properly investigating the reason,
thinking: ‘She must be a non-human being,’ drove her from the house.
With her departure from the Palace (all) the lotus flowers
and her skin lost its radiance.
She went by herself along the middle of the street.
Then a certain old and aged woman saw her and maternal
and she said: “Where are you going, Lady?”
“I am a stranger roaming around looking for somewhere to live.”
She said: “Come here, Lady,”
and she gave her a place to live and served her food.
As she was residing like this in that place,
those five-hundred women, having one thought, said to the King:
“Great King, when you had gone to the camp,
(we said) to the goddess of the Ganges: ‘When our God-King returns victorious from battle,
we will make an oblation and hold water sports.’
This was our aspiration, and this matter, God-King, we now make known.”
The King, being satisfied with their statement, went to the Ganges to sport in the water.
All of them took their baskets,
covered them over, went to the stream,
wrapped up the baskets in order to disguise them,
dropped them in the water and sent the baskets off.
All those baskets went off together and got caught in nets that had been fastened under the stream.
Then after playing at water sports, at the time the King was emerging,
seeing the baskets suspended in the net, they were brought to the King.
The King, seeing the baskets, said: “What is in the baskets, Dears?”
“We do not know, God-King.”
The baskets were opened while he was watching,
and they first opened the boy Mahāpaduma’s basket.
For all of them as they were laying in the baskets during the day,
milk had sprung from their thumbs through the power of their merit.
Sakka, the King of the Gods, in order to dispel the King’s doubts,
had had these words
“These boys were reborn in Padumavatī’s womb, and are the King of Bārāṇasī’s sons,
then the five-hundred women, who are Padumavatī’s rivals,
placed them in baskets and threw them in the water.
Let the King understand the reason.”
As soon as the baskets were opened the King had the words
and seeing his sons, he raised up the boy Mahāpaduma, and said:
“Quickly prepare the chariot, harness the horses, I will enter the city today
and endear some of those women.”
He ascended the palace, placed a bag with a thousand coins on an elephant’s neck,
and had the drum beat, (announcing): “He who finds Padumavatī, can take this thousand (coins).”
Hearing that announcement Padumavatī informed her (adopted) Mother,
saying: “Take the thousand (coins) from the elephant’s neck, Lady.”
“I do not dare to take such a thing.”
Having said it a second and a third time,
she said: “After saying what, Lady, shall I take it?”
“ ‘My daughter has found Queen Padumavatī,’ after saying that, take (it).”
She, thinking: ‘What will be, will be,’ went and took the box with a thousand (coins).
Then the men questioned her: “Did you find Queen Padumavatī, Lady?”
She said: “I did not find (her), but it seems my daughter found (her).”
They said: “But where is she, Lady?”
and going with her and recognising Padumavatī, they fell at her feet.
At that time understanding: ‘This is Queen Padumavatī!’
she said: “Indeed, a really serious thing was done to the woman,
she being a Consort to such a King, and she dwelt in such a place without protection!”
The King’s men set up white curtains around Padumavatī’s residence,
placed a guard at the door and went and informed the King.
The King send a golden palanquin.
She said: “I will not go in this way!
From my dwelling place all along the way until the Palace
spread noble and beautiful carpets made of cloth,
have canopies set up adorned with golden stars above,
and when all ornaments are sent for my adornment, I will go by foot.
Thus the city-folk will see my good fortune!”
The King said: “Do it according to Padumavatī’s pleasure.”
Then Padumavatī was adorned with all ornaments,
and saying: “I will go to the Palace,” proceeded along the path.
Then at each place she stepped,
after breaking through the noble and beautiful carpets made of cloth, lotus flowers arose.
After she had shown off to the populace her good fortune, she ascended the Palace,
and by way of giving an allowance to the old lady for her expenses, had all those beautiful carpets given (to her).
The King had the five-hundred women summoned,
and said: “After making these slaves, I give them to the Queen.”
“Very good, Great King, please make known to the whole city your gift to me of these (women).”
The King had the drum beat in the city (announcing):
“After making these five-hundred treacherous women slaves, I have given them to Padumavatī.”
Understanding: ‘Their slavery has been seen by the whole city,’
she made a request of the King, saying: “I desire to give freedom to my slaves, God-King.”
“As you wish, Queen!”
This being so, he summoned the drummer,
° and said: “ ‘After (these women) were made slaves to Padumavatī,
she has given freedom to all five-hundred of them,’
beat the drum (and announce this).”
When they were given their freedom,
she gave the four-hundred and ninety-nine sons into their hands for bringing up,
and took the boy Mahāpaduma herself.
Then later, when those boys had reached playing age,
the King had various types of playgrounds made in the garden.
When they were sixteen years of age they all came together,
and while playing in the royal bathing pool covered with lotuses in the garden,
having seen new lotuses blossoming and old lotuses falling from their stalks,
they thought: ‘When even a thing such as this, which is not produced by previous deeds,
how much more then will our bodies be subject to the same destiny!’
Grasping this meditation object they all produced the knowledge characterising the Independent Awakening,
and, after rising (from there), sat down cross-legged in the heart of the lotuses.
Then the King’s men who had come with them, understanding that most of the day had passed,
said: “Noble Children, do you know the time?”
They remained silent.
Those men went to the King and informed him: “The princes, God-King, are sitting in the hearts of the lotuses,
and when we speak they make no reply.”
“Allow them to sit as they wish.”
The whole night a guard was set,
and they sat in this way in the hearts of the lotuses until dawn arose.
The men approached on the following day and said: “Princes, do you know the time?”
“We are not Princes, we are now Independent Buddhas.”
“Noble Sirs, you are saying something very grave,
Independent Buddhas are surely not like you are,
they have hair and beard (only) up to two inches long, and on their bodies are fastened the eight requisites.”
They stroked their heads with their right hands, and at that moment the signs of home life vanished,
and the eight requisites appeared on their bodies.
As the populace was watching they went through the air to Mount Nandamūlaka.
Queen Padumavatī thought: ‘After having so many children, I have become childless!’
Her heart having been overcome by grief, she died from this illness,
and in a small village near the gate of the city of Rājagaha
she was reborn, and made a living in that place by doing manual labour.
Later she went to a good family home,
and while carrying rice-porridge one day to her husband’s field,
in the midst of her children,
she saw eight Independent Buddhas going through the air at the time they went for alms,
and going quickly, she informed her husband,
saying: “Look, Noble Sir, let us invite these Independent Buddhas and feed (them).”
He said: “These are birds (who look like) ascetics who are flying somewhere,
they are not Independent Buddhas.”
As they were talking they descended to a spot not far away.
That woman on that day gave her own rice and other solid food to them herself,
and said: “Tomorrow, eight people can take my alms food.”
“Well said, lay woman, such is your hospitality, let there be just eight seats then,
but seeing a great many Independent Buddhas, your heart would be uplifted.”
On the following day she prepared eight seats,
arranged them with great respect for the eight of them, and sat down.
The Independent Buddhas who were invited informed the rest,
saying: “Sirs, without going anywhere else today,
all of you show your regard for your Mother.”
Hearing their words, they all came through the air together,
and appeared at the gate of their Mother’s house.
she ushered them all into the house and made them sit down on the seats.
As they were sitting down in order,
a further eight seats appeared through supernatural power and the ninth sat himself down on the nearest seat.
As the seats increased, so did the house increase (in size).
When they were all thus seated,
° the woman respectfully offered what was prepared for the eight Independent Buddhas
to the five hundred,
and bringing eight handfuls of blue lilies in her hand,
she placed them at the feet of the Independent Buddhas she had invited and said:
“Reverend Sirs, in whatever place I am reborn
may the colour of my body be like the colour of the inside of this blue lily’s heart.”
She made this aspiration.
The Independent Buddhas rejoiced with their Mother and returned to Gandhamādana.
She did good deeds for the rest of her life, and after passing away from there and being reborn in the world of the gods,
when this (Gotama) Buddha arose, she was conceived in a merchant’s family in Sāvatthī,
and as she was the same colour as the heart of a blue lily, she was given the name Uppalavaṇṇā.
When she had reached maturity
all the Kings in the Rose-Apple Isle
“Please give us your daughter.”
There were none known to be not sending (this message).
Then the merchant thought:
‘I will not be able to satisfy
and after summoning his daughter, he said: “Will you be able to go forth, Daughter?”
(Because of) being in her last rebirth, that word was like medicated oil sprinkled on her head,
therefore she said to her Father: “Father, I will go forth.”
He paid respects to her, led her to the nunnery, and had her go forth.
Not long after she had gone forth,
She lit the lamp, swept the observance hall,
and grasping the sign of the crest of the lamp,
while looking at it again and again,
and producing absorption on the fire meditation subject,
and making that a basis, she attained Liberation.
Together with the fruit of Liberation she also mastered the spiritual power of transformation.
Later, on the day the Teacher performed the double miracle,
she roared a lion’s roar, saying: “I will perform a miracle, reverend Sir.”
Being asked “What miracle will you perform?”
she said: “Reverend Sir, after showing (myself) before an assembly for twelve leagues on all sides,
surrounded by an assembly that is thirty-six leagues from front to back,
after taking the form of a Universal Monarch and approaching, I will worship you.”
The Teacher said: “I know your power.”
For this reason the Teacher, as the occasion had arisen,
while sitting in Jeta’s Wood, in placing the nuns successively in their different positions,
placed this Elder Nun in the foremost position of those possessing spiritual power.
Translation
In the sixth (story), “Amongst those who meditate, that is to say, Nandā,”
it shows why the Elder Nun Nandā, amongst those who delighted in meditation, was said to be foremost.
At the time of the Buddha Padumuttara, it seems,
she was conceived in a good family home in Haṁsavatī,
and later, while listening to the Teacher teach the Dhamma,
seeing the Teacher place a certain nun as being foremost amongst those who meditate,
she did a great deed and aspired for that position herself.
She was reborn amongst gods and humans (only) for one hundred thousand aeons,
and was reborn (at a time) before our Teacher,
being conceived in the womb of Mahāpajāpatī Gotamī,
and was given the name Nandā, also Beautiful Nandā was said,
and later, because of her supreme beauty, the name Janapadakalyāṇī
After our One of Ten Powers had attained omniscience,
and gradually come to Kapilavatthu,
given the going forth to Rāhula and Nanda,
and was leaving after the time of the Great King Suddhodana’s Final Nibbāna,
° she understood: ‘After Mahāpajāpatī Gotamī and Rāhula’s Mother had renounced,
they received the going forth in the presence of the Teacher,’
and she thought: ‘After their going forth, what work is there for me here?”
And she went into the presence of Mahāpajāpatī and (also) went forth.
From the day of her going forth, thinking: ‘The Teacher finds fault with beauty,’
she didn’t go to attend on the Teacher,
and when an occasion for instruction arrived,
The Teacher, understanding that she was intoxicated with her own beauty,
° said: “Let each one receive the instruction herself after coming,
she should not send another from amongst the nuns.”
Then Beautiful Nandā, not seeing another way, went unwillingly for her instruction.
The Teacher, because of her conduct, created a beautiful woman with his spiritual power,
who held a palmyra fan, and seemed to be fanning him.
Seeing that Beautiful Nandā thought:
‘Without reason I was heedless and I did not come,
yet such beautiful women go about confidently in the presence of the Teacher.
My beauty is not worth even a sixteenth part of the beauty of their beauty,
not knowing this for such a (long) time I did not come!’
She stood there gazing at the woman’s form.
The Teacher, (knowing) she was endowed with (all) the former conditions,
recited the verse found in the Dhammapada:
This citadel is made of bones, smeared over with flesh and blood,
where old age and death, conceit and anger are lying hidden.
and he spoke the Discourse:
Whether going or standing, whether sitting or lying,
it moves, it stretches, this is the movement of the body.
Bones and sinews conjoined, smeared with skin and flesh,
the body is covered with skin, the reality is not seen.
Full of intestines, full of undigested food, having a lumpy liver, a bladder,
heart, lungs, kidney and spleen;
mucus, spit, sweat and fat,
blood, synovial fluid, bile and grease.
Always there are impurities flowing from its nine orifices,
eye-defecation from the eyes, ear-defecation from the ears,
mucus from the nose, from the mouth vomit is
vomited, also bile and phlegm, perspiration and dirt from the body,
and its hollow head is filled with the brain.
A fool, honouring ignorance, thinks of it as beautiful,
but when it lies dead, bloated and discoloured,
cast aside in the charnel ground, (even) his relatives have no further expectation (of it).
Dogs, hyenas, wolves and worms eat it,
crows, vultures also eat, and whatever other breathing beings there are.
Having heard the Word of the Buddha, the monastic endowed with wisdom here,
the one who understands it, sees as it really is.
(Thinking:) ‘As is this, so is that, as is that, so is this,’
inside and outside, he should remove delight for the body.
Having removed passion and delight, the monastic endowed with wisdom here
has passed over to the deathless peace, the immovable state of Nibbāna.
He cares for this stinking, impure two legged (body),
(but) it is full of various corpses flowing out from here and there.
He who would think to be proud of such a body,
or would despise another (because of theirs), what is this except a lack of insight?
With that she was established (in knowledge) about the dissolution and destruction of beauty and attained Liberation.
In this place the story below
is the same as the Elder Nun Khemā’s story, and is not elaborated further.
From thence onwards Beautiful Nandā was chief amongst those delighting in meditation.
Later as the Teacher was sitting in Jeta’s Wood,
as he was assigning the places of the nuns in order,
he placed the Elder Nun Nandā in the foremost position amongst those who meditate.
Translation
In the second (story), “Khemā” is the name of this nun.
From here on, without saying: “This is the exposition concerning the enquiry into her (previous) deeds,”
placing the resolution at the beginning each time, we will say what should be said.
In the past, at the time of the Buddha Padumuttara, it seems,
she was reborn in the city of Haṁsavatī, and was owned by another.
° Then one day, she saw that Fortunate One’s chief disciple,
the Elder named Sujāta,
gave him three sweetmeats, had her hair shorn on that very day,
gave a donation to the Elder,
and made this aspiration: ‘When a Buddha has arisen in the future may I, like you, have great wisdom,’
she did good deeds for the rest of her life,
and being reborn amongst gods and humans (only) for one hundred thousand aeons,
she was conceived in the home of Kiki, the King of Kāsi, in the time of the Buddha Kassapa,
and became (one) amongst seven sisters,
lived as a celibate in the house for twenty-thousand years,
together with her sisters had a dwelling place made for the One of Ten Powers,
and being reborn amongst gods and humans (only) during one period when there was no Buddha,
when this (Gotama) Buddha arose
she was conceived in a Royal family in the city of Sāgala in the country of Madda,
and given the name Khemā.
The radiance of her body glowed as it were with a golden hue.
When she had reached maturity she was taken to King Bimbisāra’s house.
When the Realised One was living near to Rājagaha in the Bamboo Wood,
(she), being intoxicated with her own beauty, and thinking: ‘The Teacher, it appears, sees fault in beauty,’
and: ‘He will see fault in my beauty,’
through fear, didn’t go to see the One of Ten Powers.
The King thought: ‘I am the Teacher’s foremost attendant,
and for one like me who is known as a Noble Disciple,
(that) my Chief Consort does not go to see the One of Ten Powers, is not pleasing to me.’
After having the praises of the Bamboo Grove composed by the poets:
he said: “Recite (the poems) within the hearing of Queen Khemā.”
“He who has not seen the delightful Bamboo Wood,
has also not seen Nandana (in Tāvatiṁsa Heaven), such was my thinking.
He who has seen the Bamboo Wood, rejoicing in the rejoicer of men,
has also seen Nandana greatly rejoiced in by the Lord of the Gods (Sakka).
The gods, having abandoned Nandana, and descended to the surface of the Earth,
after seeing the delightful Veḷuvana, astonished, are not satiated (with it).
Through the King’s merit it appeared, it is decorated with the Buddha’s merit,
who could describe the great quantity of virtues of that Wood?”
After hearing the praise of the Grove, and gaining a desire to go, she put the question to the King.
The King said: “Go to the Grove,
but without having seen the Teacher, you will not receive (permission) to return.”
Without having given a reply to the King, she took the path (to the Grove).
The King said to the men who were going with her:
“If the Queen, returning from the garden, sees the One of Ten Powers, that is good;
(but) if she does not see (him), the Royal command is you must point him out.”
Then the Queen, after walking in the Grove in the daytime,
and returning without seeing the One of Ten Powers, was ready to go.
Then the King’s men, against her liking, led the Queen into the presence of the Teacher.
The Teacher saw her coming, and with his spiritual power made an image of a heavenly angel,
which took up a palm-fan, and he made (it look) like she was fanning him.
Having seen her, Queen Khemā thought:
“My conceit has perished, such beautiful women, like unto heavenly angels,
are standing not far from the One of Ten Powers, I am not fit to be their servant,
my wicked mind supported by mad conceit has perished.”
Grasping the image she stood there looking at the woman.
Then as she was watching, through the power of the Realised One’s resolve,
that angel passed beyond her youth,
and from being in middle-age, she passed beyond middle-age,
and was like one in old-age having wrinkled skin, grey hair and broken and loose teeth.
Then as she was watching, (the angel) stumbled about together with her fan and fell down.
Then Khemā, being endowed with the former conditions,
as that sense-object came within range, reflected thus:
‘Even such a beautiful body comes to misfortune,
my body will also come to the very same (misfortune).’
At the instant that she had that thought, the Teacher spoke this verse found in the Dhammapada:
“Those impassioned with passion run along with the stream,
just as a spider (runs along) the web she has made herself,
after cutting that off, the wise journey on
without expectation, having abandoned all suffering.”
At the conclusion of the verse, while standing on that very spot,
she attained Liberation together with the analytic knowledges.
For one who attains Liberation while dwelling in the midst of the home life
she should either that very day attain Final Nibbāna or go forth.
(The Buddha), understanding the life span of her existence,
said: “I will cause her to receive permission to go forth.”
After worshipping the Teacher and going to the King’s residence,
she stood there without having worshipped the King.
Through that sign, the King understood: “She must have attained Nobility,”
then he said to her: “Queen, have you been to see the Teacher?”
“Great King, only a little insight has been gained by you,
but I have gained the One of Ten Power’s true insight,
you must allow me to go forth!”
The King, answered: “Very well, Queen!”
and had her carried in a golden palanquin to the nunnery, and had her go forth.
Then it was said of her: “The Elder Nun called Khemā, while still a householder, attained Liberation,”
and she became famous for her great wisdom.
Wearied of all processes, skilled in the modes of conditions,
having overcome the four floods, I attained Liberation.
I have mastery over spiritual power, the divine ear-element,
I have mastery in knowledge of mind-reading.
I know my previous lives, have clarified the divine eye,
destroyed all the pollutants,
Right there, in meanings, conditions, language and improvisation
my knowledge was purified, (it) arose within the Buddha’s Teaching.
I was proficient in purification, mature in subjects for discussion,
a knower of the Abstract Teaching method, attained to mastery in the Teaching,
Later on the grounds in Toraṇa, by the Lord King of Kosala
I was questioned with deep questions, and I answered just as it is.
Then the King approached the Happy One and questioned him,
right there the Awakened One answered, just as I had answered.
This is the story here.
Then later, when the Teacher was sitting in Jeta’s Wood,
in placing the nuns successively in their different positions,
he placed the Elder Nun Khemā at the foremost of those having great wisdom.
Translation
In the ninth (story), “Amongst those who are quick in deep knowledge,”
it shows why the Elder Nun Bhaddā Kuṇḍalakesā, amongst those who were quick in deep knowledge, was said to be foremost.
At the time of the Buddha Padumuttara, being reborn in a good family home in Haṁsavatī,
she listened to the Teacher talk about Dhamma,
and saw the Teacher place a certain nun as being foremost amongst those who are quick in deep knowledge,
and did a great deed and aspired for that position herself.
She was reborn amongst gods and humans (only) for one hundred thousand aeons,
and in the time of the Buddha Kassapa, in the home of Kiki, the King of Kāsi,
she became (one) amongst seven sisters,
established the ten precepts for twenty-thousand years,
living as a celibate,
made a dwelling place for the Community,
was reborn amongst gods and humans (only) during one period when there was no Buddha,
and when this (Gotama) Buddha arose
she was conceived in a merchant’s family in the city of Rājagaha,
and they gave her the name Bhaddā (Auspicious).
That very day in the city the (King’s) chaplain’s son was born.
From the moment of his birth, beginning with King (Bimbisāra’s) residence,
and throughout the whole city weapons blazed forth.
In the morning the chaplain went to the King’s family and asked if the King had slept comfortably.
The King said: “How can I sleep comfortably today, Teacher, when all night
we saw the weapons in the King’s residence blazing forth and we have become fearful?”
“Great King, do not worry for this reason,
not only in your home did weapons blaze forth, it was so throughout the whole city.”
“What is the reason, Teacher?”
“In our home was born a child under the thieves’ star,
he will become an enemy to the whole city,
this is the portent concerning him,
there is no danger for you, but if you wish, let us bear him off.”
“There being no intention to harm us, there is no need to bear him off.”
The chaplain, thinking: ‘My son has come bearing his own name,’
named him Sattuka (Little Enemy).
Bhaddā grew up in the merchant’s home, and Sattuka grew up in the chaplain’s home.
From the time he was able to play by running around here and there
whatever he saw in any place he had wandered to,
he took all of it away, and filled up his Mother and Father’s home (with it).
His Father, although giving him a thousand reasons, was not able to restrain him.
Later, as he reached maturity,
understanding it was an impossibility to restrain him in any way,
he gave him a pair of blue robes,
and put into his hands all the requisites for housebreaking and a grapple,
and sent him off, saying: “You can make a living through doing this work.”
From that day forward, after throwing his grapple,
ascending residences of good families, making a breach,
and taking the goods that other families had stored there, as if he had put them there himself, he departed.
There was not a home in the whole city that was not plundered by him.
One day as the King was travelling about the city in his chariot, he asked his charioteer:
“Why is it that there appears to be a breach in every house in this city?”
“God-King, in this city there is a thief named Sattuka who,
having broken through the wall, carries off the property of the good families.”
The King summoned the Mayor,
and said: “It seems that in this city there is such and such a thief,
why have you not grabbed him?”
“We, God-King, are not able to find the thief together with the stolen property.”
“If today you capture the thief you can live;
but if you do not capture (him), I will issue a Royal command.”
“Yes, God-King,” and the Mayor sent men all over the city,
and after (Sattuka) had broken through a wall, and was making off with others’ goods,
they captured (him) together with the stolen property and brought him to the King.
The King said: “Take this thief out through the south gate and execute him!”
The Mayor gave his assent to the King,
and having that thief flogged with a thousand strokes at each of the crossroads,
he went out
At that time the merchant’s daughter Bhaddā,
after opening the window because of the uproar of the populace,
while looking around, saw the thief Sattuka being brought out,
and holding her two hands over her heart,
went and lay down on the couch with her head held low.
She was the family’s only daughter
and her relatives were not able to endure even a trifling contortion of her face.
Then her Mother, seeing her lying on the couch, asked: “What are you doing, Dear?”
“Do you see this thief they have prepared and brought out to be executed?”
“Yes, Lady, we do see (him).”
“If I get him I will live, but if I don’t get him there is surely death for me.”
They, being unable to convince her in any way,
considered: “Life is better than death.”
Then her Father went into the Mayor’s presence, and gave him a thousand in a bribe,
° saying: “My daughter is infatuated with this thief,
please free him through some means or other.”
He, saying: “Very well,” assenting to the merchant, grabbed the thief,
and delayed at the funeral bier until the sun was setting,
as the sun set, he drove a certain man from the prison,
and loosening Sattuka’s bonds, he sent Sattuka to the merchant’s home,
and having the other man bound with (Sattuka’s) bonds,
he drove him through the southern door and had him executed.
The merchant’s servants grabbed Sattuka and took him to the merchant’s residence.
Seeing him, the merchant, thinking: “I will fulfil my daughter’s desire,”
had Sattuka bathed in scented water,
adorned with all decorations, and sent him to the mansion.
Bhaddā, thinking: “My desire is fulfilled,”
decorated (herself) with innumerable decorations and amused (herself) with him.
Sattuka, after a few days had passed, thought:
“Her decorative articles will be mine,
(but) by what means is it fitting to grab her ornaments?”
At a time they were sitting comfortably together, he said to Bhaddā:
“There is a word of mine I would like to speak.”
The merchant’s daughter, like one who had received a thousand (coins), with a satisfied mind,
said: “Speak freely, Noble Sir.”
“You thought: ‘His life was saved because of me,’
but when they grabbed me on the mountain from where they throw down thieves I prayed to the god living there,
imploring: ‘If I receive my life, I will make an offering to you.’
Because of that my life was saved, quickly get an offering ready.”
Bhaddā, thinking: ‘I will fulfil his desire,’ prepared the offering,
decorated herself with all decorations,
mounted a vehicle with her husband, and went to the mountain from where they throw down thieves,
began to ascend, thinking: ‘I will make an offering to the god of the mountain.’
Sattuka thought: ‘With all of us ascending
I will not be able to grab her ornaments,’
so after having her take the offering-vessel, he ascended the mountain.
But while speaking with Bhaddā he spoke no endearing words,
and from his gestures she understood his intention.
Then he said to her: “Bhaddā, cast off your robe,
and make a bundle here of all the ornaments heaped up on you.”
“Husband, what is my fault?”
“Why, fool, do you think I have come to make offerings?” he said, making a sign.
“Having torn the liver out of that god I could give an offering in this place,
but I have come desiring your ornaments.”
“Noble Sir, but whose are the ornaments, and whose am I?”
“We do not know of such a thing,
as your property is one thing, and my property is another.”
“Very well, Noble Sir, but let me fulfil one wish,
let me give you in all your finery a hug from in front and from behind.”
Saying: “Very well,” he accepted.
Understanding his acceptance, she hugged him from the front,
made like she was hugging him from behind, and threw him from the mountain from where they throw down thieves.
He fell through the air and was crushed to pieces.
Seeing the wondrous nature of her deed,
the goddess who dwelt on the mountain spoke this verse expounding her virtue:
“Not on every occasion is it a man that is wise,
a women is wise also, she is wise now and then.
Not on every occasion is it a man that is wise,
a women is wise also, (if) she but think for a moment.”
Then Bhaddā thought: ‘Because of this I am not able to return again to my home.
I will go from here and go forth in some going forth (or other),’
and she went to the Nigaṇṭha’s monastery and requested to go forth amongst the Nigaṇṭhas.
Then they said this to her: “What manner of going forth?”
Saying: “Please give your supreme going forth.”
Saying, “Very well,” they pulled out her hair with the shell of a palm nut and gave her the going forth.
But her hair grew back in ringlets and wavy curls,
and because of that, the name Kuṇḍalakesā (Curly Hair) arose.
She learned all the skills in the place of her going forth,
and knowing: ‘There is no further distinction beyond this,’
wandering from village to town to capital city,
wherever there were learned men, she went there
and learned all the arts they knew.
And in many places, because she was so learned no one was able to give a reply to her.
Then not seeing anyone who was able to dispute with her,
in whatever village or town she entered, she piled up sand at the gate,
and set up a branch of a rose-apple tree right there,
saying: “Whoever is able to refute my word, he should trample down this branch,”
and she informed the children standing nearby.
No one trampled it down even after seven days.
Then taking it, she departed.
At that time our Fortunate One had been reborn in the world,
and was living in Jeta’s Wood at Sāvatthī.
Then Kuṇḍalakesā, after gradually reaching Sāvatthī,
and entering the city in the same way as before,
set her branch in the sand, informed the children and left.
At that time (Ven. Sāriputta,) the General of the Dhamma, after the Community of monks had already entered (the city),
saw the Rose-Apple branch in the sand heap while entering the town alone,
and asked: “Why is this placed here?”
The children, without omitting anything, told him the reason.
“That being so, take it and trample on it, children.”
They listened to the Elder’s word (but) some didn’t dare to trample on it,
some others, after trampling on it in an instant, crushed it to powder.
Kuṇḍalakesā, while leaving after taking her meal,
saw the branch trampled down and asked: “Who did this deed?”
Then they told her the General of the Dhamma had caused it to be done.
She thought: ‘He must be knowing his own strength
else he wouldn’t dare to have had the branch trampled down,
he must surely be a great man!
But I am insignificant (in comparison), and I will not shine,
° and (yet) thinking: ‘After entering the village, it is right to inform the people,’
that is what she did.
All eighty thousand families residing in that city in their various neighbourhoods
were informed, so it should be understood.
The Elder, after the meal duties, sat down at the root of a certain tree.
Then Kuṇḍalakesā, surrounded by the populace, went into the presence of the Elder,
exchanged greetings and stood on one side.
She asked: “Reverend Sir, did you have the branch trampled down?”
“Yes, I had it trampled down.”
“That being so, reverend Sir, let there be (a discussion) on our doctrine, together with yours.”
“Let it be so, Bhaddā.”
“But who should ask, and who should answer?”
“Our questions are ready, you can ask according to your understanding.”
Consent having been given by the Elder
she asked everything according to the doctrine she understood, and the Elder answered it all,
and having asked everything, she fell silent.
Then the Elder said to her:
“You asked many things, but we will ask only one question.”
“Ask away, reverend Sir.”
“What is said to be one?”
Kuṇḍalakesā said: “I don’t know, reverend Sir.”
“If you don’t know even that much, how will you know anything else?”
She fell at the Elder’s feet right there
and said: “I go to you for refuge, reverend Sir.”
“There is no coming to me for refuge,
the Greatest Person in the world with its gods dwells in a monastery nearby, go to Him for refuge.”
She said: “I will do so, reverend Sir.”
In the evening time, at the time the Teacher was teaching Dhamma,
she went into the presence of the Teacher,
worshipped with the fivefold prostration and stood at one side.
The Teacher, by way of subjugating her (volitional) processes,
spoke this verse found in the Dhammapada:
“Even though one possesses a thousand lines from verses which are unbeneficial,
they are surpassed by one line of verse, which, having heard, one is calmed.”
At the conclusion of the verse, just as she was standing there,
after attaining Liberation together with the analytic knowledges, she asked for the going forth.
The Teacher agreed to her going forth, and she went to the nunnery and went forth.
Later this discussion arose in the midst of the four assemblies:
“Great is this Bhaddā Kuṇḍalakesā,
in that she attained Liberation at the end of just four lines of verse!”
For this reason the Teacher, as the occasion had arisen,
placed this Elder Nun in the foremost position amongst those who were quick in deep knowledge.
Translation
In the first of the texts concerning the Elder Nuns, “That is to say, Mahāpajāpatī Gotamī,”
it shows how the Elder Nun Mahāpajāpatī Gotamī, amongst those who were senior, was said to be the foremost.
This is the exposition concerning the enquiry into her (previous) deeds:
At the time of the Buddha Padumuttara, it seems,
she was conceived in a good family home in Haṁsavatī,
and at another time, while listening to the Teacher teach the Dhamma,
seeing the Teacher place a certain nun as being foremost in seniority,
she did a great deed
She gave donations for the rest of her life, protected her virtue,
passed away from there, was reborn in the world of the gods,
and spending one period when there was no Buddha
was reborn, and became the chief amongst five hundred female slaves in Bārāṇasī.
Then, as the time for the Rains Retreat was approaching,
five Independent Buddhas descended from Mount Nandamūlaka to Isipatana,
wandered for alms in the city, and after going (back) to Isipatana,
they thought: ‘We will ask for manual labour in order to prepare the huts for spending the Rains,’
and after wrapping their robes, they entered the city in the evening time
and stood at the gate of the treasurer’s house.
The chief female slave took a waterpot and while going to the reservoir
saw the Independent Buddhas entering the city.
The treasurer, after hearing why they had come,
said: “You do not have our permission, please go!”
Then, as they were leaving the city,
the chief female slave, took her waterpot and while entering she saw them,
put down the waterpot, worshipped, bent down, lifted up her face,
and asked: “Noble Ones, having just entered the city, why are you (now) leaving?”
“We came to ask for manual labour to prepare the huts for spending the Rains.”
“Did you receive it, reverend Sirs?”
“We did not receive it, lay woman.”
“But can these huts only be made by the powerful,
or is it possible also for the lowly to build (them)?”
“It is possible for anyone to build (them).”
“Very well, reverend Sirs, we will build (them),
tomorrow please accept our alms food,” and after inviting (them),
she took the waterpot, placed it on the road going to the reservoir,
and every time the other female slaves came, she said: “Wait here,”
and when everyone had assembled, she said:
“Ladies, will we always be doing slave-work for another,
or do you wish to be free of this slavery?”
“Noble Lady, today itself we wish to be free.”
“If you so wish, as the five Independent Buddhas didn’t receive manual labour
they were invited by me for tomorrow.
Have your husbands give manual labour for a day.”
They replied: “Very well!”
and informed their husbands when they returned from the forest.
They (also) said: “Very well!” and assembled at the chief male slave’s door.
Then the chief female slave said to them:
“Tomorrow, Dears, you must give manual labour to the Independent Buddhas,”
and she explained the advantages, and even those who did not desire to do it (at first),
after she had given them strong advice, they all agreed.
On the next day, after giving food to the Independent Buddhas,
she gave a sign to all of the slaves.
They entered the wilderness straight away, assembled the timber,
gathered in hundreds, made each of them a hut together with a walking meditation path,
and placed suitable beds, chairs and drinks,
and got a promise from the Independent Buddhas to spend the three months
and prepared alms food (for each of them) in turn.
For those who were not able to take the opportunity to give on their day,
the chief female slave took (food) from her own house and gave it.
After looking after them for three months,
the chief female slave had each of the female slaves prepare cloth,
and they made five-hundred coarse cloths.
After exchanging them, and having the three robes made, she gave (a set to each of) the five Independent Buddhas.
And even as they watched, the Independent Buddhas
went through the air to Mount Gandhamādana.
After doing good deeds for the rest of their lives, they were reborn in the world of the gods.
The chief female, having passed away from there,
was reborn to the chief weaver in a weaver’s village not far from Bārāṇasī.
Then one day, Padumavatī sons, the five-hundred Independent Buddhas,
being invited by the King of Bārāṇasī, after going to the King’s Gate,
and not seeing anyone there,
turned back and left via the city gate,
and went to the weaver’s village.
Those women saw the Independent Buddhas,
treated them kindly, and after worshipping them all, gave them alms food.
After taking their food, they left for Gandhamādana.
After doing good deeds for the rest of her life, and being reborn amongst gods and humans (only),
she was reborn prior to our Teacher,
and was conceived in the house of Mahāsuppabuddha in the city of Devadaha,
and was given the name Gotamī.
She was Mahāmāyā’s younger sister.
The brāhmaṇas learned in the scriptures, examining the characteristics,
° declared: “The children who dwell in these two wombs
will become universal monarchs.”
The great King Suddhodana, when they had reached maturity,
married the two of them and led them to his home.
Later, after our Buddha-to-be had passed away from Tusita Heaven,
he took conception in the womb of Queen Mahāmāyā.
Mahāmāyā, seven days from the day she delivered him,
died and was reborn in Tusita Heaven.
° The great King Suddhodana placed the Great Being’s Mother’s sister,
Mahāpajāpatī Gotamī, in the position of Chief Consort.
At that time prince Nanda was born.
Mahāpajāpatī gave prince Nanda to a wet-nurse
and took care of the Buddha-to-be herself.
On another occasion, the Buddha-to-be left on his Great Renunciation,
attained omniscience, and while working for the benefit of the world,
gradually reached the city of Kapilavatthu and went into the city for alms.
Then his Father the Great King Suddhodana,
hearing a talk about Dhamma on the highway became a Stream-Enterer.
Then on the second day Nanda went forth,
On another occasion the Teacher was living in the vicinity of Vesālī in the Gabled Hall.
At that time the Great King Suddhodana,
realised Liberation under the white parasol and was Completely Emancipated.
Then the thought of ordination occurred to Mahāpajāpatī.
After leaving the bank of the river Rohiṇī at the conclusion of the Discourse on Quarrels and Disputes,
all the wives of the five-hundred young men who had gone forth, had but one thought:
‘After going into Mahāpajāpatī’s presence, all of us will go forth in the presence of the Teacher.’
Making Mahāpajāpatī their chief,
and going into the presence of the Teacher, they expressed their desire to go forth.
The first time Mahāpajāpatī
requested the going forth from the Teacher it was not granted.
Therefore, she summoned the barber, had her hair removed, donned the yellow robes,
took all the Sākiyan women and went to Vesālī,
and the One of Ten Powers was requested by the Elder Ānanda,
and she received the going forth and the higher ordination with the eight serious rules.
All the others also received their higher ordination together.
This (is told) in brief here, but the elaboration comes from the story in the text.
Then, after her higher ordination, Mahāpajāpatī,
after approaching the Teacher and worshipping him, stood on one side,
and the Teacher taught the Dhamma to her.
After taking a meditation subject in the presence of the Teacher, she attained Liberation.
All five hundred nuns at the conclusion of the Discourse on Nandaka’s Advice (also) attained Liberation.
This is the story of what happened.
Later, when the Teacher was sitting in Jeta’s Wood, when placing the nuns in their different positions,
he placed Mahāpajāpatī as the foremost amongst those who were senior.
Translation
In the twelfth (story), “Amongst those who wear robes made of rough materials,”
it shows why Kisā Gotamī, amongst those who wore robes brought from the cemetery that are rough in three ways,
‘Gotamī’ was her name,
but as she was somewhat thin by nature she was called ‘Kisā
At the time of the Buddha Padumuttara,
she was reborn in a good family home in Haṁsavatī,
and while listening to the Teacher teach the Dhamma,
° seeing the Teacher place a certain nun
as being foremost amongst those who wore robes made of rough materials,
she did a great deed and aspired for that position herself.
After being reborn amongst gods and humans (only) for one hundred thousand aeons,
when this (Gotama) Buddha arose,
she was reborn in a poor family in Sāvatthī,
and when she reached maturity she went to a good family.
There they abused her as a daughter of a poor family.
Later, she gave birth to a son, and then she was treated with respect.
But when the boy had reached playing age, running here and running there,
he died, and grief arose in her.
She thought: ‘In this home, where gains and respect have been cut off,
and since the time of the birth of my son, I have gained respect,
they will endeavour to cast away my son.’
With her son on her hip, saying: “Give medicine for my son,”
she wandered successively to the door of (various) homes,
and men, wherever they saw her, saying: “Where did you ever see medicine for one who is dead?”
clapped their hands and mocked her.
Although they spoke like this, she wasn’t convinced.
Then, after a certain wise man had seen her,
and thought: ‘Her mind has been overthrown by grief for her son,
but although no one else will know of a medicine,
the One of Ten Powers will know,’
he said: “Lady, there is no one knowing the medicine for your son other
than the Greatest Person in the world with its gods, the One of Ten Powers,
who dwells in a nearby monastery, go into his presence and ask (Him).”
She, thinking: ‘This man speaks the truth,’ carrying her son,
stood on the edge of the (four) assemblies at a time when the Realised One was sitting on his Buddha seat,
and said: “Give medicine for my son, Fortunate One.”
The Teacher, seeing she had the supporting conditions,
said: “It is fortunate for you, Gotamī, that you came here for medicine,
go, enter the town and wander through the whole town starting from one end,
and at whatever home there has not been a death, from there bring a mustard seed.”
Saying: “Very well, reverend Sir,”
she entered into the town with a hopeful mind, and at the first home
° she said: “The One of Ten Powers has me bring a mustard seed as medicine for my son,
please give me a mustard seed.”
Saying: “Come, Gotamī,” and stretching forth, they gave (it to her).
“I am not able to take it,
(but first must ask): ‘In this home has there not been a death?’ ”
“What did you say, Gotamī, who is able to count those who have died here?”
“Then that is enough, I will not take it,
the One of Ten Powers (told) me that from a home where there has not been a death, from there I have to take it for him.”
Having gone to the third house in this way, she realised:
“The whole city will be this way,
this must have been foreseen by the Awakened One, who is beneficent and compassionate.”
She became spiritually anxious, departed from there,
went to the charnel grounds, and took her son with her hand,
° and saying: “Son, I thought there was death only for you,
but it is not only for you, for the (whole) population it is the same, this is the Dhamma,”
she abandoned her son in the charnel grounds, and spoke this verse:
“Not a village Teaching, nor a town Teaching,
Nor is this a Teaching for one family alone,
For the whole of the world with its gods,
There is this Teaching of impermanence.”
Having spoken thus, she went into the presence of the Teacher.
Then the Teacher said to her: “Gotamī, did you get the mustard seed?”
“The business with a mustard seed is finished, reverend Sir, but give me something for support.”
Then the Teacher spoke this verse to her found in the Dhammapada:
“That person whose clinging mind is intoxicated by children and cattle,
death will carry away like a sleeping village by a great flood.”
At the end of the verse as she stood there she was established in Stream-Entry and requested the going forth,
and the Teacher allowed the going forth.
She circumambulated the Teacher three times, worshipped him,
went to the nunnery, received the going forth and higher ordination,
and in no long time, while wisely reflecting, she developed insight.
Then the Teacher spoke this lustrous verse:
“The one who lives for a hundred years not seeing the Deathless state,
is surpassed by one living for one day seeing the Deathless state.”
At the end of the verse she attained Liberation,
and in the use of the requisites she became pre-eminent,
and wandered around after covering herself with a robe that was rough in three ways.
Later as the Teacher was sitting in Jeta’s Wood,
as he was assigning the places of the nuns in order,
he placed this Elder Nun in the foremost position amongst those who wore robes that are rough in three ways.
Translation
In the fourth (story), “Amongst those who bear the Discipline in mind, that is to say, Paṭācārā,”
it shows (why) the Elder Nun Paṭācārā, amongst those who bore the Discipline in mind, was said to be foremost.
At the time of the Buddha Padumuttara, it seems,
after being conceived in a good family home in Haṁsavatī,
and later, while listening to the Teacher teach the Dhamma,
seeing the Teacher place a certain nun as being foremost amongst those who bore the Discipline in mind,
she did a great deed and aspired for that position herself.
She did good deeds for the rest of her life, was reborn amongst gods and humans (only),
and in the time of the Buddha Kassapa, she was conceived in the home of Kiki, the King of Kāsi,
and became (one) amongst seven sisters,
lived as a celibate for twenty-thousand years,
had a residence made for the Community of monks,
was reborn once again in the world of the gods,
and enjoyed good fortune during one period when there was no Buddha,
and when this (Gotama) Buddha arose, she was conceived in a merchant’s home in Sāvatthī.
Later, when she was mature,
after becoming intimate with a certain worker in her own home,
as she was going to someone from a family of her own standing,
she informed the man that she had been intimate with,
saying: “From tomorrow even if you beat on the door a hundred times you will not be able to see me,
if this is a (worthy) deed for you, take me right now and let us go.”
Saying: “So be it!” he grabbed the most valuable and suitable things,
took her from the city, retired for three or four leagues,
and set up home in one village.
Then later an embryo was established in her womb.
When her foetus was mature,
she said: “Husband, we are without protection in this place, let us go to my family’s home.”
He said: “Today let us go”, and: “Tomorrow let us go,”
and being unable (to decide when) to go, he let the time pass by.
She understood his reasoning, and thinking: ‘This fool will not take me,’
therefore when he had gone outside,
thinking: ‘I will go to my family home by myself,’ she set out on the path.
He returned and not seeing her in the home, he asked the neighbours,
and hearing: “She is going to her family home,”
he thought: ‘It is because of me that this daughter of a good family is without protection,’
and he followed in her steps and caught up (with her).
As she was on the highway she was delivered (of her child).
Then, thinking: ‘That thing for which we set out, has happened right here on the highway,
having gone (there) now, what would we do?’ and they turned back.
And again: ‘An embryo was established in her womb,’
and it should be elaborated according to what was said above.
But as she was delivering on the highway, at the very moment of birth,
a great storm arose in all four quarters.
She said to the gentleman: “Husband, an out of season storm has arisen in all four quarters,
please endeavour to make a wooden shelter.”
He said: “I will do so!” and he made a little hut with sticks,
and said: “I will go and bring grass to thatch it,”
and he cut the grass near the foot of a certain great anthill.
Then a black snake
and through that he fell down (dead) on the spot.
She, however, spent the whole night thinking: ‘Now he will come, now he will come,’
and said: “Certainly, he is thinking: ‘She is helpless,’ and he will have abandoned me on the road and gone away.”
The light appeared while she was searching (for him) by following his footsteps and, seeing he had fallen at the foot of an anthill,
she lamented: “Because of me this man perished,”
and having taken her young boy on her side and made the elder one grasp her fingers,
while going along the road, she saw a certain shallow river across the highway,
and realising: ‘I will not be able to go over in one go with both the boys,’
she placed the eldest on the near shore, and carried the youngest to the far shore,
lay him down on a cloth pillow, crossed back again,
and entered the river, thinking: ‘I will go and fetch the other (child).’
Then at the time she reached the middle of the river, one hawk,
thinking: ‘This is a piece of meat,’ came to peck at the (youngest) child.
She waved her hand to drive the hawk off.
Having seen the gesture of her hand, the eldest child,
thinking: ‘She is summoning me,’ descended into the river,
fell into the stream and was borne away with the current.
The hawk, before she could reach him,
grabbed the youngest child and bore him away.
She, overcome with great grief, went along the highway wailing this mournful song:
She reached Sāvatthī wailing like this, went to the good families district,
and through grief was unable to find her own home,
° and asked: “In this place there is such and such a family,
(but) where is the house?”
(They answered): “Having enquired about that family, what will you do?
The home they dwelt in fell down owing to being hit by the wind,
and right there and then all of them reached the end of their lives,
now they are (all), young and old, burning on a funeral pyre.
Look: you can make out the rising smoke.”
When she heard this, she said: “What did you say?”
Being unable to bear being clothed in her robe,
just as when she was born,
she went to her relatives’ funeral pyre,
and filled out her mournful song, lamenting:
Though she was given a cloth by other people, each time she tore it off, and threw it away.
Then everywhere she was seen the populace walked surrounding her,
and said: “This cloth-wanderer wanders without a cloth for protection,”
and they made the name Paṭācārā.
Because she became famous for shamelessly wandering around with nothing on,
therefore (they said): “Her (good) conduct has fallen away,” and they made the name Paṭācārā.
One day as the Teacher was teaching Dhamma to the populace,
she entered the monastery, and stood at the edge of the assembly.
The Teacher, having suffused her with a suffusion of loving-kindness,
said: “Regain your mindfulness, Sister, regain your mindfulness, Sister.”
Having heard the Teacher’s word she regained a strong sense of modesty and shame,
and she sat down on the ground right there.
A gentleman who was standing not far away threw her an upper robe.
She dressed herself and listened to the Dhamma.
The Teacher, on account of her, spoke this verse found in the Dhammapada:
“Not in children is there refuge, not in Father or in kin,
for one attacked by the End-Maker
Having understood the consequence, the wise one who protects his virtue,
quickly purifies the Path that leads to Nibbāna.”
At the conclusion of that verse as she stood there she was established in Stream-Entry,
and having approached and worshipped the Teacher, she asked for the going forth.
The Teacher said to her: “Go to the nunnery and go forth,”
and he allowed her going forth.
One day she took water in her waterpot, and pouring it while washing her feet,
it went (but) a little way and stopped.
She poured it a second time and it went a little further.
She poured it a third time and it went even further than that.
Having taken that as a meditation object, and defining the three ages (of life),
° she thought: ‘Like the first pouring of the water by me, (some of) these beings die in the first age (of life);
those who go further than that,
like the second time I poured out the water, die in middle age;
those who go further than that, like the third time I poured out the water,
surely die in the last age (of life).’
The Teacher, sitting radiant in the Perfumed Cottage,
(appeared) as though standing and speaking with her face to face,
° saying: “Thus Paṭācārā,
better than not seeing the rise and fall of the five constituents (of mind and body)
while living for a hundred years, is seeing rise and fall
for even a day or for even a moment,”
and after making the connection, teaching Dhamma, he spoke this verse:
At the conclusion of the teaching Paṭācārā attained Liberation together with the analytic knowledges.
Not long after her going forth, and her attainment of Liberation,
grasping the Buddha’s words she became one who had mastered the Basket of Discipline.
Later, while sitting in Jeta’s Wood,
in placing the nuns successively in their different positions,
he placed Paṭācāra in the foremost position of those who bore the Discipline in mind.
Translation
In the eleventh (story), “Amongst those who have attained very deep knowledge,”
it shows why the Elder Nun Bhaddā Kaccānā, amongst those who had very deep knowledge, was said to be foremost.
For one Buddha there are four people who have very deep knowledge, and not the rest of the disciples.
Other disciples may be able to recall one hundred thousand aeons, but not more than that.
For those who have attained very deep knowledge they recall (at least) an uncountable (length of time) and one hundred thousand aeons.
In our Teacher’s dispensation they were the two Great Disciples,
these four were able to recall this much.
Therefore this Elder Nun became known as foremost amongst those who had attained very deep knowledge.
Bhaddā Kaccānā is her name.
Her skin-colour was like the finest gold, indeed, like the most auspicious gold,
therefore she received the name Bhaddakañcanā (Auspicious Golden One),
and later the name Kaccānā came.
She was also designated Rāhulamātā (Rāhula’s Mother).
At the time of the Buddha Padumuttara,
she was conceived in a good family home in Haṁsavatī,
and later, while listening to the Teacher talk about Dhamma,
seeing the Teacher place a certain nun as being foremost amongst those who had attained very deep knowledge,
she did a great deed and aspired for that position herself.
After being reborn amongst gods and humans (only) for one hundred thousand aeons,
when this (Gotama) Buddha arose,
she was conceived in the Sakyan Suppabuddha’s home,
and they made the name Bhaddā Kaccānā for her.
When she had reached maturity she went to the Buddha-to-be’s home.
Later she gave birth to a son, the prince Rāhula.
The Buddha-to-be, after renouncing on the day (Rāhula) was born,
and attaining omniscience within the circle of the Bodhi Tree,
while bringing relief to the world, gradually came to Kapilavatthu,
and gave assistance to his relatives.
Later, when the Great King Suddhodana attained Nibbāna,
Mahāpajāpatī Gotamī, together with five hundred women, went forth in the presence of the Teacher.
Rāhula’s Mother and Janapadakalyāṇī,
Beginning from that time she became well-known as the Elder Nun, Bhaddā Kaccānā.
Later, having developed insight, and attained Liberation,
she mastered the deep knowledges, during a single sitting in cross-legged position,
with one advertence, she recalled (at least) an uncountable (length of time) and one hundred thousand aeons,
and she became well-known as having this virtue.
As the Teacher was sitting in Jeta’s Wood and assigning the places of the nuns in order,
he placed this Elder Nun in the foremost position amongst those who had very deep knowledge.
Translation
In the thirteenth (story), “Amongst those who are inclined to faith,”
it shows why Sigālakamātā, amongst those who adhered to the characteristic of faith, was said to be foremost.
At the time of the Buddha Padumuttara, it seems,
she was reborn in a good family home in Haṁsavatī,
and listened to the Teacher talk about Dhamma,
Whoever has faith in the Realised One,
whoever is virtuous and good, pleasing to the Noble Ones and praised,
whoever has confidence in the Community, having insight that is upright,
they say that one is not poor, his life is not in vain.
Therefore faith, virtue, confidence and insight into Dhamma,
should be engaged in by the intelligent, remembering the Buddhas’ Dispensation.
Seeing the Teacher place a certain nun
as being foremost amongst those who were inclined to faith,
she did a great deed and aspired for that position herself.
After being reborn amongst gods and humans (only) for one hundred thousand aeons,
when this (Gotama) Buddha arose,
she was reborn in a merchant’s family in Rājagaha,
and after going to a family of similar birth,
she gave birth to one son, and they made the name Sigālaka Kumāra for him.
Through that reason the name Sigālakamātā
One day, after hearing the Teacher talk about Dhamma,
she gained faith,
Since the time of going forth she gained a preponderance of the faculty of faith.
Having gone to the monastery for the purpose of listening to Dhamma,
she stood looking at the One of Ten Power’s bodily splendour.
The Teacher, knowing that she adhered to the mark of faith,
and knowing the suitability, taught confidence-inspiring Dhamma.
So this Elder Nun, bearing the characteristic of faith, attained Liberation.
Later, after the Teacher had sat down in Jeta’s Wood,
as he was assigning the places of the nuns in order,
he placed this Elder Nun in the foremost position amongst those who were inclined to faith.
Translation
In the seventh (story), “Amongst those who are energetic,”
it shows why Soṇā, amongst those who have held up and fulfilled energy, was said to be foremost.
At the time of the Buddha Padumuttara, it seems,
she was conceived in a good family home in Haṁsavatī,
and later, while listening to the Dhamma,
seeing the Teacher place a certain nun as being foremost amongst those who were energetic,
she did a great deed and aspired for that position herself.
She was reborn amongst gods and humans (only) for one hundred thousand aeons,
and when this (Gotama) Buddha arose she was conceived in a good family home in Sāvatthī,
and later, she was established in the household life and had many sons and daughters,
and set them all up individually in the household life.
From thence onwards, thinking: ‘What can she do for us?’
when she came into their presence, they did not even designate her as ‘Mother.’
And Many-Children Soṇā, understanding their lack of respect towards herself, thinking:
‘What will I do dwelling in a house,’ renounced and went forth.
Then the nuns, thinking: ‘She does not know the (minor) duties, she behaves improperly,’
gave her punishment.
Her sons and daughters saw her being punished, and thinking:
’Till this very day she does not know the training rules,’
and they ridiculed her on the spot wherever she was seen.
Having heard their words, with spiritual anxiety aroused,
thinking: ‘It is fitting to make a course to purification for myself,’
she rehearsed the Thirty-Two Fold Nature in whatever place she was sitting and whatever place she was standing.
hairs of the head, body hairs, nails, teeth, skin,
flesh, sinews, bones, bone-marrow, kidneys,
heart, liver, pleura, spleen, lungs,
intestines, mesentery, undigested food, excrement,
bile, phlegm, pus, blood, sweat, fat,
tears, grease, spit, mucus, synovic fluid, urine.
And just as formerly she had been known as Many-Children Soṇā,
so later she became well known as the Elder Nun Energetic Soṇā.
Then one day as the nuns were going to the (monks’) monastery
after saying: ‘Heat some water for the Community of Nuns, Soṇā,’ they departed.
Before the water was heated in the fire house,
while reciting the Thirty-Two Fold Nature as she was walking in meditation, she developed insight.
The Teacher, while sitting in the Fragrant Cottage (appeared to her and) recited this illustrious verse:
“The one who lives for a hundred years not seeing the Supreme Dhamma,
is surpassed by one living for one day (only) who sees the Supreme Dhamma.”
She attained Liberation at the conclusion of the verse, and thought: ‘I have attained Liberation,
but when they return, without considering, they will speak dispraise of me,
and will accumulate much demerit,
therefore it is fitting to do something as a sign.’
She placed the water pot over the fire-place, but she didn’t make the fire underneath.
After the nuns had returned, seeing the fire-place, but not seeing a fire,
° they said: “We told this old lady: ‘Heat the water for the Community of Nuns,’
but today she did not make the fire in the fire-place.”
“Noble Ladies, why do you need fire?
If you like to bathe with hot water, take water from the pot and bathe.”
They, thinking: ‘There will be a reason here,’ went and put their hand into the water,
and understanding it was heated, brought a water pot and took the water,
and as they took from it in that place it refilled.
Then they all understood she was established in Liberation,
and those who were junior fell at her feet in the five-fold prostration, saying:
“Noble Lady, for so long we disregarded you,
injured and spoke injuriously, please forgive us,” and asked for forgiveness.
The seniors, having squatted down, said:
“Noble Lady, forgive us,” and asked for forgiveness.
From then on, though she had gone forth in old age, they said:
“She has been established in the highest fruit in no long time through being energetic,”
and the virtue of the Elder Nun became well-known.
Later, after the Teacher had sat down in Jeta’s Wood,
as he was assigning the places of the nuns in order,
he placed the Elder Nun Soṇā in the foremost position amongst those who were energetic.
Translation
In the fifth (story), “Amongst those who talk about Dhamma,”
it shows (why) Dhammadinnā, amongst those who talked about Dhamma, was said to be foremost.
At the time of the Buddha Padumuttara, it seems,
she was reborn in a place belonging to others in Haṁsavatī,
° and after doing a great deed for the Elder Sujāta,
the Chief Disciple of the Fortunate Padumuttara,
she aspired for that position herself.
She did good deeds for the rest of her life, and was reborn in Heaven,
and everything below should be understood in accordance with the Elder Khemā’s resolution.
But at the time of the Buddha Phussa she,
° while living with the Teacher’s three brothers by different Mothers,
being placed as a servant in the house of the one in charge of almsgiving,
when told: “Give one,” gave two.
Thus, having given all, but without causing decline, ninety-two aeons having passed by,
she was conceived in the home of Kiki, the King of Kāsi, in the time of the Buddha Kassapa,
and became (one) amongst seven sisters,
lived as a celibate for twenty-thousand years,
had a dwelling place made for the Community of monks,
and being reborn amongst gods and humans (only) during one period when there was no Buddha,
when this (Gotama) Buddha arose was conceived in a good family home,
and later went to the home of the merchant Visākha.
The merchant Visākha, (King) Bimbisāra’s friend,
went with the King and for the first time saw the One of Ten Powers, listened to the Dhamma,
was established in the Fruit of Stream-Entry, and later realised the Fruit of Non-Returner.
That day, after going home,
Dhammadinnā was standing at the top of the stairs with outstretched hands,
(but) without taking her hand he ascended the mansion.
Also while eating he did not speak saying: “Give this, bring that.”
Dhammadinnā, having taken a spoon, reflected while serving:
“He did not take my hand as I was giving him my hand,
and while eating he does not talk, I wonder what is my fault?”
Then, when he had eaten, she asked him: “Noble Sir, I wonder what is my fault?”
“Dhammadinnā, you have no fault,
but from today forward intimacy with you,
to sit or to stand near,
or to chew and eat after you have brought (food) is no longer possible.
If you wish you can dwell in this home.
But if you do not wish, take however much wealth you need,
and go to your family’s house.
“Noble Sir, that being so,
on that which has been spat aside, or vomited up,
I could not live with my head held high,
please allow my going forth.”
Visākha said: “Very good, Dhammadinnā!” and after announcing it to the King,
he sent Dhammadinnā in a golden palanquin to the nunnery for the going forth.
After the going forth she thought:
“This merchant while still in the midst of his house has made an end to suffering,
but from the time I received the going forth
(till now) I have yet to make an end to suffering.”
She went to her teacher and preceptor,
° and said: “Noble Ladies, my mind does not delight in this crowded place,
I would go to a village dwelling.”
The Elders, because she had renounced a great family through her going forth,
felt unable to find fault with her thought, and they took her and went to a village dwelling.
As she had prepared the right conditions in the past
not long after she attained Liberation together with the analytic knowledges.
Then it occurred to her:
“I have attained the summit of what was to be done, living here what will I do?
I shall go to Rājagaha,
and there on account of me a large company of (my) relatives will make merit,”
and with the Elders she returned to the city.
Visākha, hearing that she had come, thought:
‘Quickly she came, is it because she is dissatisfied?’
In the evening time, he went into her presence and worshipped, and sat down at one side,
thinking: ‘It is inappropriate to ask about her dissatisfaction,’
(and instead) he asked a question about the five constituent parts and so forth,
and Dhammadinnā, like one who cuts through a lily stalk with a sword,
answered each of the questions.
The devotee, understanding how sharp was the Elder Nun Dhammadinnā’s knowledge,
after asking questions in order about all the conditions for the three paths of his own attainment,
asked about learning the Path to Liberation.
The Elder Nun Dhammadinnā understanding that the devotee had only reached the state up to the Fruit of Non-Returner,
thinking: ‘Now he is going beyond his own state and running on,’ stopping him,
° said: “You are not able to grasp, friend Visākha, answers to questions that are beyond your limits,
like immersion in Nibbāna, friend Visākha,
the spiritual life that ends in Nibbāna, that has a conclusion in Nibbāna.
Desiring this, friend Visākha,
approach the Fortunate One and you can ask him about this matter,
and just as the Fortunate One explains, so you should bear it in mind.”
Visākha went into the presence of the Teacher and told him the questions and answers (that had been given).
The Teacher listened to his words,
and saying: “My daughter has no craving for past, future or present constituents,”
spoke this verse found in the Dhammapada:
Then having given approval to Dhammadinnā, he said this to the devotee Visākha:
“Wise, Visākha, is the nun Dhammadinnā,
having great wisdom, Visākha, is the nun Dhammadinnā,
if you were to ask me, Visākha, the same matter,
I would answer it in the same way,
in the same way as the nun Dhammadinnā has answered,
for this is indeed the meaning, and so should you bear it in mind.”
Thus did the story unfold.
Later as the Teacher was sitting in Jeta’s Wood,
as he was assigning the places of the nuns in order,
regarding this Small (Discourse giving an) Elaboration,
he placed this Elder Nun in the foremost position in the Dispensation amongst those who talked about Dhamma.
Translation
In the tenth (story), “Amongst those who (have knowledge of) their former lives,”
it shows why, amongst those who could recollect the succession of the great mass of former lives,
the Elder Nun Bhaddā Kāpilānī was said to be foremost.
At the time of the Buddha Padumuttara, it seems,
she was reborn in a good family home in Haṁsavatī,
and while listening to the Teacher teach the Dhamma,
° seeing the Teacher place a certain nun
as being foremost amongst those who recollect their former lives,
she did a great deed and aspired for that position herself.
After being reborn amongst gods and humans (only) for one hundred thousand aeons,
when there was no Buddha arisen, after being conceived in a good family home in Sāvatthī,
during a quarrel with her brother’s wife,
when (the sister) gave alms food to an Independent Buddha,
thinking: “After giving alms food to him, she has him under her control,”
she grabbed the bowl from the Independent Buddha’s hand,
threw away the food, filled it with mud and gave (it back).
The people said: “She is a fool,” and blamed her,
° saying: “You had a quarrel with her, but did nothing to her,
what offence has the Independent Buddha done to you?”
Feeling shame at these words, she took the bowl again,
emptied the mud, washed and scrubbed it with fragrant soap powder,
filled it with the four sweet things,
and sprinkling it with ghee shining the colour of a lotus calyx,
placed it in the hand of the Independent Buddha,
saying: “Just as this alms food shines forth, so may my body shine forth.”
She established this aspiration.
And everything should be understood as it has been related in the Elder Mahā Kassapa’s story.
...after our Teacher had arisen in the world,
and had Set Rolling the Noble Wheel of the Dhamma, he gradually entered Rājagaha.
While the Teacher was dwelling there, this young brāhmaṇa Pippali,
in the Magadha country, in the brāhmaṇa village called Great Ford,
was reborn in the brāhmaṇa Kapila’s Queen’s womb.
And Bhaddā Kāpilānī, in the Madda country, in the Sāgala town,
was reborn in the brāhmaṇa Kosiya’s Queen’s womb.
Gradually they both grew up,
and when the young brāhmaṇa Pippali was twenty years old, and Bhaddā had come to sixteen,
his Mother and Father, after examining their son,
said: “Dear, you are now mature,
you should keep up the family lineage,”
The young brāhmaṇa said: “It is not suitable to talk such talk in my ear,
as long as you last I will look after you,
but after you have departed, I will go forth.”
After a few days had passed they spoke again, and again he refused.
Again they spoke, again he refused.
From then on his Mother spoke incessantly about it.
The young brāhmaṇa, thinking: ‘I must convince my Mother,’
gave a thousand coins of red gold,
had a woman’s form made by the goldsmiths,
and at the end of the work he rubbed and polished it and so on,
dressed it in red clothes,
had it adorned with various ornaments and colourful flowers,
summoned his Mother and said:
“Mother, finding someone of such a form I will live in a household,
but not finding her I will not live (there).”
The wise brāhmaṇī thought:
“My meritorious son must have formed a resolution and given gifts,
he wasn’t making merit by himself alone,
surely there will be a woman whom he made merit with who is like this golden statue.”
She summoned eight brāhmaṇas and satisfied them with all they wished for,
and mounted the golden statue on a chariot,
saying: “Go, Dears, and wherever there is a family similar to ours in birth, lineage and wealth,
look for a girl who is like this golden statue,
and after making a present, give it (to her),” and she sent them off.
They (thought): ‘This is our work,’ and departed,
they went to the Madda country and to the Sāgala town.
They set up the golden statue there at the bathing ghat and sat down on one side.
Then Bhaddā’s nurse washed and decorated Bhaddā and made her sit in the royal bed chamber,
and while going to bathe, she saw the statue,
and thinking: ‘The Noble Lady has come here,’ she made a threatening gesture,
saying: “Why are you so obstinate as to come here?” and lifting up her hand threateningly,
she said: “Go (back) quickly!” and slapped it on the side.
Her hand trembled like she had struck a rock.
Stepping back, she said: “It is so hard!”
Seeing her stiff neck, thinking: ‘My Noble Lady,’ she made a gesture,
and said: “This is inappropriate for a Noble Lady who is dressed by me!”
Then those men surrounded her and asked: “Is your Master’s daughter like this?”
“Why this is as lovely as my Noble Lady, who has a hundred, even a thousand, virtues,
there is nothing that can hold a candle to her when she is sat in her twelve-cubit chamber,
the radiance of her body destroys the darkness!”
“Then come,” and they took the offering, mounted the golden statue on a chariot,
and stopped at the gate of the house of the brāhmaṇa of the Kosiya clan and announced their coming.
The brāhmaṇa received them well and asked: “From where did you come?”
“From the house of the brāhmaṇa Kapila in the Great Ford village in the Magadha country.”
“For what reason have you come?”
“For this reason,” (and they explained).
“It is good, Dears, this brāhmaṇa has the same birth, lineage and wealth as us,
we will give (him) the girl,” and he received the bride-gift.
They sent a message to the brāhmaṇa Kapila,
saying: “Having found the girl, please do what should be done.”
After hearing the message, they informed the young brāhmaṇa Pippali,
saying: “It seems the girl has been found.”
The young brāhmaṇa (reflecting): ‘I thought they will not find (her), and now they say she is found.
Misfortune has arisen, I will send her a letter,’
and having gone into seclusion he wrote a letter.
“Bhaddā should gain a household life suitable to her birth, lineage and wealth,
(but) having renounced, I will go forth, do not regret it later.”
Bhaddā also, having heard: “It seems they desire to give me to such and such,”
went into seclusion and wrote a letter.
“The Noble Sir should gain a household life suitable to his birth, lineage and wealth,
(but) having renounced, I will go forth, do not regret it later.”
The two letter bearers met on the highway.
“Whose letter is this?”
“The young brāhmaṇa Pippali send it to Bhaddā.”
“This is whose letter?”
“Bhaddā sent it to the young brāhmaṇa Pippali,” and after saying that and reading (the letters),
saying: “Look at the children’s deeds!”
they tore them up and threw them away in the wilderness,
wrote similar letters, and sent them from here and there.
Thus neither (Pippali nor Bhaddā) wished there to be a meeting.
The day (they married) the young brāhmaṇa took a garland of flowers and set it up.
Bhaddā also set (one up) in the middle of the bed.
Having enjoyed supper they both thought: ‘We will go up and lie down,’ and having met (in the bedroom),
the young brāhmaṇa went up and lay down on his right side,
and Bhaddā after laying down on her left side, said:
“On whichever side the flowers fade we will know that a lustful thought arose to the one (on that side),
you should not come near this garland of flowers.”
Through fear of their bodies coming into contact with each other
they passed the time without falling asleep during the three watches of the night
and during the day there was no laughter.
For as long as their Mothers and Fathers continued they were unaffected by material life in this world,
and they did not manage the family estates, but with their passing, they had to manage them.
The young brāhmaṇa Pippali was very wealthy, having eight hundred and seventy million.
The golden powder that was thrown away after bathing his body for one day,
was enough for twelve measures by the Magadha measure.
There were at least sixty reservoirs with irrigation machines,
his workplace was twelve leagues, there were fourteen Anurādhapura-sized villages,
fourteen elephant armies, fourteen horse armies and fourteen chariot armies.
One day, after mounting a decorated horse
and going to work surrounded by the populace,
standing at the top of ten million fields that were being broken by the plough,
and having seen the birds, beginning with the crows, digging up and eating the earth worms, and insects and so on,
he asked: “Dear, what are they eating?”
“Earth worms, Noble Sir.”
“Who (pays) for the wickedness done by these (birds)?”
“You do, Noble Sir.”
He thought: ‘If mine is (the result) for the wickedness done by these,
what will I do with eight hundred and seventy million,
what use is a workplace of twelve leagues,
what use sixty reservoirs with irrigation machines,
what use fourteen villages?
Having given everything over to Bhaddā Kāpilānī I will renounce and go forth.’
Bhaddā Kāpilānī at that time,
three pots of sesame seeds having being sown over the inner fields,
was sitting surrounded by her helpers, and saw crows eating the worms (that dwelt) in the sesame,
and asked: “Lady, what are they eating?”
“Worms, Noble Lady.”
“Whose is the unwholesome (result)?”
“Yours, Noble Lady.”
She thought:
’Four cubit of clothes and a mere measure of milk-rice is enough for me,
but if the unwholesome (deeds) done by this many people is mine,
it is certainly not possible to lift my head from the round (of births and deaths) through a thousand rebirths,
having given everything over to the Noble Sir as soon as he returns,
I will renounce and go forth.’
The young brāhmaṇa returned after bathing, ascended the mansion and sat down on an expensive couch.
They prepared a meal for him suitable for a Universal Monarch.
After they both had eaten, and with the departure of the attendants, they sat down on a comfortable spot in seclusion.
Then the young brāhmaṇa said this to Bhaddā:
“Bhaddā, when coming to this house how much wealth did you bring?”
“Fifty-five thousand carts, Noble Sir.”
° “There is all this wealth, plus eight hundred and seventy million,
and sixty reservoirs with irrigation machines and so on,
I give all of this over to you.”
“But where will you go, Noble Sir?”
“I will go forth.”
“Noble Sir, I also have been sitting here waiting for your coming,
I also will go forth.”
The three states of continuation
They had their clothes died yellow with astringents and clay bowls brought from the market,
shaved off each others’ hair,
saying: “Our going forth is on account of those who are Liberated in the world,”
and depositing their bowls in their bags, and slinging them over the shoulder, they descended from the palace.
No one from the home, whether servants or workers, recognised them.
Then, having departed from the brāhmaṇa village, while going through the entrance to the servants’ village,
they were recognised by those living in the servants’ village by their gait and deportment.
Throwing themselves at their feet crying, they said: “Noble Ones, why do you leave us helpless?”
° After saying: “We, friends, (having seen) that the three states of continuation are like three leaf-huts that are burning, are going forth,
if we were to make you freemen one by one, it would not be possible with one hundred years (you are so many),
after washing each other’s heads,
and leaving them crying they went away.
The Elder, as he was going along in front, after stopping and looking,
thought: ‘This Bhaddā Kāpilānī, who is worth more than all the women in the Rose-Apple Isle,
is coming along behind me.
But there may be a reason for someone to think thus:
‘Having gone forth they are not able to live apart, but that is unsuitable (for them).’
If someone defiled their minds in this way, they might (risk) filling up the lower worlds,
after abandoning her, it is right to go off by myself,’ (this) thought arose.
While going forward he saw a junction in the path and stood at its head.
Bhaddā came and worshipped and also stood there.
Then he said to her: “Bhaddā, having seen such a woman as you following me,
and thinking: ‘Having gone forth they are not able to live apart,’
through us the people may defile their minds, and might fill up the lower worlds,
(therefore) at this junction you take one (road), and I will go by another.”
“Yes, Noble Sir, for those gone forth, women are known as a stain,
thinking: ‘Having gone forth these are not living apart,’ they will make the fault ours,
you take one path, I will take another, and we will live apart.”
After reverentially circumambulating him three times,
worshipping with the five-fold prostration on all four sides,
extending a reverential salutation with the ten fingernails joined together,
° saying: “Our friendship and fellowship that ran over a measure of one hundred thousand aeons
is broken today,”
and “You are known as one belonging to the right, the right path is suitable for you,
I am a woman belonging to the left, the left path is suitable for me,”
after worshipping, she entered the (left) path.
At the time of this juncture the great earth,
° as though saying: “This universe with its mountains and Mount Sineru I am able to bear,
but your virtue I am unable to bear,” quaked with a roar,
which spread like thunderstorms in the sky, and the mountain (at the centre of the) universe resounded.
But the Elder Mahā Kassapa, after taking the right hand road,
went into the One of Ten Power’s presence at the root of the Many Sons’ Banyan Tree (shrine),
while Bhaddā Kāpilānī, after taking the left hand road,
because there wasn’t (yet) permission for women to go forth, went to the Wandering Nuns’ monastery.
But when Mahāpajāpatī Gotamī received the going forth,
then that Elder,
later, while working at insight meditation,
attained Liberation and became one who had mastered the knowledge of former lives.
Then after the Teacher had sat down in Jeta’s Wood, as he was assigning the places of the nuns in order,
he placed this Elder Nun in the foremost position amongst those who recollect their former lives.
Translation
And how, monks, are the Four Ways of Attending to Mindfulness developed?
How, when made much of, do they fulfil the Seven Factors of Awakening?
Monks, a monk who, at whatever time, dwells contemplating (the nature of) the body in the body,
ardent, fully aware, and mindful, after removing avarice and sorrow regarding the world,
at that time has mindfulness established and he is not forgetful,
and monks, at whatever time
a monk’s mindfulness is established and he is not forgetful,
at that time the Mindfulness Factor of Complete Awakening has been undertaken for that monk,
at that time that monk is developing the Mindfulness Factor of Complete Awakening,
at that time that monk’s Mindfulness Factor of Complete Awakening
is developing and heading towards fulfilment.
Living mindfully in this way he investigates that state with wisdom,
examining and entering into a deep enquiry (into it),
and monks, at whatever time
a monk living mindfully in this way investigates that state with wisdom,
examining and entering into a deep enquiry (into it),
at that time the Investigation (of the Nature) of Things Factor of Complete Awakening has been undertaken for that monk,
at that time that monk is developing the Investigation (of the Nature) of Things Factor of Complete Awakening,
at that time that monk’s Investigation (of the Nature) of Things Factor of Complete Awakening
is developing and heading towards fulfilment.
For he who is investigating that state with wisdom,
examining and entering into a deep enquiry (into it),
there is an undertaking of unshaken energy,
and monks, at whatever time
for a monk investigating that state with wisdom,
examining and entering into a deep enquiry (into it),
there is an undertaking of unshaken energy,
at that time the Energy Factor of Complete Awakening has been undertaken for that monk,
at that time that monk is developing the Energy Factor of Complete Awakening,
at that time that monk’s Energy Factor of Complete Awakening
is developing and heading towards fulfilment.
For he who has undertaken energy spiritual joy arises,
and monks, at whatever time
for a monk who has undertaken energy spiritual joy arises,
at that time the Joy Factor of Complete Awakening has been undertaken for that monk,
at that time that monk is developing the Joy Factor of Complete Awakening,
at that time that monk’s Joy Factor of Complete Awakening
is developing and heading towards fulfilment.
For one who has a joyful mind the body is tranquil, and the mind is tranquil,
and monks, at whatever time
a monk has a joyful mind and a body that is tranquil, and a mind that is tranquil,
at that time the Tranquility Factor of Complete Awakening has been undertaken for that monk,
at that time that monk is developing the Tranquility Factor of Complete Awakening,
at that time that monk’s Tranquility Factor of Complete Awakening
is developing and heading towards fulfilment.
For one with a tranquil body and happiness his mind becomes concentrated,
and monks, at whatever time
a monk has a tranquil body and happiness and a mind that becomes concentrated,
at that time the Concentration Factor of Complete Awakening has been undertaken for that monk,
at that time that monk is developing the Concentration Factor of Complete Awakening,
at that time that monk’s Concentration Factor of Complete Awakening
is developing and heading towards fulfilment.
He who has a well-concentrated mind in this way becomes completely equanimous,
and monks, at whatever time
a monk’s well-concentrated mind in this way becomes completely equanimous,
at that time the Equanimity Factor of Complete Awakening has been undertaken for that monk,
at that time that monk is developing the Equanimity Factor of Complete Awakening,
at that time that monk’s Equanimity Factor of Complete Awakening
is developing and heading towards fulfilment.
Monks, there are monks in this Community of monks
who live engaged in and devoted to the development of the meditation of mindfulness while breathing.
Mindfulness while breathing, monks, when it has been developed and made much of yields great fruit and brings great advantages.
Mindfulness while breathing, monks, when it has been developed and made much of fulfils the Four Ways of Attending to Mindfulness,
the Four Ways of Attending to Mindfulness when they have been developed and made much of fulfil the Seven Factors of Awakening,
the Seven Factors of Awakening when they have been developed and made much of fulfil Knowledge and Freedom.
And how, monks, is mindfulness while breathing developed?
How, when it has been made much of, does it yield great fruit and bring great advantages?
Here,
or to an empty place, sits down.
After folding his legs crosswise, setting his body straight,
and establishing mindfulness at the front,
ever mindful he breathes in, mindful he breathes out.
While breathing in long, he knows “I am breathing in long”,
while breathing out long, he knows “I am breathing out long”,
while breathing in short, he knows “I am breathing in short”,
while breathing out short, he knows “I am breathing out short”,
he trains like this: experiencing the whole body I will breathe in,
he trains like this: experiencing the whole body I will breathe out,
he trains like this: making the bodily process calm I will breathe in,
he trains like this: making the bodily process calm I will breathe out.
He trains like this: experiencing joy I will breathe in,
he trains like this: experiencing joy I will breathe out,
he trains like this: experiencing pleasure I will breathe in,
he trains like this: experiencing pleasure I will breathe out,
he trains like this: experiencing the mental process I will breathe in,
he trains like this: experiencing the mental process I will breathe out,
he trains like this: making the mental process calm I will breathe in,
he trains like this: making the mental process calm I will breathe out.
He trains like this: experiencing the mind I will breathe in,
he trains like this: experiencing the mind I will breathe out,
he trains like this: gladdening the mind I will breathe in,
he trains like this: gladdening the mind I will breathe out,
he trains like this: concentrating the mind I will breathe in,
he trains like this: concentrating the mind I will breathe out,
he trains like this: freeing the mind I will breathe in,
he trains like this: freeing the mind I will breathe out.
He trains like this: contemplating impermanence I will breathe in,
he trains like this: contemplating impermanence I will breathe out,
he trains like this: contemplating dispassion I will breathe in,
he trains like this: contemplating dispassion I will breathe out,
he trains like this: contemplating cessation I will breathe in,
he trains like this: contemplating cessation I will breathe out,
he trains like this: contemplating letting go I will breathe in,
he trains like this: contemplating letting go I will breathe out.
Like this, monks, is mindfulness while breathing developed.
Like this, when it has been made much of, it yields great fruit and brings great advantages.
at one time the Fortunate One was dwelling near Sāvatthī
at Migāra’s Mother’s mansion in the Eastern Grounds,
together with a great many very well-known Elder Disciples
(such as) with venerable Sāriputta, with venerable Mahāmoggallāna,
with venerable Mahākassapa, with venerable Mahākaccāyana,
with venerable Mahākoṭṭhita, with venerable Mahākappina,
with venerable Mahācunda, with venerable Anuruddha,
with venerable Revata, with venerable Ānanda,
together with other very well-known Elder Disciples.
Then at that time the Elder monks were advising and instructing the new monks.
Some Elder monks were advising and instructing ten monks,
some Elder monks were advising and instructing twenty monks,
some Elder monks were advising and instructing thirty monks,
some Elder monks were advising and instructing forty monks,
and while those new monks were being advised and instructed by the Elder monks
they came to know successive lofty attainments.
Then at that time the Fortunate One, on that very Uposatha day of the fifteenth,
on the Pavāraṇā full moon night,
was sat in the open air surrounded by the Community of monks.
after seeing the community of monks were maintaining complete silence, addressed the monks (saying):
“I am satisfied,
my mind is satisfied with this practice,
therefore, monks, put forth even more energy
for the attainment of the unattained, for the accomplishment of the unaccomplished, for the realisation of the unrealised,
I will be right here at Sāvatthī until the fourth month of Komudī comes.”
The monks in the country heard:
“The Fortunate One will be right there at Sāvatthī until the fourth month of Komudī comes,”
and those monks in the country descended on Sāvatthī to see the Fortunate One.
Those Elder monks put forth even more energy advising and instructing the new monks,
some Elder monks were advising and instructing ten monks,
some Elder monks were advising and instructing twenty monks,
some Elder monks were advising and instructing thirty monks,
some Elder monks were advising and instructing forty monks,
and while those new monks were being advised and instructed by the Elder monks
they came to know (even more) successive lofty attainments.
Then at that time the Fortunate One, on that very Uposatha day of the fifteenth,
on the Komudī full moon night at the end of four months,
was sat in the open air surrounded by the Community of monks.
after seeing the community of monks were maintaining complete silence, addressed the monks (saying):
“The assembly, monks, is without frivolous speech; the assembly, monks, is free from frivolous speech,
it is solely established in the essential.
Such, monks, is this Community of monks, such, monks, is this assembly,
and the assembly is worthy of offerings, of hospitality, of gifts, and of reverential salutation,
it is an unsurpassed field of merit for the world.
Such, monks, is this Community of monks, such, monks, is this assembly,
and giving a little gift to the assembly produces a great amount (of merit),
and a great gift (produces) an even greater amount.
Such, monks, is this Community of monks, such, monks, is this assembly,
and the assembly is rare to see in the world.
Such, monks, is this Community of monks, such, monks, is this assembly,
and it is suitable to go many leagues, even with a bag of provisions, to see this assembly.
Monks, there are monks in this Community of monks
who are Worthy, without pollutants, who have done what ought to be done,
who have put down the burden, reached their goal,
destroyed the fetters that lead to continuation (of existence), who through final knowledge are free:
monks, there are such monks in this Community of monks.
Monks, there are monks in this Community of monks
who, through the complete destruction of the five lower fetters,
will arisen spontaneously (in the Brahmā worlds), and will attain Final Emancipation there, without returning from that world:
monks, there are such monks in this Community of monks.
Monks, there are monks in this Community of monks
who, through the complete destruction of three fetters,
and the diminuation of passion, hatred, and delusion,
are Once-Returners, and will return only once more to this world, and (then) will make an end to suffering:
monks, there are such monks in this Community of monks.
Monks, there are monks in this Community of monks
who, through the complete destruction of three fetters,
are Stream-Enterers, no longer subject to falling (into the lower realms), and have a fixed destiny ending in Final Awakening:
monks, there are such monks in this Community of monks.
Monks, there are monks in this Community of monks
who live engaged in and devoted to the development of the Four Ways of Attending to Mindfulness:
monks, there are such monks in this Community of monks.
Monks, there are monks in this Community of monks
who live engaged in and devoted to the development of the Four Right Strivings:
monks, there are such monks in this Community of monks.
Monks, there are monks in this Community of monks
who live engaged in and devoted to the development of the Four Paths to Power:
monks, there are such monks in this Community of monks.
Monks, there are monks in this Community of monks
who live engaged in and devoted to the development of the Five Faculties:
monks, there are such monks in this Community of monks.
Monks, there are monks in this Community of monks
who live engaged in and devoted to the development of the Five Strengths:
monks, there are such monks in this Community of monks.
Monks, there are monks in this Community of monks
who live engaged in and devoted to the development of the Seven Factors of Awakening:
monks, there are such monks in this Community of monks.
Monks, there are monks in this Community of monks
who live engaged in and devoted to the development of the Noble Eight-Fold Path:
monks, there are such monks in this Community of monks.
Monks, there are monks in this Community of monks
who live engaged in and devoted to the development of the meditation that is friendliness:
monks, there are such monks in this Community of monks.
Monks, there are monks in this Community of monks
who live engaged in and devoted to the development of the meditation that is kindness:
monks, there are such monks in this Community of monks.
Monks, there are monks in this Community of monks
who live engaged in and devoted to the development of the meditation that is gladness:
monks, there are such monks in this Community of monks.
Monks, there are monks in this Community of monks
who live engaged in and devoted to the development of the meditation that is equanimity:
monks, there are such monks in this Community of monks.
Monks, there are monks in this Community of monks
who live engaged in and devoted to the development of the meditation on the unattractive:
monks, there are such monks in this Community of monks.
Monks, there are monks in this Community of monks
who live engaged in and devoted to the development of the meditation that is the perception of impermanence:
monks, there are such monks in this Community of monks.
Monks, a monk who, at whatever time,
dwells contemplating (the nature of) the mind in the mind,
ardent, fully aware, and mindful, after removing avarice and sorrow regarding the world,
at that time has mindfulness established and he is not forgetful,
and monks, at whatever time
a monk’s mindfulness is established and he is not forgetful,
at that time the Mindfulness Factor of Complete Awakening has been undertaken for that monk,
at that time that monk is developing the Mindfulness Factor of Complete Awakening,
at that time that monk’s Mindfulness Factor of Complete Awakening
is developing and heading towards fulfilment.
Living mindfully in this way he investigates that state with wisdom,
examining and entering into a deep enquiry (into it),
and monks, at whatever time
a monk living mindfully in this way investigates that state with wisdom,
examining and entering into a deep enquiry (into it),
at that time the Investigation (of the Nature) of Things Factor of Complete Awakening has been undertaken for that monk,
at that time that monk is developing the Investigation (of the Nature) of Things Factor of Complete Awakening,
at that time that monk’s Investigation (of the Nature) of Things Factor of Complete Awakening
is developing and heading towards fulfilment.
For he who is investigating that state with wisdom,
examining and entering into a deep enquiry (into it),
there is an undertaking of unshaken energy,
and monks, at whatever time
for a monk investigating that state with wisdom,
examining and entering into a deep enquiry (into it),
there is an undertaking of unshaken energy,
at that time the Energy Factor of Complete Awakening has been undertaken for that monk,
at that time that monk is developing the Energy Factor of Complete Awakening,
at that time that monk’s Energy Factor of Complete Awakening
is developing and heading towards fulfilment.
For he who has undertaken energy spiritual joy arises,
and monks, at whatever time
for a monk who has undertaken energy spiritual joy arises,
at that time the Joy Factor of Complete Awakening has been undertaken for that monk,
at that time that monk is developing the Joy Factor of Complete Awakening,
at that time that monk’s Joy Factor of Complete Awakening
is developing and heading towards fulfilment.
For one who has a joyful mind the body is tranquil, and the mind is tranquil,
and monks, at whatever time
a monk has a joyful mind and a body that is tranquil, and a mind that is tranquil,
at that time the Tranquility Factor of Complete Awakening has been undertaken for that monk,
at that time that monk is developing the Tranquility Factor of Complete Awakening,
at that time that monk’s Tranquility Factor of Complete Awakening
is developing and heading towards fulfilment.
For one with a tranquil body and happiness his mind becomes concentrated,
and monks, at whatever time
a monk has a tranquil body and happiness and a mind that becomes concentrated,
at that time the Concentration Factor of Complete Awakening has been undertaken for that monk,
at that time that monk is developing the Concentration Factor of Complete Awakening,
at that time that monk’s Concentration Factor of Complete Awakening
is developing and heading towards fulfilment.
He who has a well-concentrated mind in this way becomes completely equanimous,
and monks, at whatever time
a monk’s well-concentrated mind in this way becomes completely equanimous,
at that time the Equanimity Factor of Complete Awakening has been undertaken for that monk,
at that time that monk is developing the Equanimity Factor of Complete Awakening,
at that time that monk’s Equanimity Factor of Complete Awakening
is developing and heading towards fulfilment.
How, monks, are the Seven Factors of Awakening developed?
How, when made much of, do they fulfil Knowledge and Freedom?
Here, monks, a monk develops the Mindfulness Factor of Complete Awakening
depending on solitude,
develops the Investigation (of the Nature) of Things Factor of Complete Awakening
depending on solitude, depending on dispassion, depending on cessation, maturing in relinquishment,
develops the Energy Factor of Complete Awakening
depending on solitude, depending on dispassion, depending on cessation, maturing in relinquishment,
develops the Joy Factor of Complete Awakening
depending on solitude, depending on dispassion, depending on cessation, maturing in relinquishment,
develops the Tranquillity Factor of Complete Awakening
depending on solitude, depending on dispassion, depending on cessation, maturing in relinquishment,
develops the Concentration Factor of Complete Awakening
depending on solitude, depending on dispassion, depending on cessation, maturing in relinquishment,
develops the Equanimity Factor of Complete Awakening
depending on solitude, depending on dispassion, depending on cessation, maturing in relinquishment.
Like this, monks, the Seven Factors of Awakening are developed.
Like this, when made much of, they fulfil Knowledge and Freedom.”
and those monks were uplifted and greatly rejoiced in what was said by the Fortunate One.
Monks, a monk who, at whatever time,
dwells contemplating (the nature of) the feelings in the feelings,
ardent, fully aware, and mindful, after removing avarice and sorrow regarding the world,
at that time has mindfulness established and he is not forgetful,
and monks, at whatever time
a monk’s mindfulness is established and he is not forgetful,
at that time the Mindfulness Factor of Complete Awakening has been undertaken for that monk,
at that time that monk is developing the Mindfulness Factor of Complete Awakening,
at that time that monk’s Mindfulness Factor of Complete Awakening
is developing and heading towards fulfilment.
Living mindfully in this way he investigates that state with wisdom,
examining and entering into a deep enquiry (into it),
and monks, at whatever time
a monk living mindfully in this way investigates that state with wisdom,
examining and entering into a deep enquiry (into it),
at that time the Investigation (of the Nature) of Things Factor of Complete Awakening has been undertaken for that monk,
at that time that monk is developing the Investigation (of the Nature) of Things Factor of Complete Awakening,
at that time that monk’s Investigation (of the Nature) of Things Factor of Complete Awakening
is developing and heading towards fulfilment.
For he who is investigating that state with wisdom,
examining and entering into a deep enquiry (into it),
there is an undertaking of unshaken energy,
and monks, at whatever time
for a monk investigating that state with wisdom,
examining and entering into a deep enquiry (into it),
there is an undertaking of unshaken energy,
at that time the Energy Factor of Complete Awakening has been undertaken for that monk,
at that time that monk is developing the Energy Factor of Complete Awakening,
at that time that monk’s Energy Factor of Complete Awakening
is developing and heading towards fulfilment.
For he who has undertaken energy spiritual joy arises,
and monks, at whatever time
for a monk who has undertaken energy spiritual joy arises,
at that time the Joy Factor of Complete Awakening has been undertaken for that monk,
at that time that monk is developing the Joy Factor of Complete Awakening,
at that time that monk’s Joy Factor of Complete Awakening
is developing and heading towards fulfilment.
For one who has a joyful mind the body is tranquil, and the mind is tranquil,
and monks, at whatever time
a monk has a joyful mind and a body that is tranquil, and a mind that is tranquil,
at that time the Tranquility Factor of Complete Awakening has been undertaken for that monk,
at that time that monk is developing the Tranquility Factor of Complete Awakening,
at that time that monk’s Tranquility Factor of Complete Awakening
is developing and heading towards fulfilment.
For one with a tranquil body and happiness his mind becomes concentrated,
and monks, at whatever time
a monk has a tranquil body and happiness and a mind that becomes concentrated,
at that time the Concentration Factor of Complete Awakening has been undertaken for that monk,
at that time that monk is developing the Concentration Factor of Complete Awakening,
at that time that monk’s Concentration Factor of Complete Awakening
is developing and heading towards fulfilment.
He who has a well-concentrated mind in this way becomes completely equanimous,
and monks, at whatever time
a monk’s well-concentrated mind in this way becomes completely equanimous,
at that time the Equanimity Factor of Complete Awakening has been undertaken for that monk,
at that time that monk is developing the Equanimity Factor of Complete Awakening,
at that time that monk’s Equanimity Factor of Complete Awakening
is developing and heading towards fulfilment.
Monks, a monk who, at whatever time,
dwells contemplating (the nature of) things in (various) things,
ardent, fully aware, and mindful, after removing avarice and sorrow regarding the world,
at that time has mindfulness established and he is not forgetful,
and monks, at whatever time
a monk’s mindfulness is established and he is not forgetful,
at that time the Mindfulness Factor of Complete Awakening has been undertaken for that monk,
at that time that monk is developing the Mindfulness Factor of Complete Awakening,
at that time that monk’s Mindfulness Factor of Complete Awakening
is developing and heading towards fulfilment.
Living mindfully in this way he investigates that state with wisdom,
examining and entering into a deep enquiry (into it),
and monks, at whatever time
a monk living mindfully in this way investigates that state with wisdom,
examining and entering into a deep enquiry (into it),
at that time the Investigation (of the Nature) of Things Factor of Complete Awakening has been undertaken for that monk,
at that time that monk is developing the Investigation (of the Nature) of Things Factor of Complete Awakening,
at that time that monk’s Investigation (of the Nature) of Things Factor of Complete Awakening
is developing and heading towards fulfilment.
For he who is investigating that state with wisdom,
examining and entering into a deep enquiry (into it),
there is an undertaking of unshaken energy,
and monks, at whatever time
for a monk investigating that state with wisdom,
examining and entering into a deep enquiry (into it),
there is an undertaking of unshaken energy,
at that time the Energy Factor of Complete Awakening has been undertaken for that monk,
at that time that monk is developing the Energy Factor of Complete Awakening,
at that time that monk’s Energy Factor of Complete Awakening
is developing and heading towards fulfilment.
For he who has undertaken energy spiritual joy arises,
and monks, at whatever time
for a monk who has undertaken energy spiritual joy arises,
at that time the Joy Factor of Complete Awakening has been undertaken for that monk,
at that time that monk is developing the Joy Factor of Complete Awakening,
at that time that monk’s Joy Factor of Complete Awakening
is developing and heading towards fulfilment.
For one who has a joyful mind the body is tranquil, and the mind is tranquil,
and monks, at whatever time
a monk has a joyful mind and a body that is tranquil, and a mind that is tranquil,
at that time the Tranquility Factor of Complete Awakening has been undertaken for that monk,
at that time that monk is developing the Tranquility Factor of Complete Awakening,
at that time that monk’s Tranquility Factor of Complete Awakening
is developing and heading towards fulfilment.
For one with a tranquil body and happiness his mind becomes concentrated,
and monks, at whatever time
a monk has a tranquil body and happiness and a mind that becomes concentrated,
at that time the Concentration Factor of Complete Awakening has been undertaken for that monk,
at that time that monk is developing the Concentration Factor of Complete Awakening,
at that time that monk’s Concentration Factor of Complete Awakening
is developing and heading towards fulfilment.
He who has a well-concentrated mind in this way becomes completely equanimous,
and monks, at whatever time
a monk’s well-concentrated mind in this way becomes completely equanimous,
at that time the Equanimity Factor of Complete Awakening has been undertaken for that monk,
at that time that monk is developing the Equanimity Factor of Complete Awakening,
at that time that monk’s Equanimity Factor of Complete Awakening
is developing and heading towards fulfilment.
Like this, monks, the Four Ways of Attending to Mindfulness are developed.
Like this, when made much of, they fulfil the Seven Factors of Awakening.
And how, monks, is mindfulness while breathing developed?
How, when made much of, does it fulfil the Four Ways of Attending to Mindfulness?
Monks, a monk who, at whatever time,
while breathing in long, knows “I am breathing in long”,
while breathing out long, knows “I am breathing out long”,
while breathing in short, knows “I am breathing in short”,
while breathing out short, knows “I am breathing out short”,
trains like this: experiencing the whole body I will breathe in,
trains like this: experiencing the whole body I will breathe out,
trains like this: making the bodily process calm I will breathe in,
trains like this: making the bodily process calm I will breathe out,
at that time, monks, a monk lives contemplating (the nature of) the body in the body,
ardent, fully aware, and mindful, after removing avarice and sorrow regarding the world.
I say, monks, that this is a certain kind of body amongst the bodies, namely: breathing,
therefore, monks, at that time a monk lives contemplating (the nature of) the body in the body,
ardent, fully aware, and mindful, after removing avarice and sorrow regarding the world.
Monks, a monk who, at whatever time,
trains like this: experiencing joy I will breathe in,
trains like this: experiencing joy I will breathe out,
trains like this: experiencing pleasure I will breathe in,
trains like this: experiencing pleasure I will breathe out,
trains like this: experiencing the mental process I will breathe in,
trains like this: experiencing the mental process I will breathe out,
trains like this: making the mental process calm I will breathe in,
trains like this: making the mental process calm I will breathe out,
at that time, monks, a monk lives contemplating (the nature of) the feelings in feelings,
ardent, fully aware, and mindful, after removing avarice and sorrow regarding the world.
I say, monks, that this is a certain feeling amongst the feelings, namely:
applying the mind well to the breathing,
therefore, monks, at that time a monk lives contemplating (the nature of) the feelings in the feelings,
ardent, fully aware, and mindful, after removing avarice and sorrow regarding the world.
Monks, a monk who, at whatever time,
trains like this: experiencing the mind I will breathe in,
trains like this: experiencing the mind I will breathe out,
trains like this: gladdening the mind I will breathe in,
trains like this: gladdening the mind I will breathe out,
trains like this: concentrating the mind I will breathe in,
trains like this: concentrating the mind I will breathe out,
trains like this: freeing the mind I will breathe in,
trains like this: freeing the mind I will breathe out,
at that time, monks, a monk lives contemplating (the nature of) the mind in the mind,
ardent, fully aware, and mindful, after removing avarice and sorrow regarding the world.
I do not say, monks, of one who has lost mindfulness, who does not have full knowledge, that he has developed mindfulness of breathing,
therefore, monks, at that time a monk lives contemplating (the nature of) the mind in the mind,
ardent, fully aware, and mindful, after removing avarice and sorrow regarding the world.
Monks, a monk who, at whatever time,
trains like this: contemplating impermanence I will breathe in,
trains like this: contemplating impermanence I will breathe out,
trains like this: contemplating dispassion I will breathe in,
trains like this: contemplating dispassion I will breathe out,
trains like this: contemplating cessation I will breathe in,
trains like this: contemplating cessation I will breathe out,
trains like this: contemplating letting go I will breathe in,
trains like this: contemplating letting go I will breathe out,
at that time, monks, a monk lives contemplating (the nature of) things in (various) things,
ardent, fully aware, and mindful, after removing avarice and sorrow regarding the world.
Having seen with wisdom the giving up of whatever avarice and sorrow there is,
he is completely equanimous,
therefore, monks, at that time a monk lives contemplating (the nature of) things in (various) things,
ardent, fully aware, and mindful, after removing avarice and sorrow regarding the world.
Like this, monks, mindfulness while breathing is developed.
Like this, when it has been made much of, it fulfils the Four Ways of Attending to Mindfulness.
Numbered Discourses
“Mendicants, I do not see a single thing that, when it’s not tamed, is so very harmful as the mind.
A wild mind is very harmful.”
“Mendicants, I do not see a single thing that, when it is tamed, is so very beneficial as the mind.
A tamed mind is very beneficial.”
“Mendicants, I do not see a single thing that, when it’s not guarded, is so very harmful as the mind.
An unguarded mind is very harmful.”
“Mendicants, I do not see a single thing that, when it is guarded, is so very beneficial as the mind.
A guarded mind is very beneficial.”
“Mendicants, I do not see a single thing that, when it’s not protected, is so very harmful as the mind.
An unprotected mind is very harmful.”
“Mendicants, I do not see a single thing that, when it is protected, is so very beneficial as the mind.
A protected mind is very beneficial.”
“Mendicants, I do not see a single thing that, when it’s not restrained, is so very harmful as the mind.
An unrestrained mind is very harmful.”
“Mendicants, I do not see a single thing that, when it is restrained, is so very beneficial as the mind.
A restrained mind is very beneficial.”
“Mendicants, I do not see a single thing that, when it is not tamed, guarded, protected, and restrained, is so very harmful as the mind.
An untamed, unguarded, unprotected, and unrestrained mind is very harmful.”
“Mendicants, I do not see a single thing that, when it is tamed, guarded, protected, and restrained, is so very beneficial as the mind.
A tamed, guarded, protected, and restrained mind is very beneficial.”
Numbered Discourses
“The foremost of my monk disciples in seniority is Aññākoṇḍañña.
… with great wisdom is Sāriputta.
… with psychic power is Mahāmoggallāna.
… who advocate austerities is Mahākassapa.
… with clairvoyance is Anuruddha.
… from eminent families is Bhaddiya Kāḷigodhāyaputta.
… with a charming voice is Lakuṇṭaka Bhaddiya.
… with a lion’s roar is Piṇḍolabhāradvāja.
… who speak on the teaching is Puṇṇa Mantāṇiputta.
… who explain in detail the meaning of a brief statement is Mahākaccāna.”
Numbered Discourses
Non-offense
“Mendicants, those mendicants who explain non-offense as an offense are acting for the hurt and unhappiness of the people, for the harm, hurt, and suffering of gods and humans.
They make much bad karma and make the true teaching disappear.”
“Mendicants, those mendicants who explain an offense as non-offense are acting for the hurt and unhappiness of the people, for the harm, hurt, and suffering of gods and humans.
Those mendicants make much bad karma and make the true teaching disappear.”
“Those mendicants who explain a light offense as a serious offense … a serious offense as a light offense … an offense committed with corrupt intention as an offense not committed with corrupt intention … an offense not committed with corrupt intention as an offense committed with corrupt intention … an offense requiring rehabilitation as an offense not requiring rehabilitation … an offense not requiring rehabilitation as an offense requiring rehabilitation … an offense with redress as an offense without redress … an offense without redress as an offense with redress are acting for the hurt and unhappiness of the people, for the harm, hurt, and suffering of gods and humans.
Those mendicants make much bad karma and make the true teaching disappear.”
“Mendicants, those mendicants who explain non-offense as non-offense are acting for the welfare and happiness of the people, for the benefit, welfare, and happiness of gods and humans.
They make much merit and make the true teaching continue.”
“Mendicants, those mendicants who explain an offense as an offense are acting for the welfare and happiness of the people, for the benefit, welfare, and happiness of gods and humans.
They make much merit and make the true teaching continue.”
“Those mendicants who explain a light offense as a light offense … a serious offense as a serious offense … an offense committed with corrupt intention as an offense committed with corrupt intention … an offense not committed with corrupt intention as an offense not committed with corrupt intention … an offense requiring rehabilitation as an offense requiring rehabilitation … an offense not requiring rehabilitation as an offense not requiring rehabilitation … an offense with redress as an offense with redress … an offense without redress as an offense without redress
are acting for the welfare and happiness of the people, for the benefit, welfare, and happiness of the people, of gods and humans.
They make much merit and make the true teaching continue.”
Numbered Discourses
“The foremost of my nun disciples in seniority is Mahāpajāpatī Gotamī.
… with great wisdom is Khemā.
… with psychic power is Uppalavaṇṇā.
… who have memorized the texts on monastic training is Paṭācārā.
… who speak on the teaching is Dhammadinnā.
… who practice absorption is Nandā.
… who are energetic is Soṇā.
… with clairvoyance is Sakulā.
… with swift insight is Bhaddā Kuṇḍalakesā.
… who recollect past lives is Bhaddā Kāpilānī.
… who have attained great insight is Bhaddakaccānā.
… who wear coarse robes is Kisāgotamī.
… who are strong in faith is Siṅgālakamātā.”
Numbered Discourses
Second
“Mendicants, I do not see a single thing that gives rise to unskillful qualities, or, when they have arisen, makes them increase and grow like wrong view.
When you have wrong view, unskillful qualities arise or, when they have arisen, they increase and grow.”
“Mendicants, I do not see a single thing that gives rise to skillful qualities, or, when they have arisen, makes them increase and grow like right view.
When you have right view, unarisen skillful qualities arise or, when they have arisen, they increase and grow.”
“Mendicants, I do not see a single thing that gives rise to unskillful qualities, or makes skillful qualities decline like wrong view.
When you have wrong view, unskillful qualities arise and skillful qualities decline.”
“Mendicants, I do not see a single thing that gives rise to skillful qualities, or makes unskillful qualities decline like right view.
When you have right view, skillful qualities arise and unskillful qualities decline.”
“Mendicants, I do not see a single thing that gives rise to wrong view, and once arisen, makes it grow like improper attention.
When you attend improperly, wrong view arises, and once arisen it grows.”
“Mendicants, I do not see a single thing that gives rise to right view, or, once it has already arisen, makes it grow like proper attention.
When you attend properly, right view arises, and once arisen it grows.”
“Mendicants, I do not see a single thing that causes sentient beings to be reborn, when their body breaks up, after death, in a place of loss, a bad place, the underworld, hell like wrong view.
It is because they have wrong view that sentient beings, when their body breaks up, after death, are reborn in a place of loss, a bad place, the underworld, hell.”
“Mendicants, I do not see a single thing that causes sentient beings to be reborn, when their body breaks up, after death, in a good place, a heavenly realm like right view.
It is because they have right view that sentient beings, when their body breaks up, after death, are reborn in a good place, a heavenly realm.”
“Mendicants, when an individual has wrong view, whatever bodily, verbal, or mental deeds they undertake in line with that view, their intentions, aims, wishes, and choices all lead to what is unlikable, undesirable, disagreeable, harmful, and suffering.
Why is that?
Because their view is bad.
Suppose a seed of neem, angled gourd, or bitter gourd was planted in moist earth. Whatever nutrients it takes up from the earth and water would lead to its bitter, acerbic, and unpleasant taste.
Why is that?
Because the seed is bad.
In the same way, when an individual has wrong view, whatever bodily, verbal, or mental deeds they undertake in line with that view, their intentions, aims, wishes, and choices all lead to what is unlikable, undesirable, disagreeable, harmful, and suffering.
Why is that?
Because their view is bad.”
“Mendicants, when an individual has right view, whatever bodily, verbal, or mental deeds they undertake in line with that view, their intentions, aims, wishes, and choices all lead to what is likable, desirable, agreeable, beneficial, and pleasant.
Why is that?
Because their view is good.
Suppose a seed of sugar cane, fine rice, or grape was planted in moist earth. Whatever nutrients it takes up from the earth and water would lead to its sweet, pleasant, and delicious taste.
Why is that?
Because the seed is good.
In the same way, when an individual has right view, whatever bodily, verbal, or mental deeds they undertake in line with that view, their intentions, aims, wishes, and choices all lead to what is likable, desirable, agreeable, beneficial, and pleasant.
Why is that?
Because their view is good.”
Numbered Discourses
Not the Teaching
“Mendicants, those mendicants who explain what is not the teaching as not the teaching are acting for the welfare and happiness of the people, for the benefit, welfare, and happiness of gods and humans.
They make much merit and make the true teaching continue.”
“Mendicants, those mendicants who explain what is the teaching as the teaching are acting for the welfare and happiness of the people, for the benefit, welfare, and happiness of gods and humans.
They make much merit and make the true teaching continue.”
“Those mendicants who explain what is not found in the texts on monastic training as not found in the texts on monastic training … what is found in the texts on monastic training as found in the texts on monastic training … what was not spoken and stated by the Realized One as not spoken and stated by the Realized One … what was spoken and stated by the Realized One as spoken and stated by the Realized One … what was not practiced by the Realized One as not practiced by the Realized One … what was practiced by the Realized One as practiced by the Realized One … what was not prescribed by the Realized One as not prescribed by the Realized One … what was prescribed by the Realized One as prescribed by the Realized One …
are acting for the welfare and happiness of the people, for the benefit, welfare, and happiness of gods and humans.
They make much merit and make the true teaching continue.”
Numbered Discourses
Another Chapter on a Finger-Snap
“If, mendicants, a mendicant develops the first absorption, even as long as a finger-snap, they are called
a mendicant who does not lack absorption, who follows the Teacher’s instructions, who responds to advice, and who does not eat the country’s alms in vain.
How much more so those who make much of it!”
“If, mendicants, a mendicant develops the second …
or fourth absorption …
or the heart’s release by love …
or the heart’s release by compassion …
or the heart’s release by rejoicing …
or the heart’s release by equanimity, even as long as a finger-snap …
If a mendicant meditates by observing an aspect of the body …
feelings …
principles—keen, aware, and mindful, rid of desire and aversion for the world, even for the time of a finger-snap …
If they generate enthusiasm, try, make an effort, exert the mind, and strive so that bad, unskillful qualities don’t arise, even for the time of a finger-snap …
If they generate enthusiasm, try, make an effort, exert the mind, and strive so that bad, unskillful qualities that have arisen are given up, even for the time of a finger-snap …
If they generate enthusiasm, try, make an effort, exert the mind, and strive so that skillful qualities that have not arisen do arise, even for the time of a finger-snap …
If they generate enthusiasm, try, make an effort, exert the mind, and strive so that skillful qualities that have arisen remain, are not lost, but increase, mature, and are fulfilled by development, even for the time of a finger-snap …
If they develop the basis of psychic power that has immersion due to enthusiasm, and active effort …
the basis of psychic power that has immersion due to energy, and active effort …
the basis of psychic power that has immersion due to mental development, and active effort …
the basis of psychic power that has immersion due to inquiry, and active effort, even for the time of a finger-snap …
If they develop the faculty of faith …
the faculty of energy …
the faculty of mindfulness …
the faculty of immersion …
the faculty of wisdom, even for the time of a finger-snap …
If they develop the power of faith …
the power of energy …
the power of mindfulness …
the power of immersion …
the power of wisdom, even for the time of a finger-snap …
If they develop the awakening factor of mindfulness …
the awakening factor of investigation of principles …
the awakening factor of energy …
the awakening factor of rapture …
the awakening factor of tranquility …
the awakening factor of immersion …
the awakening factor of equanimity, even for the time of a finger-snap …
If they develop right view …
right thought …
right speech …
right action …
right livelihood …
right effort …
right mindfulness …
right immersion, even for the time of a finger-snap …
Perceiving form internally, they see visions externally, limited, both pretty and ugly.
Having mastered this, they are aware that:
‘I know and see.’ …
Perceiving form internally, they see visions externally, limitless, both pretty and ugly.
Having mastered this, they are aware that:
‘I know and see.’ …
Not perceiving form internally, they see visions externally, limited, both pretty and ugly.
Having mastered this, they are aware that:
‘I know and see.’ …
Not perceiving form internally, they see visions externally, limitless, both pretty and ugly.
Having mastered this, they are aware that:
‘I know and see.’ …
Not perceiving form internally, they see visions externally that are blue, with blue color, blue hue, and blue tint.
Having mastered this, they are aware that:
‘I know and see.’ …
Not perceiving form internally, they see visions externally that are yellow, with yellow color, yellow hue, and yellow tint.
Having mastered this, they are aware that:
‘I know and see.’ …
Not perceiving form internally, they see visions externally that are red, with red color, red hue, and red tint.
Having mastered this, they are aware that:
‘I know and see.’ …
Not perceiving form internally, they see visions externally that are white, with white color, white hue, and white tint.
Having mastered this, they are aware that:
‘I know and see.’ …
Having physical form, they see visions …
not perceiving form internally, they see visions externally …
they’re focused only on beauty …
going totally beyond perceptions of form, with the ending of perceptions of impingement, not focusing on perceptions of diversity, aware that ‘space is infinite’, they enter and remain in the dimension of infinite space …
going totally beyond the dimension of infinite space, aware that ‘consciousness is infinite’, they enter and remain in the dimension of infinite consciousness …
going totally beyond the dimension of infinite consciousness, aware that ‘there is nothing at all’, they enter and remain in the dimension of nothingness …
going totally beyond the dimension of nothingness, they enter and remain in the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception …
going totally beyond the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception, they enter and remain in the cessation of perception and feeling …
They develop the meditation on universal earth …
the meditation on universal water …
the meditation on universal fire …
the meditation on universal air …
the meditation on universal blue …
the meditation on universal yellow …
the meditation on universal red …
the meditation on universal white …
the meditation on universal space …
the meditation on universal consciousness …
They develop the perception of ugliness …
the perception of death …
the perception of the repulsiveness of food …
the perception of dissatisfaction with the whole world …
the perception of impermanence …
the perception of suffering in impermanence …
the perception of not-self in suffering …
the perception of giving up …
the perception of fading away …
the perception of cessation …
They develop the perception of impermanence …
the perception of not-self …
the perception of death …
the perception of the repulsiveness of food …
the perception of dissatisfaction with the whole world …
the perception of a skeleton …
the perception of the worm-infested corpse …
the perception of the livid corpse …
the perception of the split open corpse …
the perception of the bloated corpse …
They develop the recollection of the Buddha …
the recollection of the teaching …
the recollection of the Saṅgha …
the recollection of ethical conduct …
the recollection of generosity …
the recollection of the deities …
mindfulness of breathing …
the recollection of death …
mindfulness of the body …
the recollection of peace …
They develop the faculty of faith together with the first absorption …
the faculty of energy …
the faculty of mindfulness …
the faculty of immersion …
the faculty of wisdom …
the power of faith …
the power of energy …
the power of mindfulness …
the power of immersion …
the power of wisdom together with the first absorption …
Together with the second absorption …
the third absorption …
the fourth absorption …
compassion …
rejoicing …
They develop the faculty of faith together with equanimity …
They develop the faculty of energy …
the faculty of mindfulness …
the faculty of immersion …
the faculty of wisdom …
the power of faith …
the power of energy …
the power of mindfulness …
the power of immersion …
the power of wisdom.
That mendicant is called
a mendicant who does not lack absorption, who follows the Teacher’s instructions, who responds to advice, and who does not eat the country’s alms in vain.
How much more so those who make much of it!”
Numbered Discourses
“It is impossible, mendicants, it cannot happen for a person accomplished in view to take any condition as permanent.
That is not possible.
But it is possible for an ordinary person to take some condition as permanent.
That is possible.”
“It is impossible, mendicants, it cannot happen for a person accomplished in view to take any condition as pleasant.
But it is possible for an ordinary person to take some condition as pleasant.”
“It is impossible, mendicants, it cannot happen for a person accomplished in view to take anything as self.
But it is possible for an ordinary person to take something as self.”
“It is impossible, mendicants, it cannot happen for a person accomplished in view to murder their mother.
But it is possible for an ordinary person to murder their mother.”
“It is impossible, mendicants, it cannot happen for a person accomplished in view to murder their father.
But it is possible for an ordinary person to murder their father.”
“It is impossible, mendicants, it cannot happen for a person accomplished in view to murder a perfected one.
But it is possible for an ordinary person to murder a perfected one.”
“It is impossible, mendicants, it cannot happen for a person accomplished in view to injure a Realized One with malicious intent.
But it is possible for an ordinary person to injure a Realized One with malicious intent.”
“It is impossible, mendicants, it cannot happen for a person accomplished in view to cause a schism in the Saṅgha.
But it is possible for an ordinary person to cause a schism in the Saṅgha.”
“It is impossible, mendicants, it cannot happen for a person accomplished in view to acknowledge another teacher.
But it is possible for an ordinary person to acknowledge another teacher.”
“It is impossible, mendicants, it cannot happen for two perfected ones, fully awakened Buddhas to arise in the same solar system at the same time.
But it is possible for just one perfected one, a fully awakened Buddha, to arise in one solar system.”
Numbered Discourses
“The foremost of my laymen in first going for refuge are the merchants Tapussa and Bhallika.
… as a donor is the householder Sudatta Anāthapiṇḍika.
… who speak on the teaching is the householder Citta Macchikāsaṇḍika.
… who attract a congregation by the four ways of being inclusive is Hatthaka Āḷavaka.
… who donate fine things is Mahānāma Sakka.
… who donate nice things is the householder Ugga of Vesālī.
… who attend on the Saṅgha is the householder Uggata of Hatthi Village.
… who have experiential confidence is Sūrambaṭṭha.
… who have confidence in a person is Jīvaka Komārabhacca.
… who are intimate is the householder Nakula’s father.”
Numbered Discourses
Sights, Etc.
So I have heard.
At one time the Buddha was staying near Sāvatthī in Jeta’s Grove, Anāthapiṇḍika’s monastery.
There the Buddha addressed the mendicants,
“Mendicants!”
“Venerable sir,” they replied.
The Buddha said this:
“Mendicants, I do not see a single sight that occupies a man’s mind like the sight of a woman.
The sight of a woman occupies a man’s mind.”
“Mendicants, I do not see a single sound that occupies a man’s mind like the sound of a woman.
The sound of a woman occupies a man’s mind.”
“Mendicants, I do not see a single smell that occupies a man’s mind like the smell of a woman.
The smell of a woman occupies a man’s mind.”
“Mendicants, I do not see a single taste that occupies a man’s mind like the taste of a woman.
The taste of a woman occupies a man’s mind.”
“Mendicants, I do not see a single touch that occupies a man’s mind like the touch of a woman.
The touch of a woman occupies a man’s mind.”
“Mendicants, I do not see a single sight that occupies a woman’s mind like the sight of a man.
The sight of a man occupies a woman’s mind.”
“Mendicants, I do not see a single sound that occupies a woman’s mind like the sound of a man.
The sound of a man occupies a woman’s mind.”
“Mendicants, I do not see a single smell that occupies a woman’s mind like the smell of a man.
The smell of a man occupies a woman’s mind.”
“Mendicants, I do not see a single taste that occupies a woman’s mind like the taste of a man.
The taste of a man occupies a woman’s mind.”
“Mendicants, I do not see a single touch that occupies a woman’s mind like the touch of a man.
The touch of a man occupies a woman’s mind.”
Numbered Discourses
One Person
“One person, mendicants, arises in the world for the welfare and happiness of the people, out of compassion for the world, for the benefit, welfare, and happiness of gods and humans.
What one person?
The Realized One, the perfected one, the fully awakened Buddha.
This is the one person, mendicants, who arises in the world for the welfare and happiness of the people, out of compassion for the world, for the benefit, welfare, and happiness of gods and humans.”
“The appearance of one person, mendicants, is rare in the world.
What one person?
The Realized One, the perfected one, the fully awakened Buddha.
This is the one person, mendicants, whose appearance is rare in the world.”
“One person, mendicants, arises in the world who is an incredible human being.
What one person?
The Realized One, the perfected one, the fully awakened Buddha.
This is the one person, mendicants, who arises in the world who is an incredible human being.”
“The death of one person, mendicants, is regretted by many people.
What one person?
The Realized One, the perfected one, the fully awakened Buddha.
This is the one person, mendicants, whose death is regretted by many people.”
“One person, mendicants, arises in the world unique, without peer or counterpart, incomparable, matchless, unrivaled, unequaled, without equal, the best of bipeds.
What one person?
The Realized One, the perfected one, the fully awakened Buddha.
This is the one person, mendicants, who arises in the world unique, without peer or counterpart, incomparable, matchless, unrivaled, unequaled, without equal, the best of bipeds.”
“With the appearance of one person, mendicants, there is the appearance of a great eye, a great light, a great radiance, and the six unsurpassable things; the realization of the four kinds of textual analysis; the penetration of many and diverse elements; the realization of the fruit of knowledge and freedom; the realization of the fruits of stream-entry, once-return, non-return, and perfection.
What one person?
The Realized One, the perfected one, the fully awakened Buddha.
This is the one person whose appearance brings the appearance of a great eye, a great light, a great radiance, and the six unsurpassable things; the realization of the four kinds of textual analysis; the penetration of many and diverse elements; the realization of the fruit of knowledge and release; the realization of the fruits of stream-entry, once-return, non-return, and perfection.”
“Mendicants, I do not see a single other person who rightly keeps rolling the supreme Wheel of Dhamma that was rolled forth by the Realized One like Sāriputta.
Sāriputta rightly keeps rolling the supreme Wheel of Dhamma that was rolled forth by the Realized One.”
Numbered Discourses
Useless
“Mendicants, I do not see a single thing that, when it’s not developed like this, is as useless as the mind.
An undeveloped mind is useless.”
“Mendicants, I do not see a single thing that, when it is developed like this, is as workable as the mind.
A developed mind is workable.”
“Mendicants, I do not see a single thing that, when it’s not developed like this, is so very harmful as the mind.
An undeveloped mind is very harmful.”
“Mendicants, I do not see a single thing that, when it is developed like this, is so very beneficial as the mind.
A developed mind is very beneficial.”
“Mendicants, I do not see a single thing that, when it’s not developed, with such untapped potential, is so very harmful as the mind.
An undeveloped mind, with untapped potential, is very harmful.”
“Mendicants, I do not see a single thing that, when it is developed, with its potential realized, is so very beneficial as the mind.
A developed mind, with its potential realized, is very beneficial.”
“Mendicants, I do not see a single thing that, when it’s not developed and cultivated, is so very harmful as the mind.
An undeveloped and uncultivated mind is very harmful.”
“Mendicants, I do not see a single thing that, when it is developed and cultivated, is so very beneficial as the mind.
A developed and cultivated mind is very beneficial.”
“Mendicants, I do not see a single thing that, when it’s not developed and cultivated, brings such suffering as the mind.
An undeveloped and uncultivated mind brings suffering.”
“Mendicants, I do not see a single thing that, when it is developed and cultivated, brings such happiness as the mind.
A developed and cultivated mind brings happiness.”
Numbered Discourses
Second
“It is impossible, mendicants, it cannot happen for two wheel-turning monarchs to arise in the same solar system at the same time.
But it is possible for just one wheel-turning monarch to arise in one solar system.”
“It is impossible, mendicants, it cannot happen for a woman to be a perfected one, a fully awakened Buddha.
But it is possible for a man to be a perfected one, a fully awakened Buddha.”
“It is impossible, mendicants, it cannot happen for a woman to be a wheel-turning monarch.
But it is possible for a man to be a wheel-turning monarch.”
“It is impossible, mendicants, it cannot happen for a woman to perform the role of Sakka, Māra, or Brahmā.
But it is possible for a man to perform the role of Sakka, Māra, or Brahmā.”
“It is impossible, mendicants, it cannot happen for a likable, desirable, agreeable result to come from bad bodily conduct.
But it is possible for an unlikable, undesirable, disagreeable result to come from bad bodily conduct.”
“It is impossible, mendicants, it cannot happen for a likable, desirable, agreeable result to come from bad verbal … bad mental conduct.
But it is possible for an unlikable, undesirable, disagreeable result to come from bad verbal … bad mental conduct.”
Numbered Discourses
“One person, mendicants, arises in the world for the hurt and unhappiness of the people, for the harm, hurt, and suffering of gods and humans.
What one person?
Someone with wrong view, whose perspective is distorted.
They draw many people away from the true teaching and establish them in false teachings.
This is one person who arises in the world for the hurt and unhappiness of the people, for the harm, hurt, and suffering of gods and humans.”
“One person, mendicants, arises in the world for the welfare and happiness of the people, for the benefit, welfare, and happiness of gods and humans.
What one person?
Someone with right view, whose perspective is undistorted.
They draw many people away from false teachings and establish them in the true teaching.
This is one person who arises in the world for the welfare and happiness of the people, for the benefit, welfare, and happiness of gods and humans.”
“Mendicants, I do not see a single thing that is so very blameworthy as wrong view.
Wrong view is the most blameworthy thing of all.”
“Mendicants, I do not see a single other person who acts for the hurt and unhappiness of the people, for the harm, hurt, and suffering of many people, of gods and humans like that silly man, Makkhali.
Just as a trap set at the mouth of a river would bring harm, suffering, calamity, and disaster for many fish,
so too that silly man, Makkhali, is a trap for humans, it seems to me. He has arisen in the world for the harm, suffering, calamity, and disaster of many beings.”
“Mendicants, the one who encourages someone in a poorly explained teaching and training, the one who they encourage, and the one who practices accordingly all make much bad karma.
Why is that?
Because the teaching is poorly explained.”
“Mendicants, the one who encourages someone in a well explained teaching and training, the one who they encourage, and the one who practices accordingly all make much merit.
Why is that?
Because the teaching is well explained.”
“Mendicants, in a poorly explained teaching and training, the donor should know moderation, not the recipient.
Why is that?
Because the teaching is poorly explained.”
“Mendicants, in a well explained teaching and training, the recipient should know moderation, not the donor.
Why is that?
Because the teaching is well explained.”
“Mendicants, in a poorly explained teaching and training an energetic person lives in suffering.
Why is that?
Because the teaching is poorly explained.”
“Mendicants, in a well explained teaching and training a lazy person lives in suffering.
Why is that?
Because the teaching is well explained.”
“Mendicants, in a poorly explained teaching and training a lazy person lives happily.
Why is that?
Because the teaching is poorly explained.”
“Mendicants, in a well explained teaching and training an energetic person lives happily.
Why is that?
Because the teaching is well explained.”
“Just as, mendicants, even a tiny bit of fecal matter still stinks,
so too I don’t approve of even a tiny bit of continued existence, not even as long as a finger-snap.”
“Just as even a tiny bit of urine, or spit, or pus, or blood still stinks,
so too I don’t approve of even a tiny bit of continued existence, not even as long as a finger-snap.”
Numbered Discourses
The Deathless
“Mendicants, those who don’t enjoy mindfulness of the body don’t enjoy the deathless.
Those who enjoy mindfulness of the body enjoy the deathless.”
“Mendicants, those who haven’t enjoyed mindfulness of the body haven’t enjoyed the deathless.
Those who have enjoyed mindfulness of the body have enjoyed the deathless.”
“Mendicants, those who have lost mindfulness of the body have lost the deathless.
Those who haven’t lost mindfulness of the body haven’t lost the deathless.”
“Mendicants, those who have missed out on mindfulness of the body have missed out on the deathless.
Those who have undertaken mindfulness of the body have not missed out on the deathless.”
“Mendicants, those who have neglected mindfulness of the body have neglected the deathless.
Those who have not neglected mindfulness of the body have not neglected the deathless.”
“Mendicants, those who have forgotten mindfulness of the body have forgotten the deathless.
Those who haven’t forgotten mindfulness of the body haven’t forgotten the deathless.”
“Mendicants, those who haven’t cultivated mindfulness of the body haven’t cultivated the deathless.
Those who have cultivated mindfulness of the body have cultivated the deathless.”
“Mendicants, those who haven’t developed mindfulness of the body haven’t developed the deathless.
Those who have developed mindfulness of the body have developed the deathless.”
“Mendicants, those who haven’t practiced mindfulness of the body haven’t practiced the deathless.
Those who have practiced mindfulness of the body have practiced the deathless.”
“Mendicants, those who haven’t had insight into mindfulness of the body haven’t had insight into the deathless.
Those who have had insight into mindfulness of the body have had insight into the deathless.”
“Mendicants, those who haven’t completely understood mindfulness of the body haven’t completely understood the deathless.
Those who have completely understood mindfulness of the body have completely understood the deathless.”
“Mendicants, those who haven’t realized mindfulness of the body haven’t realized the deathless.
Those who have realized mindfulness of the body have realized the deathless.”
That is what the Buddha said.
Satisfied, the mendicants were happy with what the Buddha said.
The Book of the Ones is finished.
Numbered Discourses
Fourth
“Just as, mendicants, in India the delightful parks, woods, meadows, and lotus ponds are few,
while the hilly terrain, inaccessible riverlands, stumps and thorns, and rugged mountains are many;
so too the sentient beings born on land are few, while those born in water are many.
… so too the sentient beings reborn as humans are few,
while those not reborn as humans are many.
… so too the sentient beings reborn in civilized countries are few,
while those reborn in the borderlands, among strange barbarian tribes, are many.
… so too the sentient beings who are wise, bright, clever, and able to distinguish what is well said from what is poorly said are few,
while the sentient beings who are witless, dull, stupid, and unable to distinguish what is well said from what is poorly said are many.
… so too the sentient beings who have the noble eye of wisdom are few,
while those who are ignorant and confused are many.
… so too the sentient beings who get to see a Realized One are few,
while those who don’t get to see a Realized One are many.
… so too the sentient beings who get to hear the teaching and training proclaimed by a Realized One are few,
while those sentient beings who don’t get to hear the teaching and training proclaimed by a Realized One are many.
… so too the sentient beings who remember the teachings they hear are few,
while those who don’t remember the teachings are many.
… so too the sentient beings who examine the meaning of the teachings they have memorized are few,
while those who don’t examine the meaning of the teachings are many.
… so too the sentient beings who understand the meaning and the teaching and practice accordingly are few,
while those who understand the meaning and the teaching but don’t practice accordingly are many.
… so too the sentient beings inspired by inspiring places are few,
while those who are uninspired are many.
… so too the sentient beings who, being inspired, strive effectively are few,
while those who, even though inspired, don’t strive effectively are many.
… so too the sentient beings who, relying on letting go, gain immersion, gain unification of mind are few,
while those who don’t gain immersion, don’t gain unification of mind relying on letting go are many.
… so too the sentient beings who get the best food and flavors are few,
while those who don’t get the best food and flavors, but get by with scraps in an alms bowl are many.
… so too the sentient beings who get the essence of the meaning, the essence of the teaching, and the essence of freedom are few,
while the sentient beings who don’t get the essence of the meaning, the essence of the teaching, and the essence of freedom are many.
So you should train like this:
‘We will get the essence of the meaning, the essence of the teaching, the essence of freedom.’
That’s how you should train.”
“Just as, mendicants, in India the delightful parks, woods, meadows, and lotus ponds are few,
while the hilly terrain, inaccessible riverlands, stumps and thorns, and rugged mountains are many;
so too, those who die as humans and are reborn as humans are few, while those who die as humans and are reborn in hell, or the animal realm, or the ghost realm are many.”
“… the sentient beings who die as humans and are reborn as gods are few,
while those who die as humans and are reborn in hell, or the animal realm, or the ghost realm are many.”
“… the sentient beings who die as gods and are reborn as gods are few,
while those who die as gods and are reborn in hell, or the animal realm, or the ghost realm are many.”
“… the sentient beings who die as gods and are reborn as humans are few,
while those who die as gods and are reborn in hell, or the animal realm, or the ghost realm are many.”
“… the sentient beings who die in hell and are reborn as humans are few,
while those who die in hell and are reborn in hell, or the animal realm, or the ghost realm are many.”
“… the sentient beings who die in hell and are reborn as gods are few,
while those who die in hell and are reborn in hell, or the animal realm, or the ghost realm are many.”
“… the sentient beings who die as animals and are reborn as humans are few,
while those who die as animals and are reborn in hell, or the animal realm, or the ghost realm are many.”
“… the sentient beings who die as animals and are reborn as gods are few,
while those who die as animals and are reborn in hell, or the animal realm, or the ghost realm are many.”
“… the sentient beings who die as ghosts and are reborn as humans are few,
while those who die as ghosts and are reborn in hell, or the animal realm, or the ghost realm are many.”
“… the sentient beings who die as ghosts and are reborn as gods are few,
while those who die as ghosts and are reborn in hell, or the animal realm, or the ghost realm are many.”
Numbered Discourses
“It is impossible, mendicants, it cannot happen for an unlikable, undesirable, disagreeable result to come from good bodily conduct.
But it is possible for a likable, desirable, agreeable result to come from good bodily conduct.”
“It is impossible, mendicants, it cannot happen for an unlikable, undesirable, disagreeable result to come from good verbal … good mental conduct.
But it is possible for a likable, desirable, agreeable result to come from good verbal … good mental conduct.”
“It is impossible, mendicants, it cannot happen that someone who has engaged in bad bodily conduct, could for that reason alone, when their body breaks up, after death, be reborn in a good place, a heavenly realm.
But it is possible that someone who has engaged in bad bodily conduct could, for that reason alone, when their body breaks up, after death, be reborn in a place of loss, a bad place, the underworld, hell.”
“It is impossible, mendicants, it cannot happen that someone who has engaged in bad verbal … bad mental conduct could, for that reason alone, when their body breaks up, after death, be reborn in a good place, a heavenly realm.
But it is possible that someone who has engaged in bad verbal … bad mental conduct could, for that reason alone, when their body breaks up, after death, be reborn in a place of loss, a bad place, the underworld, hell.”
“It is impossible, mendicants, it cannot happen that someone who has engaged in good bodily conduct could, for that reason alone, when their body breaks up, after death, be reborn in a place of loss, the underworld, a lower realm, hell.
But it is possible that someone who has engaged in good bodily conduct could, for that reason alone, when their body breaks up, after death, be reborn in a good place, a heavenly realm.”
“It is impossible, mendicants, it cannot happen that someone who has engaged in good verbal … good mental conduct could, for that reason alone, when their body breaks up, after death, be reborn in a place of loss, a bad place, the underworld, hell.
But it is possible that someone who has engaged in good verbal … good mental conduct could, for that reason alone, when their body breaks up, after death, be reborn in a good place, heavenly realm.”
Numbered Discourses
Second
“The foremost of my monk disciples in creating a mind-made body is Cūḷapanthaka.
… who are skilled in the evolution of consciousness is Cūḷapanthaka.
… who are skilled in the evolution of perception is Mahāpanthaka.
… who live without conflict is Subhūti.
… who are worthy of a religious donation is Subhūti.
… who stay in the wilderness is Revata of the Acacia Wood.
… who practice absorption is Kaṅkhārevata.
… who are energetic is Soṇa Koḷivisa.
… who are good speakers is Soṇa Kuṭikaṇṇa.
… who receive many possessions is Sīvali.
… who are strong in faith is Vakkalī.”
Numbered Discourses
“One thing, mendicants, when developed and cultivated, leads solely to disillusionment, dispassion, cessation, peace, insight, awakening, and extinguishment.
What one thing?
Recollection of the Buddha.
This one thing, when developed and cultivated, leads solely to disillusionment, dispassion, cessation, peace, insight, awakening, and extinguishment.”
“One thing, mendicants, when developed and cultivated, leads solely to disillusionment, dispassion, cessation, peace, insight, awakening, and extinguishment.
What one thing?
Recollection of the teaching … Recollection of the Saṅgha … Recollection of ethical conduct … Recollection of generosity … Recollection of the deities … Mindfulness of breathing … Mindfulness of death … Mindfulness of the body … Recollection of peace.
This one thing, when developed and cultivated, leads solely to disillusionment, dispassion, cessation, peace, insight, awakening, and extinguishment.”
Numbered Discourses
Giving Up the Hindrances
“Mendicants, I do not see a single thing that gives rise to sensual desire, or, when it has arisen, makes it increase and grow like the feature of beauty.
When you attend improperly to the feature of beauty, sensual desire arises, and once arisen it increases and grows.”
“Mendicants, I do not see a single thing that gives rise to ill will, or, when it has arisen, makes it increase and grow like the feature of harshness.
When you attend improperly to the feature of harshness, ill will arises, and once arisen it increases and grows.”
“Mendicants, I do not see a single thing that gives rise to dullness and drowsiness, or, when they have arisen, makes them increase and grow like discontent, sloth, yawning, sleepiness after eating, and mental sluggishness.
When you have a sluggish mind, dullness and drowsiness arise, and once arisen they increase and grow.”
“Mendicants, I do not see a single thing that gives rise to restlessness and remorse, or, when they have arisen, makes them increase and grow like an unsettled mind.
When you have no peace of mind, restlessness and remorse arise, and once arisen they increase and grow.”
“Mendicants, I do not see a single thing that gives rise to doubt, or, when it has arisen, makes it increase and grow like improper attention.
When you attend improperly, doubt arises, and once arisen it increases and grows.”
“Mendicants, I do not see a single thing that prevents sensual desire from arising, or, when it has arisen, abandons it like the feature of ugliness.
When you attend properly to the feature of ugliness, sensual desire does not arise, or, if it has already arisen, it’s given up.”
“Mendicants, I do not see a single thing that prevents ill will from arising, or, when it has arisen, abandons it like the heart’s release by love.
When you attend properly on the heart’s release by love, ill will does not arise, or, if it has already arisen, it’s given up.”
“Mendicants, I do not see a single thing that prevents dullness and drowsiness from arising, or, when they have arisen, gives them up like the elements of initiative, persistence, and vigor.
When you’re energetic, dullness and drowsiness do not arise, or, if they’ve already arisen, they’re given up.”
“Mendicants, I do not see a single thing that prevents restlessness and remorse from arising, or, when they have arisen, gives them up like peace of mind.
When your mind is peaceful, restlessness and remorse do not arise, or, if they’ve already arisen, they’re given up.”
“Mendicants, I do not see a single thing that prevents doubt from arising, or, when it has arisen, gives it up like proper attention.
When you attend properly, doubt does not arise, or, if it’s already arisen, it’s given up.”
Numbered Discourses
Mindfulness of the Body
“Mendicants, anyone who brings into their mind the great ocean includes all of the streams that run into it.
In the same way, anyone who has developed and cultivated mindfulness of the body includes all of the skillful qualities that play a part in realization.”
“One thing, mendicants, when developed and cultivated leads to great urgency … great benefit … great sanctuary … mindfulness and awareness … gaining knowledge and vision … blissful meditation in the present life … the realization of the fruit of knowledge and freedom.
What one thing?
Mindfulness of the body.
This one thing, when developed and cultivated, leads to great urgency … great benefit … great sanctuary … mindfulness and awareness … gaining knowledge and vision … a happy abiding in the present life … the realization of the fruit of knowledge and freedom.”
“When one thing, mendicants, is developed and cultivated the body and mind become tranquil, thinking and considering settle down, and all of the qualities that play a part in realization are fully developed.
What one thing?
Mindfulness of the body.
When this one thing is developed and cultivated, the body and mind become tranquil, thinking and considering settle down, and all of the qualities that play a part in realization are fully developed.”
“When one thing, mendicants, is developed and cultivated, unskillful qualities do not arise, and, if they’ve already arisen, they are given up.
What one thing?
Mindfulness of the body.
When this one thing is developed and cultivated, unskillful qualities do not arise, and, if they’ve already arisen, they are given up.”
“When one thing, mendicants, is developed and cultivated, skillful qualities arise, and, once they’ve arisen, they increase and grow.
What one thing?
Mindfulness of the body.
When this one thing is developed and cultivated, skillful qualities arise, and, once they’ve arisen, they increase and grow.”
“When one thing, mendicants, is developed and cultivated, ignorance is given up … knowledge arises … the conceit ‘I am’ is given up … the underlying tendencies are uprooted … the fetters are given up.
What one thing?
Mindfulness of the body.
When this one thing is developed and cultivated, ignorance is given up … knowledge arises … the conceit ‘I am’ is given up … the underlying tendencies are uprooted … the fetters are given up.”
“One thing, mendicants, when developed and cultivated leads to demolition by wisdom … to extinguishment by not grasping.
What one thing?
Mindfulness of the body.
This one thing, mendicants, when developed and cultivated leads to demolition by wisdom … to extinguishment by not grasping.”
“When one thing is developed and cultivated there is the penetration of many elements … the penetration of diverse elements … the analysis of many elements.
What one thing?
Mindfulness of the body.
When this one thing is developed and cultivated there is the penetration of many elements … the penetration of diverse elements … the analysis of many elements.”
“One thing, mendicants, when developed and cultivated leads to the realization of the fruit of stream-entry … once-return … non-return … perfection.
What one thing?
Mindfulness of the body.
This one thing, when developed and cultivated, leads to the realization of the fruit of stream-entry … once-return … non-return … perfection.”
“One thing, mendicants, when developed and cultivated, leads to the getting of wisdom … the growth of wisdom … the increase of wisdom … to great wisdom … to widespread wisdom … to abundant wisdom … to deep wisdom … to extraordinary wisdom … to vast wisdom … to much wisdom … to fast wisdom … to light wisdom … to laughing wisdom … to swift wisdom … to sharp wisdom … to penetrating wisdom.
What one thing?
Mindfulness of the body.
This one thing, when developed and cultivated, leads to the getting of wisdom … the growth of wisdom … the increase of wisdom … to great wisdom … to widespread wisdom … to abundant wisdom … to deep wisdom … to extraordinary wisdom … to vast wisdom … to much wisdom … to fast wisdom … to light wisdom … to laughing wisdom … to swift wisdom … to sharp wisdom … to penetrating wisdom.”
Numbered Discourses
Good Friends
“Mendicants, I do not see a single thing that gives rise to skillful qualities, or makes unskillful qualities decline like good friends.
When you have good friends, skillful qualities arise and unskillful qualities decline.”
“Mendicants, I do not see a single thing that gives rise to unskillful qualities, or makes skillful qualities decline like pursuing bad habits and not good habits.
When you pursue bad habits and not good habits, unskillful qualities arise and skillful qualities decline.”
“Mendicants, I do not see a single thing that gives rise to skillful qualities, or makes unskillful qualities decline like pursuing good habits and not bad habits.
When you pursue good habits and not bad habits, skillful qualities arise and unskillful qualities decline.”
“Mendicants, I do not see a single thing that prevents the awakening factors from arising, or, if they’ve already arisen, prevents them from being fully developed like improper attention.
When you attend improperly, the awakening factors don’t arise, or, if they’ve already arisen, they’re not fully developed.”
“Mendicants, I do not see a single thing that gives rise to the awakening factors, or, if they’ve already arisen, fully develops them like proper attention.
When you attend properly, the awakening factors arise, or, if they’ve already arisen, they’re fully developed.”
“Loss of relatives, mendicants, is a small thing.
Wisdom is the worst thing to lose.”
“Growth of relatives, mendicants, is a small thing.
Wisdom is the best thing to grow.
So you should train like this:
‘We will grow in wisdom.’
That’s how you should train.”
“Loss of wealth, mendicants, is a small thing.
Wisdom is the worst thing to lose.”
“Growth of wealth, mendicants, is a small thing.
Wisdom is the best thing to grow.
So you should train like this:
‘We will grow in wisdom.’
That’s how you should train.”
“Loss of fame, mendicants, is a small thing.
Wisdom is the worst thing to lose.”
“Growth of fame, mendicants, is a small thing.
Wisdom is the best thing to grow.
So you should train like this:
‘We will grow in wisdom.’
That’s how you should train.”
Numbered Discourses
Inspirational
“Mendicants, this is definitely something worth having, that is, living in the wilderness …
eating only alms-food …
wearing rag robes …
having just three robes …
teaching Dhamma …
memorizing the texts on monastic training …
being very learned …
being respected …
being well-presented …
having a following …
having a large following …
coming from a good family …
being handsome …
being a good speaker …
having few wishes …
having good health.”
Numbered Discourses
Negligence
“Mendicants, I do not see a single thing that is so very harmful as negligence.
Negligence is very harmful.”
“Mendicants, I do not see a single thing that is so very beneficial as diligence.
Diligence is very beneficial.”
“Mendicants, I do not see a single thing that is so very harmful as laziness.
Laziness is very harmful.”
“Mendicants, I do not see a single thing that is so very beneficial as arousing energy.
Arousing energy is very beneficial.”
“Mendicants, I do not see a single thing that is so very harmful as having many wishes.
Having many wishes is very harmful.”
“Mendicants, I do not see a single thing that is so very beneficial as having few wishes.
Having few wishes is very beneficial.”
“Mendicants, I do not see a single thing that is so very harmful as lack of contentment.
Lack of contentment is very harmful.”
“Mendicants, I do not see a single thing that is so very beneficial as contentment.
Contentment is very beneficial.”
“Mendicants, I do not see a single thing that is so very harmful as improper attention.
Improper attention is very harmful.”
“Mendicants, I do not see a single thing that is so very beneficial as proper attention.
Proper attention is very beneficial.”
“Mendicants, I do not see a single thing that is so very harmful as lack of situational awareness.
Lack of situational awareness is very harmful.”
“Mendicants, I do not see a single thing that is so very beneficial as situational awareness.
Situational awareness is very beneficial.”
“Mendicants, I do not see a single thing that is so very harmful as bad friends.
Bad friends are very harmful.”
“Mendicants, I do not see a single thing that is so very beneficial as good friends.
Good friends are very beneficial.”
“Mendicants, I do not see a single thing that is so very harmful as pursuing bad habits and not good habits.
Pursuing bad habits and not good habits is very harmful.”
“Mendicants, I do not see a single thing that is so very beneficial as pursuing good habits and not bad habits.
Pursuing good habits and not bad habits is very beneficial.”
Numbered Discourses
“The foremost of my monk disciples who want to train is Rāhula.
… who went forth out of faith is Raṭṭhapāla.
… who are the first to pick up a ballot slip is Kuṇḍadhāna.
… who are eloquent poets is Vaṅgīsa.
… who are impressive all around is Upasena Vaṅgantaputta.
… who assign lodgings is Dabba Mallaputta.
… who are beloved of the deities is Pilindavaccha.
… with swift insight is Bāhiya of the Bark Cloth.
… with brilliant speech is Kassapa the Prince.
… who have attained the methods of textual analysis is Mahākoṭṭhita.”
Numbered Discourses
Fourth
“The foremost of my monk disciples who are very learned is Ānanda.
… with a good memory is Ānanda.
… with an extensive range is Ānanda.
… in retention is Ānanda.
… as a personal attendant is Ānanda.
… with a large congregation is Uruvelakassapa.
… who inspire lay families is Kāḷudāyī.
… with good health is Bakkula.
… who recollect past lives is Sobhita.
… who have memorized the texts on monastic training is Upāli.
… who advise the nuns is Nandaka.
… who guard the sense doors is Nanda.
… who advise the monks is Mahākappina.
… who are skilled in the fire element is Sāgata.
… who inspire eloquent teachings is Rādha.
… who wear coarse robes is Mogharāja.”
Numbered Discourses
Seventh
“The foremost of my laywomen in first going for refuge is Sujātā Seniyadhītā.
… as a donor is Visākhā, Migāra’s mother.
… who are very learned is Khujjuttarā.
… who dwell in love is Sāmāvatī.
… who practice absorption is Uttarānandamātā.
… who give fine things is Suppavāsā Koliyadhītā.
… who care for the sick is the laywoman Suppiyā.
… who have experiential confidence is Kātiyānī.
… who are intimate is the householder Nakula’s mother.
… whose confidence is based on oral transmission is the laywoman Kāḷī of Kuraraghara.”
Numbered Discourses
A Spike
“Mendicants, suppose a spike of rice or barley was pointing the wrong way. If you trod on it with hand or foot, there’s no way it could break the skin and produce blood.
Why is that?
Because the spike is pointing the wrong way.
In the same way, a mendicant whose mind is pointing the wrong way cannot break ignorance, produce knowledge, and realize extinguishment.
Why is that?
Because their mind is pointing the wrong way.”
“Mendicants, suppose a spike of rice or barley was pointing the right way. If you trod on it with hand or foot, it may well break the skin and produce blood.
Why is that?
Because the spike is pointing the right way.
In the same way, a mendicant whose mind is pointing the right way can break ignorance, produce knowledge, and realize extinguishment.
Why is that?
Because the mind is pointing the right way.”
“Mendicants, when I’ve comprehended the mind of a person whose mind is corrupted, I understand:
‘If this person were to die right now, they would be cast down to hell.’
Why is that?
Because their mind is corrupted.
Corruption of mind is the reason why some sentient beings, when their body breaks up, after death, are reborn in a place of loss, a bad place, the underworld, hell.”
“Mendicants, when I’ve comprehended the mind of a person whose mind is pure, I understand:
‘If this person were to die right now, they would be raised up to heaven.’
Why is that?
Because their mind is pure.
Purity of mind is the reason why some sentient beings, when their body breaks up, after death, are reborn in a good place, a heavenly realm.”
“Suppose, mendicants, there was a lake that was cloudy, murky, and muddy. A person with good eyesight standing on the bank would not see the mussel shells, gravel and pebbles, and schools of fish swimming about or staying still.
Why is that?
Because the water is clouded.
In the same way, that a mendicant whose mind is clouded would know what’s for their own good, the good of another, or the good of both; or that they would realize any superhuman distinction in knowledge and vision worthy of the noble ones: this is not possible.
Why is that?
Because their mind is clouded.”
“Suppose, mendicants, there was a lake that was transparent, clear, and unclouded. A person with good eyesight standing on the bank would see the mussel shells, gravel and pebbles, and schools of fish swimming about or staying still.
Why is that?
Because the water is unclouded.
In the same way, that a mendicant whose mind is not clouded would know what’s for their own good, the good of another, or the good of both; or that they would realize any superhuman distinction in knowledge and vision worthy of the noble ones: this is possible.
Why is that?
Because their mind is unclouded.”
“Just as, mendicants, the boxwood is said to be the best kind of tree in terms of its pliability and workability,
so too, I do not see a single thing that’s as pliable and workable as the mind, when it is developed and cultivated.
A mind that is developed and cultivated is pliable and workable.”
“Mendicants, I do not see a single thing that’s as quick to change as the mind.
So much so that it’s not easy to give a simile for how quickly the mind changes.”
“This mind, mendicants, is radiant.
But it’s corrupted by passing corruptions.”
“This mind, mendicants, is radiant.
And it is freed from passing corruptions.”
Numbered Discourses
Arousing Energy
“Mendicants, I do not see a single thing that gives rise to skillful qualities, or makes unskillful qualities decline like arousing energy.
When you’re energetic, skillful qualities arise and unskillful qualities decline.”
“Mendicants, I do not see a single thing that gives rise to unskillful qualities, or makes skillful qualities decline like having many wishes.
When you have many wishes, unskillful qualities arise and skillful qualities decline.”
“Mendicants, I do not see a single thing that gives rise to skillful qualities, or makes unskillful qualities decline like having few wishes.
When you have few wishes, skillful qualities arise and unskillful qualities decline.”
“Mendicants, I do not see a single thing that gives rise to unskillful qualities, or makes skillful qualities decline like lack of contentment.
When you lack contentment, unskillful qualities arise and skillful qualities decline.”
“Mendicants, I do not see a single thing that gives rise to skillful qualities, or makes unskillful qualities decline like contentment.
When you’re contented, skillful qualities arise and unskillful qualities decline.”
“Mendicants, I do not see a single thing that gives rise to unskillful qualities, or makes skillful qualities decline like improper attention.
When you attend improperly, unskillful qualities arise and skillful qualities decline.”
“Mendicants, I do not see a single thing that gives rise to skillful qualities, or makes unskillful qualities decline like proper attention.
When you attend properly, skillful qualities arise and unskillful qualities decline.”
“Mendicants, I do not see a single thing that gives rise to unskillful qualities, or makes skillful qualities decline like lack of situational awareness.
When you lack situational awareness, unskillful qualities arise and skillful qualities decline.”
“Mendicants, I do not see a single thing that gives rise to skillful qualities, or makes unskillful qualities decline like situational awareness.
When you have situational awareness, skillful qualities arise and unskillful qualities decline.”
“Mendicants, I do not see a single thing that gives rise to unskillful qualities, or makes skillful qualities decline like bad friends.
When you have bad friends, unskillful qualities arise and skillful qualities decline.”
Numbered Discourses
Finger-Snap
“This mind, mendicants, is radiant.
But it is corrupted by passing corruptions.
An uneducated ordinary person does not truly understand this.
So I say that the uneducated ordinary person has no development of the mind.”
“This mind, mendicants, is radiant.
And it is freed from passing corruptions.
An educated noble disciple truly understands this.
So I say that the educated noble disciple has development of the mind.”
“If, mendicants, a mendicant cultivates a mind of love even as long as a finger-snap,
they’re called
a mendicant who does not lack absorption, who follows the Teacher’s instructions, who responds to advice, and who does not eat the country’s alms in vain.
How much more so those who make much of it!”
“If, mendicants, a mendicant develops a mind of love even as long as a finger-snap,
they’re called
a mendicant who does not lack absorption, who follows the Teacher’s instructions, who responds to advice, and who does not eat the country’s alms in vain.
How much more so those who make much of it!”
“If, mendicants, a mendicant focuses on a mind of love even as long as a finger-snap,
they’re called
a mendicant who does not lack absorption, who follows the Teacher’s instructions, who responds to advice, and who does not eat the country’s alms in vain.
How much more so those who make much of it!”
“Mendicants, intention shapes all phenomena whatsoever that are unskillful, part of the unskillful, on the side of the unskillful.
Intention is the first of those phenomena to arise, and unskillful phenomena follow right behind.”
“Mendicants, intention shapes all phenomena whatsoever that are skillful, part of the skillful, on the side of the skillful.
Intention is the first of those phenomena to arise, and skillful phenomena follow right behind.”
“Mendicants, I do not see a single thing that gives rise to unskillful qualities, or makes skillful qualities decline like negligence.
When you’re negligent, unskillful qualities arise and skillful qualities decline.”
“Mendicants, I do not see a single thing that gives rise to skillful qualities, or makes unskillful qualities decline like diligence.
When you’re diligent, skillful qualities arise and unskillful qualities decline.”
“Mendicants, I do not see a single thing that gives rise to unskillful qualities, or makes skillful qualities decline like laziness.
When you’re lazy, unskillful qualities arise and skillful qualities decline.”
Numbered Discourses
Second: Negligence
“Taking into account interior factors, mendicants, I do not see a single one that is so very harmful as negligence.
Negligence is very harmful.”
“Taking into account interior factors, mendicants, I do not see a single one that is so very beneficial as diligence.
Diligence is very beneficial.”
“Taking into account interior factors, mendicants, I do not see a single one that is so very harmful as laziness.
Laziness is very harmful.”
“Taking into account interior factors, mendicants, I do not see a single one that is so very beneficial as arousing energy.
Arousing energy is very beneficial.”
“Taking into account interior factors, mendicants, I do not see a single one that is so very harmful as having many wishes … having few wishes … lack of contentment … contentment … improper attention … proper attention … lack of situational awareness … situational awareness …”
“Taking into account exterior factors, mendicants, I do not see a single one that is so very harmful as bad friends.
Bad friends are very harmful.”
“Taking into account exterior factors, mendicants, I do not see a single one that is so very beneficial as good friends.
Good friends are very beneficial.”
“Taking into account interior factors, mendicants, I do not see a single one that is so very harmful as pursuing bad habits and not good habits.
Pursuing bad habits and not good habits is very harmful.”
“Taking into account interior factors, mendicants, I do not see a single one that is so very beneficial as pursuing good habits and not bad habits.
Pursuing good habits and not bad habits is very beneficial.”
“Mendicants, I do not see a single thing that leads to the decline and disappearance of the true teaching like negligence.
Negligence leads to the decline and disappearance of the true teaching.”
“Mendicants, I do not see a single thing that leads to the continuation, persistence, and enduring of the true teaching like diligence.
Diligence leads to the continuation, persistence, and enduring of the true teaching.”
“Mendicants, I do not see a single thing that leads to the decline and disappearance of the true teaching like laziness.
Laziness leads to the decline and disappearance of the true teaching.”
“Mendicants, I do not see a single thing that leads to the continuation, persistence, and enduring of the true teaching like arousing energy.
Arousing energy leads to the continuation, persistence, and enduring of the true teaching.”
“Mendicants, I do not see a single thing that leads to the decline and disappearance of the true teaching like having many wishes … having few wishes … lack of contentment … contentment … improper attention … proper attention … lack of situational awareness … situational awareness … bad friends … good friends … pursuing bad habits and not good habits.
Pursuing bad habits and not good habits leads to the decline and disappearance of the true teaching.”
“Mendicants, I do not see a single thing that leads to the continuation, persistence, and enduring of the true teaching like pursuing good habits and not bad habits.
Pursuing good habits and not bad habits leads to the continuation, persistence, and enduring of the true teaching”
“Mendicants, those mendicants who explain what is not the teaching as the teaching are acting for the hurt and unhappiness of the people, for the harm, hurt, and suffering of gods and humans.
They make much bad karma and make the true teaching disappear.”
“Mendicants, those mendicants who explain what is the teaching as not the teaching are acting for the hurt and unhappiness of the people, for the harm, hurt, and suffering of gods and humans.
They make much bad karma and make the true teaching disappear.”
“Those mendicants who explain what is not found in the texts on monastic training as found in those texts … what is found in the texts on monastic training as not found in those texts … what was not spoken and stated by the Realized One as spoken and stated by the Realized One … what was spoken and stated by the Realized One as not spoken and stated by the Realized One … what was not practiced by the Realized One as practiced by the Realized One … what was practiced by the Realized One as not practiced by the Realized One … what was not prescribed by the Realized One as prescribed by the Realized One … what was prescribed by the Realized One as not prescribed by the Realized One
are acting for the hurt and unhappiness of the people, for the harm, hurt, and suffering of gods and humans.
They make much bad karma and make the true teaching disappear.”
Numbered Discourses
The Results of Misconduct
“Mendicants, the killing of living creatures, when cultivated, developed, and practiced, leads to hell, the animal realm, or the ghost realm.
The minimum result it leads to for a human being is a short life span.
Stealing, when cultivated, developed, and practiced, leads to hell, the animal realm, or the ghost realm.
The minimum result it leads to for a human being is loss of wealth.
Sexual misconduct, when cultivated, developed, and practiced, leads to hell, the animal realm, or the ghost realm.
The minimum result it leads to for a human being is rivalry and enmity.
Lying, when cultivated, developed, and practiced, leads to hell, the animal realm, or the ghost realm.
The minimum result it leads to for a human being is false accusations.
Divisive speech, when cultivated, developed, and practiced, leads to hell, the animal realm, or the ghost realm.
The minimum result it leads to for a human being is being divided against friends.
Harsh speech, when cultivated, developed, and practiced, leads to hell, the animal realm, or the ghost realm.
The minimum result it leads to for a human being is hearing disagreeable things.
Talking nonsense, when cultivated, developed, and practiced, leads to hell, the animal realm, or the ghost realm.
The minimum result it leads to for a human being is that no-one takes what you say seriously.
Taking alcoholic drinks that cause negligence, when cultivated, developed, and practiced, leads to hell, the animal realm, or the ghost realm.
The minimum result it leads to for a human being is madness.”
Numbered Discourses
Reasons to Give
“Mendicants, there are these eight grounds for giving.
What eight?
A person might give a gift out of favoritism or hostility or stupidity or cowardice. Or they give thinking, ‘Giving was practiced by my father and my father’s father. It would not be right for me to abandon this family tradition.’ Or they give thinking, ‘After I’ve given this gift, when my body breaks up, after death, I’ll be reborn in a good place, a heavenly realm.’ Or they give thinking, ‘When giving this gift my mind becomes clear, and I become happy and joyful.’ Or they give a gift thinking, ‘This is an adornment and requisite for the mind.’
These are the eight grounds for giving.”
Numbered Discourses
Earthquakes
Ignoble Expressions
“Mendicants, there are these eight ignoble expressions.
What eight?
Saying you’ve seen, heard, thought, or known something, but you haven’t. And saying you haven’t seen, heard, thought, or known something, and you have.
These are the eight ignoble expressions.”
Numbered Discourses
An Adviser for Nuns
At one time the Buddha was staying near Vesālī, at the Great Wood, in the hall with the peaked roof.
Then Venerable Ānanda went up to the Buddha, bowed, sat down to one side, and said to the Buddha:
“Sir, how many qualities should a monk have to be agreed on as an adviser for nuns?”
“Ānanda, a monk with eight qualities may be agreed on as an adviser for nuns.
What eight?
Firstly, a monk is ethical, restrained in the code of conduct, with good behavior and supporters. Seeing danger in the slightest fault, they keep the rules they’ve undertaken.
They’re learned, remembering and keeping what they’ve learned. These teachings are good in the beginning, good in the middle, and good in the end, meaningful and well-phrased, describing a spiritual practice that’s totally full and pure. They are very learned in such teachings, remembering them, reciting them, mentally scrutinizing them, and comprehending them theoretically.
Both monastic codes have been passed down to them in detail, well analyzed, well mastered, well judged in both the rules and accompanying material.
They’re a good speaker. Their voice is polished, clear, articulate, and expresses the meaning.
They’re able to educate, encourage, fire up, and inspire the community of nuns.
They’re likable and agreeable to most of the nuns.
They have never previously sexually harassed any woman wearing the ocher robe who has gone forth in the Buddha’s name.
They have been ordained for twenty years or more.
A monk with these eight qualities may be agreed on as an adviser for nuns.”
Numbered Discourses
Householders
With Ugga of the Village of Hatthi
At one time the Buddha was staying in the land of the Vajjis at the village of Hatthi.
There the Buddha addressed the mendicants:
“Mendicants, you should remember the householder Ugga of Hatthi as someone who has eight amazing and incredible qualities.”
That is what the Buddha said.
When he had spoken, the Holy One got up from his seat and entered his dwelling.
Then a certain mendicant robed up in the morning and, taking his bowl and robe, went to the home of the householder Ugga of Hatthi, where he sat on the seat spread out.
Then Ugga of Hatthi went up to that mendicant, bowed, and sat down to one side.
The mendicant said to him:
“Householder, the Buddha declared that you have eight amazing and incredible qualities.
What are the eight qualities that he spoke of?”
“Sir, I don’t know
what eight amazing and incredible qualities the Buddha was referring to.
But these eight amazing and incredible qualities are found in me.
Listen and pay close attention, I will speak.”
“Yes, householder,” replied the mendicant.
Ugga of Hatthi said this:
“Sir, when I first saw the Buddha off in the distance I was partying in the Dragon’s Park.
My heart was inspired as soon as I saw him, and I sobered up.
This is the first incredible and amazing quality found in me.
With confident heart I paid homage to the Buddha.
The Buddha taught me step by step, with
a talk on giving, ethical conduct, and heaven.
He explained the drawbacks of sensual pleasures, so sordid and corrupt, and the benefit of renunciation.
And when he knew that my mind was ready, pliable, rid of hindrances, joyful, and confident he explained the special teaching of the Buddhas:
suffering, its origin, its cessation, and the path.
Just as a clean cloth rid of stains would properly absorb dye,
in that very seat the stainless, immaculate vision of the Dhamma arose in me:
‘Everything that has a beginning has an end.’
I saw, attained, understood, and fathomed the Dhamma. I went beyond doubt, got rid of indecision, and became self-assured and independent of others regarding the Teacher’s instructions. Right there I went for refuge to the Buddha, his teaching, and the Saṅgha. And I undertook the five training rules with celibacy as the fifth.
This is the second incredible and amazing quality found in me.
I had four teenage wives.
And I went to them and said:
‘Sisters, I’ve undertaken the five training rules with celibacy as fifth.
If you wish, you may stay here, enjoy my wealth, and do good deeds. Or you can return to your own families.
Or would you prefer if I gave you to another man?’
When I said this, my eldest wife said to me:
‘Master, please give me to such-and-such a man.’
Then I summoned that man. Taking my wife with my left hand and a ceremonial vase with my right, I presented her to that man with the pouring of water.
But I can’t recall getting upset while giving away my teenage wife.
This is the third incredible and amazing quality found in me.
And though my family has wealth,
it’s shared without reserve with ethical people of good character.
This is the fourth incredible and amazing quality found in me.
When I pay homage to a mendicant,
I do so carefully, not carelessly.
If that venerable teaches me the Dhamma,
I listen carefully, not carelessly.
But if they don’t teach me the Dhamma, I teach them.
This is the fifth incredible and amazing quality found in me.
It’s not unusual for deities to come to me when the Saṅgha has been invited and announce:
‘Householder, that mendicant is freed both ways. That one is freed by wisdom. That one is a personal witness. That one is attained to view. That one is freed by faith. That one is a follower of the teachings. That one is a follower by faith. That one is ethical, of good character. That one is unethical, of bad character.’
But while I’m serving the Saṅgha I don’t recall thinking:
‘Let me give this one just a little, and that one a lot.’
Rather, I give impartially.
This is the sixth incredible and amazing quality found in me.
It’s not unusual for deities to come to me and announce:
‘Householder, the Buddha’s teaching is well explained!’
When they say this I say to them:
‘The Buddha’s teaching is well explained, regardless of whether or not you deities say so!’
But I don’t recall getting too excited by the fact that
the deities come to me, and I have a conversation with them.
This is the seventh incredible and amazing quality found in me.
If I pass away before the Buddha, it wouldn’t be surprising if the Buddha declares of me:
‘The householder Ugga of Hatthi is bound by no fetter that might return him to this world.’
This is the eighth incredible and amazing quality found in me.
These eight amazing and incredible qualities are found in me.
But I don’t know
what eight amazing and incredible qualities the Buddha was referring to.”
Then that mendicant, after taking alms-food in Ugga of Hatthi’s home, got up from his seat and left.
Then after the meal, on his return from alms-round, he went to the Buddha, bowed, and sat down to one side.
He informed the Buddha of all he had discussed with the householder Ugga of the village of Hatthi. The Buddha said:
“Good, good, mendicant!
When I declared that the householder Ugga of the village of Hatthi was someone who has eight amazing and incredible qualities, I was referring to the same eight qualities that he rightly explained to you.
You should remember the householder Ugga of Hatthi as someone who has these eight amazing and incredible qualities.”
Numbered Discourses
Earthquakes
At Gāyā Head
At one time the Buddha was staying near Gāyā on Gāyā Head.
There the Buddha addressed the mendicants:
“Mendicants, before my awakening—when I was still not awake but intent on awakening—I perceived light but did not see visions.
Then it occurred to me,
‘What if I were to both perceive light and see visions?
Then my knowledge and vision would become even more purified.’
So after some time, living alone, withdrawn, diligent, keen, and resolute, I perceived light and saw visions.
But I didn’t associate with those deities, converse, or engage in discussion.
Then it occurred to me,
‘What if I were to perceive light and see visions; and associate with those deities, converse, and engage in discussion?
Then my knowledge and vision would become even more purified.’
So after some time … I perceived light and saw visions. And I associated with those deities, conversed, and engaged in discussion.
But I didn’t know which
orders of gods those deities came from.
Then it occurred to me,
‘What if I were to perceive light and see visions; and associate with those deities, converse, and engage in discussion;
and find out which orders of gods those deities come from?
Then my knowledge and vision would become even more purified.’
So after some time … I perceived light and saw visions. And I associated with those deities … And I found out which orders of gods those deities came from.
But I didn’t know what
deeds caused those deities to be reborn there after passing away from here.
So after some time … I found out what
deeds caused those deities to be reborn there after passing away from here.
But I didn’t know what
deeds caused those deities to have such food and such an experience of pleasure and pain.
So after some time … I found out what
deeds caused those deities to have such food and such an experience of pleasure and pain.
But I didn’t know that
these deities have a life-span of such a length.
So after some time … I found out that
these deities have a life-span of such a length.
But I didn’t know whether or not I had previously lived together with those deities.
Then it occurred to me,
‘What if I were to perceive light and see visions; and associate with those deities, converse, and engage in discussion;
and find out which orders of gods those deities come from;
and what deeds caused those deities to be reborn there after passing away from here;
and what deeds caused those deities to have such food and such an experience of pleasure and pain;
and that these deities have a life-span of such a length; and whether or not I have previously lived together with those deities.
Then my knowledge and vision would become even more purified.’
So after some time …
I found out whether or not I have previously lived together with those deities.
As long as my knowledge and vision about the deities was not fully purified from these eight perspectives, I didn’t announce my supreme perfect awakening in this world with its gods, Māras, and Brahmās, this population with its ascetics and brahmins, its gods and humans.
But when my knowledge and vision about the deities was fully purified from these eight perspectives, I announced my supreme perfect awakening in this world with its gods, Māras, and Brahmās, this population with its ascetics and brahmins, its gods and humans.
Knowledge and vision arose in me:
‘My freedom is unshakable; this is my last rebirth; now there’ll be no more future lives.’”
Numbered Discourses
Decline
“These eight things lead to the decline of a mendicant trainee.
What eight?
They relish work, talk, sleep, and company. They don’t guard the sense doors and they eat too much. They relish closeness and proliferation.
These eight things lead to the decline of a mendicant trainee.
These eight things don’t lead to the decline of a mendicant trainee.
What eight?
They don’t relish work, talk, and sleep. They guard the sense doors, and they don’t eat too much. They don’t relish closeness and proliferation.
These eight things don’t lead to the decline of a mendicant trainee.”
Numbered Discourses
Sabbath
First: Winning in This Life
At one time the Buddha was staying near Sāvatthī in the Eastern Monastery, the stilt longhouse of Migāra’s mother.
Then Visākhā, Migāra’s mother, went up to the Buddha, bowed, and sat down to one side.
The Buddha said to her:
“Visākhā, a female who has four qualities is practicing to win in this life, and she succeeds at it.
What four?
It’s when a female is well-organized at work, manages the domestic help, acts lovingly toward her husband, and preserves his earnings.
And how is a female well-organized at work?
It’s when she’s skilled and tireless in doing domestic duties for her husband, such as knitting and sewing. She understands how to go about things in order to complete and organize the work.
That’s how a female is well-organized at work.
And how does a female manage the domestic help?
It’s when she knows what work her husband’s domestic bondservants, employees, and workers have completed, and what they’ve left incomplete.
She knows who is sick, and who is fit or unwell. She distributes to each a fair portion of various foods.
That’s how a female manages the domestic help.
And how does a female act lovingly toward her husband?
It’s when a female would not transgress in any way that her husband would not consider loveable, even for the sake of her own life.
That’s how a female acts lovingly toward her husband.
And how does a female preserve his earnings?
It’s when she ensures that any income her husband earns is guarded and protected, whether money, grain, silver, or gold. She doesn’t overspend, steal, waste, or lose it.
That’s how a female preserves his earnings.
A female who has these four qualities is practicing to win in this life, and she succeeds at it.
A female who has four qualities is practicing to win in the next life, and she succeeds at it.
What four?
It’s when a female is accomplished in faith, ethics, generosity, and wisdom.
And how is a female accomplished in faith?
It’s when a female has faith in the Realized One’s awakening:
‘That Blessed One is perfected, a fully awakened Buddha, accomplished in knowledge and conduct, holy, knower of the world, supreme guide for those who wish to train, teacher of gods and humans, awakened, blessed.’
That’s how a female is accomplished in faith.
And how is a female accomplished in ethics?
It’s when a female doesn’t kill living creatures, steal, commit sexual misconduct, lie, or consume alcoholic drinks that cause negligence.
That’s how a female is accomplished in ethics.
And how is a female accomplished in generosity?
It’s when she lives at home rid of the stain of stinginess, freely generous, open-handed, loving to let go, committed to charity, loving to give and to share.
That’s how a female is accomplished in generosity.
And how is a female accomplished in wisdom?
It’s when a female is wise. She has the wisdom of arising and passing away which is noble, penetrative, and leads to the complete ending of suffering.
That’s how a female is accomplished in wisdom.
A female who has these four qualities is practicing to win in the next life, and she succeeds at it.
She’s organized at work,
and manages the domestic help.
She’s loveable to her husband,
and preserves his wealth.
Faithful, accomplished in ethics,
kind, rid of stinginess,
she always purifies the path
to well-being in lives to come.
And so, a lady in whom
these eight qualities are found
is known as virtuous,
firm in principle, and truthful.
Accomplished in sixteen respects,
complete with the eight factors,
a virtuous laywoman such as she
is reborn in the realm of the Loveable Gods.”
Numbered Discourses
Earthquakes
Noble Expressions
“Mendicants, there are these eight noble expressions.
What eight?
Saying you haven’t seen, heard, thought, or known something, and you haven’t. And saying you’ve seen, heard, thought, or known something, and you have.
These are the eight noble expressions.”
Numbered Discourses
“Mendicants, there are eight causes and reasons that lead to acquiring the wisdom fundamental to the spiritual life, and to its increase, growth, and full development once it has been acquired.
What eight?
It’s when a mendicant lives relying on the Teacher or a spiritual companion in a teacher’s role. And they set up a keen sense of conscience and prudence for them, with warmth and respect.
This is the first cause.
When a mendicant lives relying on the Teacher or a spiritual companion in a teacher’s role—with a keen sense of conscience and prudence for them, with warmth and respect—from time to time they go and ask them questions:
‘Why, sir, does it say this? What does that mean?’
Those venerables clarify what is unclear, reveal what is obscure, and dispel doubt regarding the many doubtful matters.
This is the second cause.
After hearing that teaching they perfect withdrawal of both body and mind.
This is the third cause.
A mendicant is ethical, restrained in the monastic code, conducting themselves well and seeking alms in suitable places. Seeing danger in the slightest fault, they keep the rules they’ve undertaken.
This is the fourth cause.
They’re very learned, remembering and keeping what they’ve learned.
These teachings are good in the beginning, good in the middle, and good in the end, meaningful and well-phrased, describing a spiritual practice that’s entirely full and pure. They are very learned in such teachings, remembering them, reinforcing them by recitation, mentally scrutinizing them, and comprehending them theoretically.
This is the fifth cause.
They live with energy roused up for giving up unskillful qualities and embracing skillful qualities. They’re strong, staunchly vigorous, not slacking off when it comes to developing skillful qualities.
This is the sixth cause.
When in the Saṅgha they don’t engage in motley talk or unworthy talk.
Either they talk on Dhamma, or they invite someone else to do so, or they respect noble silence.
This is the seventh cause.
They meditate observing rise and fall in the five grasping aggregates.
‘Such is form, such is the origin of form, such is the ending of form.
Such is feeling, such is the origin of feeling, such is the ending of feeling.
Such is perception, such is the origin of perception, such is the ending of perception.
Such are choices, such is the origin of choices, such is the ending of choices.
Such is consciousness, such is the origin of consciousness, such is the ending of consciousness.’
This is the eighth cause.
Their spiritual companions esteem them:
‘This venerable lives relying on the Teacher or a spiritual companion in a teacher’s role. They set up a keen sense of conscience and prudence for them, with warmth and respect.
Clearly this venerable knows and sees.’
This quality leads to warmth, respect, esteem, harmony, and unity.
‘This venerable lives relying on the Teacher or a spiritual companion in a teacher’s role, and from time to time they go and ask them questions …
Clearly this venerable knows and sees.’
This quality also leads to warmth, respect, esteem, harmony, and unity.
‘After hearing that teaching they perfect withdrawal of both body and mind.
Clearly this venerable knows and sees.’
This quality also leads to warmth, respect, esteem, harmony, and unity.
‘This venerable is ethical …
Clearly this venerable knows and sees.’
This quality also leads to warmth, respect, esteem, harmony, and unity.
‘This venerable is very learned, remembering and keeping what they’ve learned.
…
Clearly this venerable knows and sees.’
This quality also leads to warmth, respect, esteem, harmony, and unity.
‘This venerable lives with energy roused up …
Clearly this venerable knows and sees.’
This quality also leads to warmth, respect, esteem, harmony, and unity.
‘When in the Saṅgha they don’t engage in motley talk or unworthy talk.
Either they talk on Dhamma, or they invite someone else to do so, or they respect noble silence.
Clearly this venerable knows and sees.’
This quality also leads to warmth, respect, esteem, harmony, and unity.
‘They meditate observing rise and fall in the five grasping aggregates. …
Clearly this venerable knows and sees.’
This quality also leads to warmth, respect, esteem, harmony, and unity.
These are the eight causes and reasons that lead to acquiring the wisdom fundamental to the spiritual life, and to its increase, growth, and full development once it has been acquired.”
Numbered Discourses
First: Mindfulness of Death
At one time the Buddha was staying at Nādika in the brick house.
There the Buddha addressed the mendicants,
“Mendicants!”
“Venerable sir,” they replied.
The Buddha said this:
“Mendicants, when mindfulness of death is developed and cultivated it’s very fruitful and beneficial. It culminates in the deathless and ends with the deathless.
But do you develop mindfulness of death?”
When he said this, one of the mendicants said to the Buddha,
“Sir, I develop mindfulness of death.”
“But mendicant, how do you develop it?”
“In this case, sir, I think:
‘Oh, if I’d only live for another day and night, I’d focus on the Buddha’s instructions and I could really achieve a lot.’
That’s how I develop mindfulness of death.”
Another mendicant said to the Buddha,
“Sir, I too develop mindfulness of death.”
“But mendicant, how do you develop it?”
“In this case, sir, I think:
‘Oh, if I’d only live for another day, I’d focus on the Buddha’s instructions and I could really achieve a lot.’
That’s how I develop mindfulness of death.”
Another mendicant said to the Buddha,
“Sir, I too develop mindfulness of death.”
“But mendicant, how do you develop it?”
“In this case, sir, I think:
‘Oh, if I’d only live for half a day, I’d focus on the Buddha’s instructions and I could really achieve a lot.’
That’s how I develop mindfulness of death.”
Another mendicant said to the Buddha,
“Sir, I too develop mindfulness of death.”
“But mendicant, how do you develop it?”
“In this case, sir, I think:
‘Oh, if I’d only live as long as it takes to eat a meal of alms-food, I’d focus on the Buddha’s instructions and I could really achieve a lot.’
That’s how I develop mindfulness of death.”
Another mendicant said to the Buddha,
“Sir, I too develop mindfulness of death.”
“But mendicant, how do you develop it?”
“In this case, sir, I think:
‘Oh, if I’d only live as long as it takes to eat half a meal of alms-food, I’d focus on the Buddha’s instructions and I could really achieve a lot.’
That’s how I develop mindfulness of death.”
Another mendicant said to the Buddha,
“Sir, I too develop mindfulness of death.”
“But mendicant, how do you develop it?”
“In this case, sir, I think:
‘Oh, if I’d only live as long as it takes to chew and swallow four or five mouthfuls, I’d focus on the Buddha’s instructions and I could really achieve a lot.’
That’s how I develop mindfulness of death.”
Another mendicant said to the Buddha,
“Sir, I too develop mindfulness of death.”
“But mendicant, how do you develop it?”
“In this case, sir, I think:
‘Oh, if I’d only live as long as it takes to chew and swallow a single mouthful, I’d focus on the Buddha’s instructions and I could really achieve a lot.’
That’s how I develop mindfulness of death.”
Another mendicant said to the Buddha,
“Sir, I too develop mindfulness of death.”
“But mendicant, how do you develop it?”
“In this case, sir, I think:
‘Oh, if I’d only live as long as it takes to breathe out after breathing in, or to breathe in after breathing out, I’d focus on the Buddha’s instructions and I could really achieve a lot.’
That’s how I develop mindfulness of death.”
When this was said, the Buddha said to those mendicants:
“The mendicants who develop mindfulness of death by wishing
to live for a day and night …
or to live for a day …
or to live for half a day …
or to live as long as it takes to eat a meal of alms-food …
or to live as long as it takes to eat half a meal of alms-food …
or to live as long as it takes to chew and swallow four or five mouthfuls …
These are called mendicants who live negligently. They slackly develop mindfulness of death for the ending of defilements.
But the mendicants who develop mindfulness of death by wishing
to live as long as it takes to chew and swallow a single mouthful …
or to live as long as it takes to breathe out after breathing in, or to breathe in after breathing out …
These are called mendicants who live diligently. They keenly develop mindfulness of death for the ending of defilements.
So you should train like this:
‘We will live diligently. We will keenly develop mindfulness of death for the ending of defilements.’
That’s how you should train.”
Numbered Discourses
Brief Advice to Gotamī
At one time the Buddha was staying near Vesālī, at the Great Wood, in the hall with the peaked roof.
Then Mahāpajāpatī Gotamī went up to the Buddha, bowed, stood to one side, and said to him:
“Sir, may the Buddha please teach me Dhamma in brief. When I’ve heard it, I’ll live alone, withdrawn, diligent, keen, and resolute.”
“Gotamī, you might know that certain things
lead to passion, not dispassion;
to being fettered, not to being unfettered;
to accumulation, not dispersal;
to more desires, not fewer;
to lack of contentment, not contentment;
to crowding, not seclusion;
to laziness, not energy;
to being burdensome, not being unburdensome.
You should definitely bear in mind that these things are
not the teaching, not the training, and not the Teacher’s instructions.
You might know that certain things
lead to dispassion, not passion;
to being unfettered, not to being fettered;
to dispersal, not accumulation;
to fewer desires, not more;
to contentment, not lack of contentment;
to seclusion, not crowding;
to energy, not laziness;
to being unburdensome, not being burdensome.
You should definitely bear in mind that these things are
the teaching, the training, and the Teacher’s instructions.”
Numbered Discourses
Sabbath
Second: Winning in This Life
“Mendicants, a female who has four qualities is practicing to win in this life, and she succeeds at it.
What four?
It’s when a female is well-organized at work, manages the domestic help, acts lovingly toward her husband, and preserves his earnings.
And how is a female well-organized at work?
It’s when she’s skilled and tireless in doing domestic duties for her husband …
That’s how a female is well-organized at work.
And how does a female manage the domestic help?
It’s when she knows what work her husband’s domestic bondservants, employees, and workers have completed, and what they’ve left incomplete. She knows who is sick, and who is fit or unwell. She distributes to each a fair portion of various foods.
That’s how a female manages the domestic help.
And how does a female act lovingly toward her husband?
It’s when a female would not transgress in any way that her husband would not consider loveable, even for the sake of her own life.
That’s how a female acts lovingly toward her husband.
And how does a female preserve his earnings?
It’s when she tries to guard and protect any income her husband earns …
That’s how a female preserves his earnings.
A female who has these four qualities is practicing to win in this life, and she succeeds at it.
A female who has four qualities is practicing to win in the next life, and she succeeds at it.
What four?
It’s when a female is accomplished in faith, ethics, generosity, and wisdom.
And how is a female accomplished in faith?
It’s when a female has faith in the Realized One’s awakening …
That’s how a female is accomplished in faith.
And how is a female accomplished in ethics?
It’s when a female doesn’t kill living creatures, steal, commit sexual misconduct, lie,
or consume alcoholic drinks that cause negligence.
That’s how a female is accomplished in ethics.
And how is a female accomplished in generosity?
It’s when she lives at home rid of the stain of stinginess, freely generous, open-handed, loving to let go, committed to charity, loving to give and to share.
That’s how a female is accomplished in generosity.
And how is a female accomplished in wisdom?
It’s when a female is wise. She has the wisdom of arising and passing away which is noble, penetrative, and leads to the complete ending of suffering.
That’s how a female is accomplished in wisdom.
A female who has these four qualities is practicing to win in the next life, and she succeeds at it.
She’s organized at work,
and manages the domestic help.
She’s loveable to her husband,
and preserves his wealth.
Faithful, accomplished in ethics,
being kind and rid of stinginess.
She always purifies the path
to well-being in lives to come.
And so, a lady in whom
these eight qualities are found
is known as virtuous,
firm in principle, and truthful.
Accomplished in sixteen respects,
complete with the eight factors,
a virtuous laywoman such as she
is reborn in the realm of the Loveable Gods.”
Numbered Discourses
Desires
There Sāriputta addressed the mendicants:
“Reverends, mendicants!”
“Reverend,” they replied.
Sāriputta said this:
“Reverends, these eight people are found in the world.
What eight?
First, when a mendicant stays secluded, living independently, a desire arises for material possessions.
They try hard, strive, and make an effort to get them.
But material possessions don’t come to them.
And so they sorrow and wail and lament, beating their breast and falling into confusion because they don’t get those material possessions.
This is called a mendicant who lives desiring material possessions. They try hard, strive, and make an effort to get them. But when possessions don’t come to them, they sorrow and lament. They’ve fallen from the true teaching.
Next, when a mendicant stays secluded, living independently, a desire arises for material possessions.
They try hard, strive, and make an effort to get them.
And material possessions do come to them.
And so they become indulgent and fall into negligence regarding those material possessions.
This is called a mendicant who lives desiring material possessions. They try hard, strive, and make an effort to get them. And when possessions come to them, they become intoxicated and negligent. They’ve fallen from the true teaching.
Next, when a mendicant stays secluded, living independently, a desire arises for material possessions.
They don’t try hard, strive, and make an effort to get them.
And material possessions don’t come to them.
And so they sorrow and wail and lament, beating their breast and falling into confusion because they don’t get those material possessions.
This is called a mendicant who lives desiring material possessions. They don’t try hard, strive, and make an effort to get them. But when possessions don’t come to them, they sorrow and lament. They’ve fallen from the true teaching.
Next, when a mendicant stays secluded, living independently, a desire arises for material possessions.
They don’t try hard, strive, and make an effort to get them.
But material possessions do come to them.
And so they become indulgent and fall into negligence regarding those material possessions.
This is called a mendicant who lives desiring material possessions. They don’t try hard, strive, and make an effort to get them. But when possessions come to them, they become intoxicated and negligent. They’ve fallen from the true teaching.
Next, when a mendicant stays secluded, living independently, a desire arises for material possessions.
They try hard, strive, and make an effort to get them.
But material possessions don’t come to them.
But they don’t sorrow and wail and lament, beating their breast and falling into confusion because they don’t get those material possessions.
This is called a mendicant who lives desiring material possessions. They try hard, strive, and make an effort to get them. But when possessions don’t come to them, they don’t sorrow and lament. They haven’t fallen from the true teaching.
Next, when a mendicant stays secluded, living independently, a desire arises for material possessions.
They try hard, strive, and make an effort to get them.
And material possessions do come to them.
But they don’t become indulgent and fall into negligence regarding those material possessions.
This is called a mendicant who lives desiring material possessions. They try hard, strive, and make an effort to get them. But when possessions come to them, they don’t become intoxicated and negligent. They haven’t fallen from the true teaching.
Next, when a mendicant stays secluded, living independently, a desire arises for material possessions.
They don’t try hard, strive, and make an effort to get them.
And material possessions don’t come to them.
But they don’t sorrow and wail and lament, beating their breast and falling into confusion because they don’t get those material possessions.
This is called a mendicant who lives desiring material possessions. They don’t try hard, strive, and make an effort to get them. And when possessions don’t come to them, they don’t sorrow and lament. They haven’t fallen from the true teaching.
Next, when a mendicant stays secluded, living independently, a desire arises for material possessions.
They don’t try hard, strive, and make an effort to get them.
But material possessions do come to them.
But they don’t become indulgent and fall into negligence regarding those material possessions.
This is called a mendicant who lives desiring material possessions. They don’t try hard, strive, and make an effort to get them. And when possessions come to them, they don’t become intoxicated and negligent. They haven’t fallen from the true teaching.
These eight people are found in the world.”
Numbered Discourses
Second: Worthy of Offerings Dedicated to the Gods
“A mendicant with eight factors is worthy of offerings dedicated to the gods, worthy of hospitality, worthy of a religious donation, worthy of veneration with joined palms, and is the supreme field of merit for the world.
What eight?
It’s when a mendicant is ethical, restrained in the code of conduct, with good behavior and supporters. Seeing danger in the slightest fault, they keep the rules they’ve undertaken.
They’re learned, remembering and keeping what they’ve learned. These teachings are good in the beginning, good in the middle, and good in the end, meaningful and well-phrased, describing a spiritual practice that’s totally full and pure. They are very learned in such teachings, remembering them, reciting them, mentally scrutinizing them, and comprehending them theoretically.
They live with energy roused up. They’re strong, staunchly vigorous, not slacking off when it comes to developing skillful qualities.
They live in the wilderness, in remote lodgings.
They prevail over desire and discontent, and live having mastered desire and discontent whenever they arose.
They prevail over fear and dread, and live having mastered fear and dread whenever they arose.
They get the four absorptions—blissful meditations in the present life that belong to the higher mind—when they want, without trouble or difficulty.
They realize the undefiled freedom of heart and freedom by wisdom in this very life. And they live having realized it with their own insight due to the ending of defilements.
A mendicant with these eight factors is worthy of offerings dedicated to the gods, worthy of hospitality, worthy of a religious donation, worthy of veneration with joined palms, and is the supreme field of merit for the world.”
Numbered Discourses
Abbreviated Texts Beginning With Greed
“For insight into greed, eight things should be developed.
What eight?
Right view, right thought, right speech, right action, right livelihood, right effort, right mindfulness, and right immersion.
For insight into greed, these eight things should be developed.”
Numbered Discourses
Sabbath
With Vāseṭṭha on the Sabbath
At one time the Buddha was staying near Vesālī, at the Great Wood, in the hall with the peaked roof.
Then the layman Vāseṭṭha went up to the Buddha, bowed, and sat down to one side.
The Buddha said to him:
“Vāseṭṭha, the observance of the sabbath with its eight factors is very fruitful and beneficial and glorious and effective. …
blameless, they go to a heavenly place.”
When he said this, Vāseṭṭha said to the Buddha:
“If my loved ones—relatives and kin—were to observe this sabbath with its eight factors, it would be for their lasting welfare and happiness.
If all the aristocrats, brahmins, merchants, and workers were to observe this sabbath with its eight factors, it would be for their lasting welfare and happiness.”
“That’s so true, Vāseṭṭha! That’s so true, Vāseṭṭha!
If all the aristocrats, brahmins, merchants, and workers were to observe this sabbath with its eight factors, it would be for their lasting welfare and happiness.
If the whole world—with its gods, Māras and Brahmās, this population with its ascetics and brahmins, gods and humans—were to observe this sabbath with its eight factors, it would be for their lasting welfare and happiness.
If these great sal trees were to observe this sabbath with its eight factors, it would be for their lasting welfare and happiness—if they were sentient.
How much more then a human being!”
Numbered Discourses
The Great Chapter
Going on a Mission
“Mendicants, a mendicant with eight qualities is worthy of going on a mission.
What eight?
It’s a mendicant who learns and educates others. They memorize and help others remember. They understand and help others understand. They’re skilled at knowing what’s on topic and what isn’t. And they don’t cause quarrels.
A mendicant with these eight qualities is worthy of going on a mission.
Having eight qualities Sāriputta is worthy of going on a mission.
What eight?
He learns and educates others. He memorizes and helps others remember. He understands and helps others understand. He’s skilled at knowing what’s on topic and what isn’t. And he doesn’t cause quarrels.
Having these eight qualities Sāriputta is worthy of going on a mission.
They don’t tremble when arriving
at an assembly of fierce debaters.
They don’t miss out any words,
or conceal the instructions.
Their words aren’t poisoned,
and they don’t tremble when questioned.
Such a mendicant
is worthy of going on a mission.”
Numbered Discourses
Householders
With Ugga of Vesālī
At one time the Buddha was staying near Vesālī, at the Great Wood, in the hall with the peaked roof.
There the Buddha addressed the mendicants:
“Mendicants, you should remember the householder Ugga of Vesālī as someone who has eight amazing and incredible qualities.”
That is what the Buddha said.
When he had spoken, the Holy One got up from his seat and entered his dwelling.
Then a certain mendicant robed up in the morning and, taking his bowl and robe, went to the home of the householder Ugga of Vesālī, where he sat on the seat spread out.
Then Ugga of Vesālī went up to that mendicant, bowed, and sat down to one side.
The mendicant said to him:
“Householder, the Buddha declared that you have eight amazing and incredible qualities.
What are the eight qualities that he spoke of?”
“Sir, I don’t know
what eight amazing and incredible qualities the Buddha was referring to.
But these eight amazing and incredible qualities are found in me.
Listen and pay close attention, I will speak.”
“Yes, householder,” replied the mendicant.
Ugga of Vesālī said this:
“Sir, when I first saw the Buddha off in the distance,
my heart was inspired as soon as I saw him.
This is the first incredible and amazing quality found in me.
With confident heart I paid homage to the Buddha.
The Buddha taught me step by step, with a talk on giving, ethical conduct, and heaven.
He explained the drawbacks of sensual pleasures, so sordid and corrupt, and the benefit of renunciation.
And when he knew that my mind was ready, pliable, rid of hindrances, joyful, and confident he explained the special teaching of the Buddhas:
suffering, its origin, its cessation, and the path.
Just as a clean cloth rid of stains would properly absorb dye,
in that very seat the stainless, immaculate vision of the Dhamma arose in me:
‘Everything that has a beginning has an end.’
I saw, attained, understood, and fathomed the Dhamma. I went beyond doubt, got rid of indecision, and became self-assured and independent of others regarding the Teacher’s instructions.
Right there I went for refuge to the Buddha, his teaching, and the Saṅgha. And I undertook the five training rules with celibacy as the fifth.
This is the second incredible and amazing quality found in me.
I had four teenage wives.
And I went to them and said:
‘Sisters, I’ve undertaken the five training rules with celibacy as fifth.
If you wish, you may stay here, enjoy my wealth, and do good deeds. Or you can return to your own families.
Or would you prefer if I gave you to another man?’
When I said this, my eldest wife said to me:
‘Master, please give me to such-and-such a man.’
Then I summoned that man. Taking my wife with my left hand and a ceremonial vase with my right, I presented her to that man with the pouring of water.
But I can’t recall getting upset while giving away my teenage wife.
This is the third incredible and amazing quality found in me.
And though my family has wealth,
it’s shared without reserve with ethical people of good character.
This is the fourth incredible and amazing quality found in me.
When I pay homage to a mendicant,
I do so carefully, not carelessly.
This is the fifth incredible and amazing quality found in me.
If that venerable teaches me the Dhamma,
I listen carefully, not carelessly.
But if they don’t teach me the Dhamma, I teach them.
This is the sixth incredible and amazing quality found in me.
It’s not unusual for deities to come to me and announce:
‘Householder, the Buddha’s teaching is well explained!’
When they say this I say to them:
‘The Buddha’s teaching is well explained, regardless of whether or not you deities say so!’
But I don’t recall getting too excited by the fact that
the deities come to me, and I have a conversation with them.
This is the seventh incredible and amazing quality found in me.
Of the five lower fetters taught by the Buddha, I don’t see any that I haven’t given up.
This is the eighth incredible and amazing quality found in me.
These eight amazing and incredible qualities are found in me.
But I don’t know
what eight amazing and incredible qualities the Buddha was referring to.”
Then that mendicant, after taking alms-food in Ugga of Vesālī’s home, got up from his seat and left.
Then after the meal, on his return from alms-round, he went to the Buddha, bowed, and sat down to one side.
He informed the Buddha of all he had discussed with the householder Ugga of Vesālī. The Buddha said:
“Good, good, mendicant!
When I declared that the householder Ugga of Vesālī was someone who has eight amazing and incredible qualities, I was referring to the same eight qualities that he rightly explained to you.
You should remember the householder Ugga of Vesālī as someone who has these eight amazing and incredible qualities.”
Numbered Discourses
Second: Mindfulness of Death
At one time the Buddha was staying at Nādika in the brick house.
There the Buddha addressed the mendicants:
“Mendicants, when mindfulness of death is developed and cultivated it’s very fruitful and beneficial. It culminates in the deathless and ends with the deathless.
And how is mindfulness of death developed and cultivated to be very fruitful and beneficial, to culminate in the deathless and end with the deathless?
As day passes by and night draws close, a mendicant reflects:
‘I might die of many causes.
A snake might bite me, or a scorpion or centipede might sting me.
And if I died from that it would stop my practice.
Or I might stumble off a cliff, or get food poisoning, or suffer a disturbance of bile, phlegm, or piercing winds. Or I might be attacked by humans or non-humans.
And if I died from that it would stop my practice.’
That mendicant should reflect:
‘Are there any bad, unskillful qualities that I haven’t given up, which might be an obstacle to me if I die tonight?’
Suppose that, upon checking, a mendicant knows that
there are such bad, unskillful qualities. Then in order to give them up they should apply outstanding enthusiasm, effort, zeal, vigor, perseverance, mindfulness, and situational awareness.
Suppose your clothes or head were on fire. In order to extinguish it, you’d apply intense enthusiasm, effort, zeal, vigor, perseverance, mindfulness, and situational awareness.
In the same way, in order to give up those bad, unskillful qualities, that mendicant should apply outstanding enthusiasm …
But suppose that, upon checking, a mendicant knows that
there are no such bad, unskillful qualities. Then that mendicant should meditate with rapture and joy, training day and night in skillful qualities.
Or else, as night passes by and day draws close, a mendicant reflects:
‘I might die of many causes.
A snake might bite me, or a scorpion or centipede might sting me.
And if I died from that it would stop my practice.
Or I might stumble off a cliff, or get food poisoning, or suffer a disturbance of bile, phlegm, or piercing winds. Or I might be attacked by humans or non-humans.
And if I died from that it would stop my practice.’
That mendicant should reflect:
‘Are there any bad, unskillful qualities that I haven’t given up, which might be an obstacle to me if I die today?’
Suppose that, upon checking, a mendicant knows that
there are such bad, unskillful qualities. Then in order to give them up they should apply outstanding enthusiasm, effort, zeal, vigor, perseverance, mindfulness, and situational awareness.
Suppose your clothes or head were on fire. In order to extinguish it, you’d apply intense enthusiasm, effort, zeal, vigor, perseverance, mindfulness, and situational awareness.
In the same way, in order to give up those bad, unskillful qualities, that mendicant should apply outstanding enthusiasm …
But suppose that, upon checking, a mendicant knows that
there are no such bad, unskillful qualities. Then that mendicant should meditate with rapture and joy, training day and night in skillful qualities.
Mindfulness of death, when developed and cultivated in this way, is very fruitful and beneficial. It culminates in the deathless and ends with the deathless.”
Numbered Discourses
Second: Accomplishments
“Mendicants, there are these eight accomplishments.
What eight?
Accomplishment in initiative, protection, good friendship, and balanced finances. And accomplishment in faith, ethics, generosity, and wisdom.
And what is accomplishment in initiative?
It’s when a gentleman earns a living by means such as
farming, trade, raising cattle, archery, government service, or one of the professions.
He understands how to go about these things in order to complete and organize the work.
This is called accomplishment in initiative.
And what is accomplishment in protection?
It’s when a gentleman owns legitimate wealth that he has earned by his own efforts and initiative, built up with his own hands, gathered by the sweat of the brow. He ensures it is guarded and protected, thinking:
‘How can I prevent my wealth from being taken by rulers or bandits, consumed by fire, swept away by flood, or taken by unloved heirs?’
This is called accomplishment in protection.
And what is accomplishment in good friendship?
It’s when a gentleman resides in a town or village. And in that place there are householders or their children who may be young or old, but are mature in conduct, accomplished in faith, ethics, generosity, and wisdom. He associates with them, converses and engages in discussion. And he emulates the same kind of accomplishment in faith, ethics, generosity, and wisdom.
This is called accomplishment in good friendship.
And what is accomplishment in balanced finances?
It’s when a gentleman, knowing his income and expenditure, balances his finances, being neither too extravagant nor too frugal. He thinks, ‘In this way my income will exceed my expenditure, not the reverse.’
It’s like an appraiser or their apprentice who, holding up the scales, knows that it’s low by this much or high by this much.
In the same way, a gentleman, knowing his income and expenditure, balances his finances, being neither too extravagant nor too frugal. He thinks, ‘In this way my income will exceed my expenditure, not the reverse.’
If a gentleman has little income but an opulent life, people will say: ‘This gentleman eats their wealth like a fig-eater!’
If a gentleman has a large income but a spartan life, people will say:
‘This gentleman is starving themselves to death!’
But a gentleman, knowing his income and expenditure, leads a balanced life, neither too extravagant nor too frugal, thinking, ‘In this way my income will exceed my expenditure, not the reverse.’
This is called accomplishment in balanced finances.
And what is accomplishment in faith?
It’s when a gentleman has faith in the Realized One’s awakening:
‘That Blessed One is perfected, a fully awakened Buddha … teacher of gods and humans, awakened, blessed.’
This is called accomplishment in faith.
And what is accomplishment in ethics?
It’s when a gentleman doesn’t kill living creatures, steal, commit sexual misconduct, lie, or consume alcoholic drinks that cause negligence.
This is called accomplishment in ethics.
And what is accomplishment in generosity?
It’s when a gentleman lives at home rid of the stain of stinginess, freely generous, open-handed, loving to let go, committed to charity, loving to give and to share.
This is called accomplishment in generosity.
And what is accomplishment in wisdom?
It’s when a gentleman is wise. He has the wisdom of arising and passing away which is noble, penetrative, and leads to the complete ending of suffering.
This is called accomplishment in wisdom.
These are the eight accomplishments.
They’re enterprising in the workplace,
diligent in managing things,
they balance their finances,
and preserve their wealth.
Faithful, accomplished in ethics,
kind, rid of stinginess,
they always purify the path
to well-being in lives to come.
And so these eight qualities
of a faithful householder
are declared by the one who is truly named
to lead to happiness in both spheres,
welfare and benefit in this life,
and happiness in the next.
This is how, for a householder,
merit grows by generosity.”
Numbered Discourses
Rebirth by Giving
“Mendicants, there are these eight rebirths by giving.
What eight?
First, someone gives to ascetics or brahmins such things as food, drink, clothing, vehicles; garlands, fragrance, and makeup; and bed, house, and lighting.
Whatever they give, they expect something back.
They see a well-to-do aristocrat or brahmin or householder amusing themselves, supplied and provided with the five kinds of sensual stimulation.
It occurs to them:
‘If only, when my body breaks up, after death, I would be reborn in the company of well-to-do aristocrats or brahmins or householders!’
They settle on that idea, concentrate on it and develop it.
As they’ve settled for less and not developed further, their idea leads to rebirth there.
When their body breaks up, after death, they’re reborn in the company of well-to-do aristocrats or brahmins or householders.
But I say that this is only for those of ethical conduct, not for the unethical.
The heart’s wish of an ethical person succeeds because of their purity.
Next, someone gives to ascetics or brahmins …
Whatever they give, they expect something back.
And they’ve heard:
‘The Gods of the Four Great Kings are long-lived, beautiful, and very happy.’
It occurs to them:
‘If only, when my body breaks up, after death, I would be reborn in the company of the Gods of the Four Great Kings!’ …
When their body breaks up, after death, they’re reborn in the company of the Gods of the Four Great Kings.
But I say that this is only for those of ethical conduct, not for the unethical.
The heart’s wish of an ethical person succeeds because of their purity.
Next, someone gives to ascetics or brahmins …
Whatever they give, they expect something back.
And they’ve heard:
‘The Gods of the Thirty-Three …’
‘The Gods of Yama …’
‘The Joyful Gods …’
‘The Gods Who Love to Create …’
‘The Gods Who Control the Creations of Others are long-lived, beautiful, and very happy.’
It occurs to them:
‘If only, when my body breaks up, after death, I would be reborn in the company of the Gods Who Control the Creations of Others!’
They settle on that idea, concentrate on it and develop it.
As they’ve settled for less and not developed further, their idea leads to rebirth there.
When their body breaks up, after death, they’re reborn in the company of the Gods Who Control the Creations of Others.
But I say that this is only for those of ethical conduct, not for the unethical.
The heart’s wish of an ethical person succeeds because of their purity.
Next, someone gives to ascetics or brahmins such things as food, drink, clothing, vehicles; garlands, fragrance, and makeup; and bed, house, and lighting.
Whatever they give, they expect something back.
And they’ve heard:
‘The Gods of Brahmā’s Host are long-lived, beautiful, and very happy.’
It occurs to them:
‘If only, when my body breaks up, after death, I would be reborn in the company of the Gods of Brahmā’s Host!’
They settle on that idea, concentrate on it and develop it.
As they’ve settled for less and not developed further, their idea leads to rebirth there.
When their body breaks up, after death, they’re reborn in the company of the Gods of Brahmā’s Host.
But I say that this is only for those of ethical conduct, not for the unethical.
And for those free of desire, not those with desire.
The heart’s wish of an ethical person succeeds because of their freedom from desire.
These are the eight rebirths by giving.”
Numbered Discourses
First: Worthy of Offerings Dedicated to the Gods
“Mendicants, a mendicant with eight factors is worthy of offerings dedicated to the gods, worthy of hospitality, worthy of a religious donation, worthy of veneration with joined palms, and is the supreme field of merit for the world.
What eight?
It’s when a mendicant is ethical, restrained in the code of conduct, with good behavior and supporters. Seeing danger in the slightest fault, they keep the rules they’ve undertaken.
They’re learned, remembering and keeping what they’ve learned. These teachings are good in the beginning, good in the middle, and good in the end, meaningful and well-phrased, describing a spiritual practice that’s totally full and pure. They are very learned in such teachings, remembering them, reciting them, mentally scrutinizing them, and comprehending them theoretically.
They have good friends, companions, and associates.
They have right view, possessing right perspective.
They get the four absorptions—blissful meditations in the present life that belong to the higher mind—when they want, without trouble or difficulty.
They recollect many kinds of past lives, with features and details.
With clairvoyance that is purified and surpasses the human, they see how sentient beings are reborn according to their deeds.
They realize the undefiled freedom of heart and freedom by wisdom in this very life. And they live having realized it with their own insight due to the ending of defilements.
A mendicant with these eight factors is worthy of offerings dedicated to the gods, worthy of hospitality, worthy of a religious donation, worthy of veneration with joined palms, and is the supreme field of merit for the world.”
Numbered Discourses
Sabbath
With Visākhā on the Sabbath
At one time the Buddha was staying near Sāvatthī in the Eastern Monastery, the stilt longhouse of Migāra’s mother.
Then Visākhā, Migāra’s mother, went up to the Buddha, bowed, and sat down to one side.
The Buddha said to her:
“Visākhā, the observance of the sabbath with its eight factors is very fruitful and beneficial and splendid and bountiful.
And how should it be observed?
It’s when a noble disciple reflects:
‘As long as they live, the perfected ones give up killing living creatures, renouncing the rod and the sword. They are scrupulous and kind, and live full of compassion for all living beings.
I, too, for this day and night will give up killing living creatures, renouncing the rod and the sword. I’ll be scrupulous and kind, and live full of compassion for all living beings.
I will observe the sabbath by doing as the perfected ones do in this respect.’
This is its first factor. …
‘As long as they live, the perfected ones give up high and luxurious beds. They sleep in a low place, either a small bed or a straw mat.
I, too, for this day and night will give up high and luxurious beds. I’ll sleep in a low place, either a small bed or a straw mat.
I will observe the sabbath by doing as the perfected ones do in this respect.’
This is its eighth factor.
The observance of the sabbath with its eight factors in this way is very fruitful and beneficial and splendid and bountiful.
How much so?
Suppose you were to rule as sovereign lord over these sixteen great countries—Aṅga, Magadha, Kāsī, Kosala, Vajjī, Malla, Ceti, Vaṅga, Kuru, Pañcāla, Maccha, Sūrusena, Assaka, Avanti, Gandhāra, and Kamboja—full of the seven kinds of precious things.
This wouldn’t be worth a sixteenth part of the sabbath with its eight factors.
Why is that?
Because human kingship is a poor thing compared to the happiness of the gods.
Fifty years in the human realm is one day and night for the Gods of the Four Great Kings.
Thirty such days make up a month.
Twelve such months make up a year.
The life span of the Gods of the Four Great Kings is five hundred of these divine years.
It’s possible that a woman or man who has observed the eight-factored sabbath will—when their body breaks up, after death—be reborn in the company of the Gods of the Four Great Kings.
This is what I was referring to when I said:
‘Human kingship is a poor thing compared to the happiness of the gods.’
A hundred years in the human realm is one day and night for the Gods of the Thirty-Three.
Thirty such days make up a month.
Twelve such months make up a year.
The life span of the Gods of the Thirty-Three is a thousand of these divine years.
It’s possible that a woman or man who has observed the eight-factored sabbath will—when their body breaks up, after death—be reborn in the company of the Gods of the Thirty-Three.
This is what I was referring to when I said:
‘Human kingship is a poor thing compared to the happiness of the gods.’
Two hundred years in the human realm …
Four hundred years in the human realm …
Eight hundred years in the human realm …
Sixteen hundred years in the human realm is one day and night for the Gods Who Control the Creations of Others.
Thirty such days make up a month.
Twelve such months make up a year.
The life span of the Gods Who Control the Creations of Others is sixteen thousand of these divine years.
It’s possible that a woman or man who has observed the eight-factored sabbath will—when their body breaks up, after death—be reborn in the company of the Gods Who Control the Creations of Others.
This is what I was referring to when I said:
‘Human kingship is a poor thing compared to the happiness of the gods.’
You shouldn’t kill living creatures, or steal,
or lie, or drink alcohol.
Be celibate, refraining from sex,
and don’t eat at night, the wrong time.
Not wearing garlands or applying perfumes,
you should sleep on a low bed, or a mat on the ground.
This is the eight-factored sabbath, they say,
explained by the Buddha, who has gone to suffering’s end.
The moon and sun are both fair to see,
radiating as far as they revolve.
Those shining ones in the sky light up the quarters,
dispelling the darkness as they traverse the heavens.
All of the wealth that’s found in this realm—
pearls, gems, fine beryl too,
horn-gold or mountain gold,
or natural gold dug up by marmots—
they’re not worth a sixteenth part
of the sabbath with its eight factors,
as starlight cannot rival the moon.
So an ethical woman or man,
who has observed the eight-factored sabbath,
having made merit whose outcome is happiness,
blameless, they go to a heavenly place.”
Numbered Discourses
First: Accomplishments
“Mendicants, there are these eight accomplishments.
What eight?
Accomplishment in initiative, protection, good friendship, and balanced finances. And accomplishment in faith, ethics, generosity, and wisdom.
These are the eight accomplishments.
They’re enterprising in the workplace,
diligent in managing things,
they balance their finances,
and preserve their wealth.
Faithful, accomplished in ethics,
kind, rid of stinginess,
they always purify the path
to well-being in lives to come.
And so these eight qualities
of a faithful householder
are declared by the one who is truly named
to lead to happiness in both spheres,
welfare and benefit in this life,
and happiness in lives to come.
This is how, for a householder,
merit grows by generosity.”
Numbered Discourses
Householders
Lost Opportunities
“‘Now is the time! Now is the time!’ So says an uneducated ordinary person. But they don’t know whether it’s time or not.
Mendicants, there are eight lost opportunities for spiritual practice.
What eight?
Firstly, a Realized One has arisen in the world—perfected, a fully awakened Buddha, accomplished in knowledge and conduct, holy, knower of the world, supreme guide for those who wish to train, teacher of gods and humans, awakened, blessed. He teaches the Dhamma leading to peace, extinguishment, awakening, as proclaimed by the Holy One.
But a person has been reborn in hell.
This is the first lost opportunity for spiritual practice.
Furthermore, a Realized One has arisen in the world.
But a person has been reborn in the animal realm. This is the second lost opportunity.
Furthermore, a Realized One has arisen in the world.
But a person has been reborn in the ghost realm. This is the third lost opportunity.
Furthermore, a Realized One has arisen in the world.
But a person has been reborn in one of the long-lived orders of gods. This is the fourth lost opportunity.
Furthermore, a Realized One has arisen in the world.
But a person has been reborn in the borderlands, among strange barbarian tribes, where monks, nuns, laymen, and laywomen do not go. This is the fifth lost opportunity …
Furthermore, a Realized One has arisen in the world. And a person is reborn in a central country. But they have wrong view and distorted perspective:
‘There’s no meaning in giving, sacrifice, or offerings. There’s no fruit or result of good and bad deeds. There’s no afterlife. There’s no obligation to mother and father. No beings are reborn spontaneously. And there’s no ascetic or brahmin who is well attained and practiced, and who describes the afterlife after realizing it with their own insight.’ This is the sixth lost opportunity …
Furthermore, a Realized One has arisen in the world.
And a person is reborn in a central country. But they’re witless, dull, stupid, and unable to distinguish what is well said from what is poorly said.
This is the seventh lost opportunity …
Furthermore, a Realized One has not arisen in the world …
So he doesn’t teach the Dhamma leading to peace, extinguishment, awakening, as proclaimed by the Holy One.
And a person is reborn in a central country. And they’re wise, bright, clever, and able to distinguish what is well said from what is poorly said.
This is the eighth lost opportunity …
There are these eight lost opportunities for spiritual practice.
Mendicants, there is just one opportunity for spiritual practice.
What is that one?
It’s when a Realized One has arisen in the world, perfected, a fully awakened Buddha, accomplished in knowledge and conduct, holy, knower of the world, supreme guide for those who wish to train, teacher of gods and humans, awakened, blessed.
He teaches the Dhamma leading to peace, extinguishment, awakening, as proclaimed by the Holy One.
And a person is reborn in a central country. And they’re wise, bright, clever, and able to distinguish what is well said from what is poorly said.
This is the one opportunity for spiritual practice.
When you’ve gained the human state,
and the true teaching has been so well proclaimed,
if you don’t seize the moment
it’ll pass you by.
For many wrong times are spoken of,
which obstruct the path.
Only on rare occasions
do Realized Ones arise.
If you find yourself in their presence,
so hard to find in the world,
and if you’ve gained a human birth,
and the teaching of the Dhamma;
that’s enough to make an effort,
for a person who loves themselves.
How is the true teaching to be understood
so that the moment doesn’t pass you by?
For if you miss your moment
you’ll grieve when sent to hell.
If you fail to achieve
certainty regarding the true teaching
you’ll regret it for a long time,
like a trader who loses a profit.
A man hindered by ignorance,
a failure in the true teaching,
will long undergo
transmigration through birth and death.
Those who’ve gained the human state
when the true teaching has been so well proclaimed,
and have completed what the Teacher taught—
or will do so, or are doing so now—
have realized the right time in the world
for the supreme spiritual life.
You should live guarded, ever mindful,
not soaked with defilements,
among those restrained ones
who have practiced the path
proclaimed by the Realized One, the one with vision,
and taught by the Kinsman of the Sun.
Having cut off all underlying tendencies
that follow those drifting in Māra’s dominion,
they’re the ones in this world who’ve truly crossed over,
having reached the ending of defilements.”
Numbered Discourses
Grounds for Making Merit
“Mendicants, there are these three grounds for making merit.
What three?
Giving, ethical conduct, and meditation are all grounds for making merit.
First, someone has practiced a little giving and ethical conduct as grounds for making merit, but they haven’t got as far as meditation as a ground for making merit.
When their body breaks up, after death, they’re reborn among disadvantaged humans.
Next, someone has practiced a moderate amount of giving and ethical conduct as grounds for making merit, but they haven’t got as far as meditation as a ground for making merit.
When their body breaks up, after death, they’re reborn among well-off humans.
Next, someone has practiced a lot of giving and ethical conduct as grounds for making merit, but they haven’t got as far as meditation as a ground for making merit.
When their body breaks up, after death, they’re reborn in the company of the Gods of the Four Great Kings.
There, the Four Great Kings themselves have practiced giving and ethical conduct as grounds for making merit to a greater degree than the other gods. So they surpass them in ten respects:
divine life span, beauty, happiness, glory, sovereignty, sights, sounds, smells, tastes, and touches.
Next, someone has practiced a lot of giving and ethical conduct as grounds for making merit, but they haven’t got as far as meditation as a ground for making merit.
When their body breaks up, after death, they’re reborn in the company of the Gods of the Thirty-Three.
There, Sakka, lord of gods, has practiced giving and ethical conduct as grounds for making merit to a greater degree than the other gods. So he surpasses them in ten respects …
Next, someone has practiced a lot of giving and ethical conduct as grounds for making merit, but they haven’t got as far as meditation as a ground for making merit.
When their body breaks up, after death, they’re reborn in the company of the Gods of Yama.
There, the god Suyāma has practiced giving and ethical conduct as grounds for making merit to a greater degree than the other gods. So he surpasses them in ten respects …
Next, someone has practiced a lot of giving and ethical conduct as grounds for making merit, but they haven’t got as far as meditation as a ground for making merit.
When their body breaks up, after death, they’re reborn in the company of the Joyful Gods.
There, the god Santusita has practiced giving and ethical conduct as grounds for making merit to a greater degree than the other gods. So he surpasses them in ten respects …
Next, someone has practiced a lot of giving and ethical conduct as grounds for making merit, but they haven’t got as far as meditation as a ground for making merit.
When their body breaks up, after death, they’re reborn in the company of the Gods Who Love to Create.
There, the god Sunimmita has practiced giving and ethical conduct as grounds for making merit to a greater degree than the other gods. So he surpasses them in ten respects …
Next, someone has practiced a lot of giving and ethical conduct as grounds for making merit, but they haven’t got as far as meditation as a ground for making merit.
When their body breaks up, after death, they’re reborn in the company of the Gods Who Control the Creations of Others.
There, the god Vasavattī has practiced giving and ethical conduct as grounds for making merit to a greater degree than the other gods. So he surpasses them in ten respects:
divine life span, beauty, happiness, glory, sovereignty, sights, sounds, smells, tastes, and touches.
These are the three grounds for making merit.”
Numbered Discourses
Abbreviated Texts Beginning With Greed
“For the complete understanding of greed …
complete ending …
giving up …
fading away …
cessation …
letting go …
these eight things should be developed.”
Numbered Discourses
Mindfulness
Rooted
“Mendicants, if wanderers who follow other paths were to ask:
‘Reverends, all things have what as their root? What produces them? What is their origin? What is their meeting place? What is their chief? What is their ruler? What is their overseer? What is their core?’ How would you answer them?”
“Our teachings are rooted in the Buddha.
He is our guide and our refuge.
Sir, may the Buddha himself please clarify the meaning of this. The mendicants will listen and remember it.”
“Well then, mendicants, I will teach it.
Listen and pay close attention, I will speak.”
“Yes, sir,” they replied.
The Buddha said this:
“Mendicants, if wanderers who follow other paths were to ask:
‘Reverends, all things have what as their root? What produces them? What is their origin? What is their meeting place? What is their chief? What is their ruler? What is their overseer? What is their core?’
You should answer them:
‘Reverends, all things are rooted in desire. Attention produces them. Contact is their origin. Feeling is their meeting place. Immersion is their chief. Mindfulness is their ruler. Wisdom is their overseer. Freedom is their core.’
When questioned by wanderers who follow other paths, that’s how you should answer them.”
Numbered Discourses
Similarity
And then the lay woman Bojjhā … Sirīmā … Padumā … Sutanā … Manujā … Uttarā … Muttā … Khemā … Somā … Rucī … Cundī … Bimbī … Sumanā … Mallikā … Tissā … Tissamātā … Soṇā … Soṇā’s mother … Kāṇā … Kāṇamātā … Uttarā Nanda’s mother … Visākhā Migāra’s mother … the lay woman Khujjuttarā … the lay woman Sāmāvatī … Suppavāsā the Koliyan … the lay woman Suppiyā … the housewife Nakula’s mother …
Numbered Discourses
Sabbath
Anuruddha and the Agreeable Deities
At one time the Buddha was staying near Kosambi, in Ghosita’s Monastery.
Now at that time Venerable Anuruddha had gone into retreat for the day’s meditation.
Then several deities of the Lovable Host went up to Venerable Anuruddha, bowed, stood to one side, and said to him:
“Sir, Anuruddha, we are the deities called ‘Loveable’. We wield authority and control over three things.
We can turn any color we want.
We can get any voice that we want.
We can get any pleasure that we want.
We are the deities called ‘Loveable’. We wield authority and control over these three things.”
Then Venerable Anuruddha thought,
“If only these deities would all turn blue, of blue color, clad in blue, adorned with blue!”
Then those deities, knowing Anuruddha’s thought, all turned blue.
Then Venerable Anuruddha thought,
“If only these deities would all turn yellow …”
“If only these gods would all turn red …”
“If only these gods would all turn white …”
Then those deities, knowing Anuruddha’s thought, all turned white.
Then one of those deities sang, one danced, and one snapped her fingers.
Suppose there was a quintet made up of skilled musicians who had practiced well and kept excellent rhythm. They’d sound graceful, tantalizing, sensuous, lovely, and intoxicating.
In the same way the performance by those deities sounded graceful, tantalizing, sensuous, lovely, and intoxicating.
But Venerable Anuruddha averted his senses.
Then those deities, thinking “Master Anuruddha isn’t enjoying this,” vanished right there.
Then in the late afternoon, Anuruddha came out of retreat and went to the Buddha, bowed, sat down to one side, and told him what had happened, adding:
“How many qualities do females have so that—when their body breaks up, after death—they are reborn in company with the Gods of the Lovable Host?”
“Anuruddha, when they have eight qualities females—when their body breaks up, after death—are reborn in company with the Gods of the Lovable Host.
What eight?
Take the case of a female whose mother and father give her to a husband wanting what’s best for her, out of kindness and compassion. She would get up before him and go to bed after him, and be obliging, behaving nicely and speaking politely.
She honors, respects, esteems, and venerates those her husband respects, such as
mother and father, and ascetics and brahmins.
And when they arrive she serves them with a seat and water.
She’s skilled and tireless in her husband’s household duties, such as knitting and sewing. She understands how to go about things in order to complete and organize the work.
She knows what work her husband’s domestic bondservants, employees, and workers have completed, and what they’ve left incomplete.
She knows who is sick, and who is fit or unwell. She distributes to each a fair portion of various foods.
She ensures that any income her husband earns is guarded and protected, whether money, grain, silver, or gold. She doesn’t overspend, steal, waste, or lose it.
She’s a lay follower who has gone for refuge to the Buddha, his teaching, and the Saṅgha.
She’s ethical.
She doesn’t kill living creatures, steal, commit sexual misconduct, lie, or use alcoholic drinks that cause negligence.
She’s generous.
She lives at home rid of the stain of stinginess, freely generous, open-handed, loving to let go, committed to charity, loving to give and to share.
When they have these eight qualities females—when their body breaks up, after death—are reborn in company with the Gods of the Lovable Host.
She’d never look down on her husband,
who’s always eager to work hard,
always looking after her,
and bringing whatever she wants.
And a good woman never scolds her husband
with jealous words.
Being astute, she reveres
those respected by her husband.
She gets up early, works tirelessly,
and manages the domestic help.
She’s loveable to her husband,
and preserves his wealth.
A lady who fulfills these duties
according to her husband’s desire,
is reborn among the gods
called ‘Loveable’.”
Numbered Discourses
Sabbath
With Nakula’s Mother on the Loveable Gods
At one time the Buddha was staying in the land of the Bhaggas on Crocodile Hill, in the deer park at Bhesakaḷā’s Wood.
Then the housewife Nakula’s mother went up to the Buddha, bowed, and sat down to one side.
The Buddha said to her:
“Nakula’s mother, when they have eight qualities females—when their body breaks up, after death—are reborn in company with the Gods of the Lovable Host.
What eight?
Take the case of a female whose mother and father give her to a husband wanting what’s best for her, out of kindness and compassion. She would get up before him and go to bed after him, and be obliging, behaving nicely and speaking politely.
She honors, respects, esteems, and venerates those her husband respects, such as
mother and father, and ascetics and brahmins.
And when they arrive she serves them with a seat and water.
She’s skilled and tireless in her husband’s household duties, such as knitting and sewing. She understands how to go about things in order to complete and organize the work.
She knows what work her husband’s domestic bondservants, employees, and workers have completed, and what they’ve left incomplete.
She knows who is sick, and who is fit or unwell. She distributes to each a fair portion of various foods.
She ensures that any income her husband earns is guarded and protected, whether money, grain, silver, or gold. She doesn’t overspend, steal, waste, or lose it.
She’s a lay follower who has gone for refuge to the Buddha, his teaching, and the Saṅgha.
She’s ethical.
She doesn’t kill living creatures, steal, commit sexual misconduct, lie, or use alcoholic drinks that cause negligence.
She’s generous. She lives at home rid of the stain of stinginess, freely generous, open-handed, loving to let go, committed to charity, loving to give and to share.
When they have these eight qualities females—when their body breaks up, after death—are reborn in company with the Gods of the Lovable Host.
She’d never look down on her husband,
who’s always eager to work hard,
always looking after her,
and bringing whatever she wants.
And a good woman never scolds her husband
with jealous words.
Being astute, she reveres
those respected by her husband.
She gets up early, works tirelessly,
and manages the domestic help.
She’s loveable to her husband,
and preserves his wealth.
A lady who fulfills these duties
according to her husband’s desire,
is reborn among the gods
called ‘Loveable’.”
Numbered Discourses
At one time the Buddha was staying near Campā on the banks of the Gaggarā Lotus Pond.
Now at that time the mendicants accused a mendicant of an offense.
The accused mendicant dodged the issue, distracted the discussion with irrelevant points, and displayed annoyance, hate, and bitterness.
Then the Buddha said to the mendicants,
“Mendicants, throw this person out!
Throw this person out!
This person should be shown the door.
Why should you be vexed by an outsider?
Take a case where a certain person looks just the same as other good-natured mendicants when going out and coming back, when looking ahead and aside, when bending and extending the limbs, and when bearing the outer robe, bowl and robes.
That is, so long as the mendicants don’t notice his offense.
But when the mendicants notice the offense, they know that he’s
a corrupt ascetic, just useless trash.
When they realize this they send him away.
Why is that?
So that he doesn’t corrupt good-natured mendicants.
Suppose in a growing field of barley some bad barley appeared, just useless trash.
Its roots, stem, and leaves would look just the same as the healthy barley.
That is, so long as the head doesn’t appear.
But when the head appears, they know that it’s
bad barley, just useless trash.
When they realize this they pull it up by the roots and throw it outside the field.
Why is that?
So that it doesn’t spoil the good barley.
In the same way, take a case where a certain person looks just the same as other good-natured mendicants when going out and coming back, when looking ahead and aside, when bending and extending the limbs, and when bearing the outer robe, bowl and robes.
That is, so long as the mendicants don’t notice his offense.
But when the mendicants notice the offense, they know that he’s
a corrupt ascetic, just useless trash.
When they realize this they send him away.
Why is that?
So that he doesn’t corrupt good-natured mendicants.
Suppose that a large heap of grain is being winnowed. The grains that are firm and substantial form a heap on one side. And the grains that are flimsy and insubstantial are blown over to the other side.
Then the owners take a broom and sweep them even further away.
Why is that?
So that it doesn’t spoil the good grain.
In the same way, take a case where a certain person looks just the same as other good-natured mendicants when going out and coming back, when looking ahead and aside, when bending and extending the limbs, and when bearing the outer robe, bowl and robes.
That is, so long as the mendicants don’t notice his offense.
But when the mendicants notice the offense, they know that he’s
a corrupt ascetic, just useless trash.
When they realize this they send him away.
Why is that?
So that he doesn’t corrupt good-natured mendicants.
Suppose a man needs an irrigation gutter for a well. He’d take a sharp axe and enter the wood,
where he’d knock various trees with the axe. The trees that were firm and substantial made a cracking sound.
But the trees that were rotten inside, decomposing and decayed, made a thud.
He’d cut down such a tree at the root, lop off the crown, and thoroughly clear out the insides. Then he’d use it as an irrigation gutter for the well.
In the same way, take a case where a certain person looks just the same as other good-natured mendicants when going out and coming back, when looking ahead and aside, when bending and extending the limbs, and when bearing the outer robe, bowl and robes.
That is, so long as the mendicants don’t notice his offense.
But when the mendicants notice the offense, they know that he’s
a corrupt ascetic, just useless trash.
When they realize this they send him away.
Why is that?
So that he doesn’t corrupt good-natured mendicants.
By living together, know that
they’re irritable, with wicked desires,
offensive, stubborn, and contemptuous,
jealous, stingy, and devious.
They speak to people with a voice
so smooth, just like an ascetic.
But they act in secret, with their bad views
and their lack of regard for others.
You should recognize them for what they are:
a creep and liar.
Then having gathered in harmony,
you should expel them.
Throw out the trash!
Get rid of the rubbish!
And sweep away the scraps—
they’re not ascetics, they just think they are.
When you’ve thrown out those of wicked desires,
of bad behavior and alms-resort,
dwell in communion, ever mindful,
the pure with the pure.
Then in harmony, alert,
make an end of suffering.”
Numbered Discourses
The Great Chapter
A Thoroughbred
“Mendicants, a fine royal thoroughbred with eight factors is worthy of a king, fit to serve a king, and considered a factor of kingship.
What eight?
It’s when a fine royal thoroughbred is well born on both
the mother’s and the father’s sides.
He’s bred in the region fine thoroughbreds come from.
Whatever food he’s given,
fresh or dry,
he eats carefully, without making a mess.
He’s disgusted by sitting or lying down in excrement or urine.
He’s sweet-natured and pleasant to live with, and he doesn’t upset the other horses.
He openly shows his tricks, bluffs, ruses, and feints to his trainer,
so the trainer can try to subdue them.
He carries his load, determining:
‘Whether or not the other horses carry their loads, I’ll carry mine.’
He always walks in a straight path.
He’s strong, and stays strong even until death.
A fine royal thoroughbred with these eight factors is worthy of a king. …
In the same way, a mendicant with eight factors is worthy of offerings dedicated to the gods, worthy of hospitality, worthy of a religious donation, worthy of greeting with joined palms, and is the supreme field of merit for the world.
What eight?
It’s when a mendicant is ethical, restrained in the monastic code, conducting themselves well and seeking alms in suitable places. Seeing danger in the slightest fault, they keep the rules they’ve undertaken.
Whatever food they’re given,
coarse or fine,
they eat carefully, without annoyance.
They're disgusted with bad conduct by way of body, speech, or mind,
and by attainment of the many kinds of unskillful things.
They're sweet-natured and pleasant to live with, and they doesn’t upset the other mendicants.
They openly show their tricks, bluffs, ruses, and feints to their sensible spiritual companions,
so they can try to subdue them.
They do their training, determining:
‘Whether or not the other mendicants do their training, I’ll do mine.’
They always walk in a straight path.
And here the straight path is
right view, right thought, right speech, right action, right livelihood, right effort, right mindfulness, and right immersion.
They’re energetic:
‘Gladly, let my skin, sinews, and bones remain! Let the blood and flesh waste away in my body! I will not stop trying until I have achieved what is possible by human strength, energy, and vigor.’
A mendicant with these eight factors is worthy of offerings dedicated to the gods, worthy of hospitality, worthy of a religious donation, worthy of veneration with joined palms, and is the supreme field of merit for the world.”
Numbered Discourses
Good Enough
There Sāriputta addressed the mendicants:
“Reverends, a mendicant with six qualities is good enough for themselves and others.
A mendicant is quick-witted when it comes to skillful teachings.
They readily memorize the teachings they’ve heard.
They examine the meaning of teachings they’ve memorized.
Understanding the meaning and the teaching, they practice accordingly.
They’re a good speaker. Their voice is polished, clear, articulate, and expresses the meaning.
They educate, encourage, fire up, and inspire their spiritual companions.
A mendicant with these six qualities is good enough for themselves and others.
A mendicant with five qualities is good enough for themselves and others.
What five?
A mendicant is not quick-witted when it comes to skillful teachings.
They readily memorize the teachings they’ve heard.
They examine the meaning of teachings they’ve memorized.
Understanding the meaning and the teaching, they practice accordingly.
They’re a good speaker. Their voice is polished, clear, articulate, and expresses the meaning.
They educate, encourage, fire up, and inspire their spiritual companions.
A mendicant with these five qualities is good enough for themselves and others.
A mendicant with four qualities is good enough for themselves but not for others.
What four?
A mendicant is quick-witted when it comes to skillful teachings.
They readily memorize the teachings they’ve heard.
They examine the meaning of teachings they’ve memorized.
Understanding the meaning and the teaching, they practice accordingly.
They’re not a good speaker. Their voice isn’t polished, clear, articulate, and doesn’t express the meaning.
They don’t educate, encourage, fire up, and inspire their spiritual companions.
A mendicant with these four qualities is good enough for themselves but not for others.
A mendicant with four qualities is good enough for others but not for themselves.
What four?
A mendicant is quick-witted when it comes to skillful teachings.
They readily memorize the teachings they’ve heard.
But they don’t examine the meaning of teachings they’ve memorized.
Understanding the meaning and the teaching, they don’t practice accordingly.
They’re a good speaker. Their voice is polished, clear, articulate, and expresses the meaning.
They educate, encourage, fire up, and inspire their spiritual companions.
A mendicant with these four qualities is good enough for others but not for themselves.
A mendicant with three qualities is good enough for themselves but not for others.
What three?
A mendicant is not quick-witted when it comes to skillful teachings.
They readily memorize the teachings they’ve heard.
They examine the meaning of teachings they’ve memorized.
Understanding the meaning and the teaching, they practice accordingly.
They’re not a good speaker. Their voice isn’t polished, clear, articulate, and doesn’t express the meaning.
They don’t educate, encourage, fire up, and inspire their spiritual companions.
A mendicant with these three qualities is good enough for themselves but not for others.
A mendicant with three qualities is good enough for others but not for themselves.
What three?
A mendicant is not quick-witted when it comes to skillful teachings.
They readily memorize the teachings they’ve heard.
But they don’t examine the meaning of teachings they’ve memorized.
Understanding the meaning and the teaching, they don’t practice accordingly.
They’re a good speaker. Their voice is polished, clear, articulate, and expresses the meaning.
They educate, encourage, fire up, and inspire their spiritual companions.
A mendicant with these three qualities is good enough for others but not for themselves.
A mendicant with two qualities is good enough for themselves but not for others.
A mendicant is not quick-witted when it comes to skillful teachings.
And they don’t readily memorize the teachings they’ve heard.
They examine the meaning of teachings they’ve memorized.
Understanding the meaning and the teaching, they practice accordingly.
They’re not a good speaker. Their voice isn’t polished, clear, articulate, and doesn’t express the meaning.
They don’t educate, encourage, fire up, and inspire their spiritual companions.
A mendicant with these two qualities is good enough for themselves but not for others.
A mendicant with two qualities is good enough for others but not for themselves.
A mendicant is not quick-witted when it comes to skillful teachings.
And they don’t readily memorize the teachings they’ve heard.
Nor do they examine the meaning of teachings they’ve memorized.
Understanding the meaning and the teaching, they don’t practice accordingly.
They’re a good speaker. Their voice is polished, clear, articulate, and expresses the meaning.
They educate, encourage, fire up, and inspire their spiritual companions.
A mendicant with these two qualities is good enough for others but not for themselves.”
Numbered Discourses
Grounds for Laziness and Arousing Energy
“Mendicants, there are eight grounds for laziness.
What eight?
Firstly, a mendicant has some work to do.
They think:
‘I have some work to do.
But while doing it my body will get tired.
I’d better have a lie down.’
They lie down, and don’t rouse energy for attaining the unattained, achieving the unachieved, and realizing the unrealized.
This is the first ground for laziness.
Furthermore, a mendicant has done some work.
They think:
‘I’ve done some work.
But while working my body got tired.
I’d better have a lie down.’
They lie down, and don’t rouse energy for attaining the unattained, achieving the unachieved, and realizing the unrealized.
This is the second ground for laziness.
Furthermore, a mendicant has to go on a journey.
They think:
‘I have to go on a journey.
But while walking my body will get tired.
I’d better have a lie down.’
They lie down, and don’t rouse energy for attaining the unattained, achieving the unachieved, and realizing the unrealized.
This is the third ground for laziness.
Furthermore, a mendicant has gone on a journey.
They think:
‘I’ve gone on a journey.
But while walking my body got tired.
I’d better have a lie down.’
They lie down, and don’t rouse energy for attaining the unattained, achieving the unachieved, and realizing the unrealized.
This is the fourth ground for laziness.
Furthermore, a mendicant has wandered for alms, but they didn’t get to fill up on as much food as they like, rough or fine.
They think:
‘I’ve wandered for alms, but I didn’t get to fill up on as much food as I like, rough or fine.
My body is tired and unfit for work.
I’d better have a lie down.’
They lie down, and don’t rouse energy for achieving the unachieved, attaining the unattained, and realizing the unrealized.
This is the fifth ground for laziness.
Furthermore, a mendicant has wandered for alms, and they got to fill up on as much food as they like, rough or fine.
They think:
‘I’ve wandered for alms, and I got to fill up on as much food as I like, rough or fine.
My body is heavy, unfit for work, like I’ve just eaten a load of beans.
I’d better have a lie down.’
They lie down, and don’t rouse energy for achieving the unachieved, attaining the unattained, and realizing the unrealized.
This is the sixth ground for laziness.
Furthermore, a mendicant feels a little sick.
They think:
‘I feel a little sick.
Lying down would be good for me. I’d better have a lie down.’
They lie down, and don’t rouse energy for achieving the unachieved, attaining the unattained, and realizing the unrealized.
This is the seventh ground for laziness.
Furthermore, a mendicant has recently recovered from illness.
They think:
‘I’ve recently recovered from illness.
My body is weak and unfit for work.
I’d better have a lie down.’
They lie down, and don’t rouse energy for attaining the unattained, achieving the unachieved, and realizing the unrealized.
This is the eighth ground for laziness.
These are the eight grounds for laziness.
There are eight grounds for arousing energy.
What eight?
Firstly, a mendicant has some work to do.
They think:
‘I have some work to do.
While working it’s not easy to focus on the instructions of the Buddhas.
I’d better preemptively rouse up energy for attaining the unattained, achieving the unachieved, and realizing the unrealized.’
They rouse energy for attaining the unattained, achieving the unachieved, and realizing the unrealized.
This is the first ground for arousing energy.
Furthermore, a mendicant has done some work.
They think:
‘I’ve done some work.
While I was working I wasn’t able to focus on the instructions of the Buddhas.
I’d better preemptively rouse up energy for attaining the unattained, achieving the unachieved, and realizing the unrealized.’
They rouse up energy …
This is the second ground for arousing energy.
Furthermore, a mendicant has to go on a journey.
They think:
‘I have to go on a journey.
While walking it’s not easy to focus on the instructions of the Buddhas.
I’d better preemptively rouse up energy …’ …
This is the third ground for arousing energy.
Furthermore, a mendicant has gone on a journey.
They think:
‘I’ve gone on a journey.
While I was walking I wasn’t able to focus on the instructions of the Buddhas.
I’d better preemptively rouse up energy …’ …
This is the fourth ground for arousing energy.
Furthermore, a mendicant has wandered for alms, but they didn’t get to fill up on as much food as they like, rough or fine.
They think:
‘I’ve wandered for alms, but I didn’t get to fill up on as much food as I like, rough or fine.
My body is light and fit for work.
I’d better preemptively rouse up energy …’ …
This is the fifth ground for arousing energy.
Furthermore, a mendicant has wandered for alms, and they got to fill up on as much food as they like, rough or fine.
They think:
‘I’ve wandered for alms, and I got to fill up on as much food as I like, rough or fine.
My body is strong and fit for work.
I’d better preemptively rouse up energy …’ …
This is the sixth ground for arousing energy.
Furthermore, a mendicant feels a little sick.
They think:
‘I feel a little sick.
It’s possible this illness will worsen.
I’d better preemptively rouse up energy …’ …
This is the seventh ground for arousing energy.
Furthermore, a mendicant has recently recovered from illness.
They think:
‘I’ve recently recovered from illness.
It’s possible the illness will come back.
I’d better preemptively rouse up energy for attaining the unattained, achieving the unachieved, and realizing the unrealized.’
They rouse energy for attaining the unattained, achieving the unachieved, and realizing the unrealized.
This is the eighth ground for arousing energy.
These are the eight grounds for arousing energy.”
Numbered Discourses
Mindfulness
A Proclamation of No Confidence
“Mendicants, the lay followers may, if they wish, make a proclamation of no confidence in a mendicant who has eight qualities.
What eight?
They try to prevent the lay people from getting material possessions. They try to harm lay people. They insult and abuse lay people. They divide lay people against each other. They criticize the Buddha, the teaching, and the Saṅgha. They’re seen at an inappropriate place for collecting alms.
The lay followers may, if they wish, make a proclamation of no confidence in a mendicant who has these eight qualities.
The lay followers may, if they wish, make a proclamation of confidence in a mendicant who has eight qualities.
What eight?
They don’t try to prevent the lay people from getting material possessions. They don’t try to harm lay people. They don’t insult and abuse lay people. They don’t divide lay people against each other. They don’t criticize the Buddha, the teaching, and the Saṅgha. They’re not seen at an inappropriate place for collecting alms.
The lay followers may, if they wish, make a proclamation of confidence in a mendicant who has these eight qualities.”
Numbered Discourses
The Great Chapter
At Verañja
So I have heard.
At one time the Buddha was staying in Verañja at the root of a neem tree dedicated to Naḷeru.
Then the brahmin Verañja went up to the Buddha, and exchanged greetings with him.
When the greetings and polite conversation were over, he sat down to one side and said to the Buddha:
“Master Gotama, I have heard that
the ascetic Gotama doesn’t bow to old brahmins, the elderly and senior, who are advanced in years and have reached the final stage of life; nor does he rise in their presence or offer them a seat.
And this is indeed the case,
for Master Gotama does not bow to old brahmins, elderly and senior, who are advanced in years and have reached the final stage of life; nor does he rise in their presence or offer them a seat.
This is not appropriate, Master Gotama.”
“Brahmin, I don’t see anyone in this world—with its gods, Māras, and Brahmās, this population with its ascetics and brahmins, its gods and humans—for whom I should bow down or rise up or offer a seat.
If the Realized One bowed down or rose up or offered a seat to anyone, their head would explode!”
“Master Gotama lacks taste.”
“There is, brahmin, a sense in which you could rightly say
that I lack taste.
For the Realized One has given up taste for sights, sounds, smells, tastes, and touches. It’s cut off at the root, made like a palm stump, obliterated, and unable to arise in the future.
In this sense you could rightly say that I lack taste.
But that’s not what you’re talking about.”
“Master Gotama is indelicate.”
“There is, brahmin, a sense in which you could rightly say
that I’m indelicate.
For the Realized One has given up delight in sights, sounds, smells, tastes, and touches. It’s cut off at the root, made like a palm stump, obliterated, and unable to arise in the future.
In this sense you could rightly say that I’m indelicate.
But that’s not what you’re talking about.”
“Master Gotama is a teacher of inaction.”
“There is, brahmin, a sense in which you could rightly say that
I’m a teacher of inaction.
For I teach inaction regarding bad bodily, verbal, and mental conduct, and the many kinds of unskillful things.
In this sense you could rightly say that I’m a teacher of inaction.
But that’s not what you’re talking about.”
“Master Gotama is a teacher of annihilationism.”
“There is, brahmin, a sense in which you could rightly say that
I’m a teacher of annihilationism.
For I teach the annihilation of greed, hate, and delusion, and the many kinds of unskillful things.
In this sense you could rightly say that I’m a teacher of annihilationism.
But that’s not what you’re talking about.”
“Master Gotama is disgusted.”
“There is, brahmin, a sense in which you could rightly say that
I’m disgusted.
For I’m disgusted by bad conduct by way of body, speech, and mind, and by attainment of the many kinds of unskillful things.
In this sense you could rightly say that I’m disgusted.
But that’s not what you’re talking about.”
“Master Gotama is an exterminator.”
“There is, brahmin, a sense in which you could rightly say that
I’m an exterminator.
For I teach the extermination of greed, hate, and delusion, and the many kinds of unskillful things.
In this sense you could rightly say that I’m an exterminator.
But that’s not what you’re talking about.”
“Master Gotama is a mortifier.”
“There is, brahmin, a sense in which you could rightly say that
I’m a mortifier.
For I say that bad conduct by way of body, speech, and mind should be mortified.
I say that a mortifier is someone who has given up unskillful qualities that should be mortified. They’ve cut them off at the root, made them like a palm stump, obliterated them, so that they’re unable to arise in the future.
The Realized One is someone who has given up unskillful qualities that should be mortified. He has cut them off at the root, made them like a palm stump, obliterated them, so that they’re unable to arise in the future.
In this sense you could rightly say that I’m a mortifier.
But that’s not what you’re talking about.”
“Master Gotama is an abortionist.”
“There is, brahmin, a sense in which you could rightly say that
I’m an abortionist.
I say that an abortionist is someone who has given up future wombs and rebirth into a new state of existence. They’ve cut them off at the root, made them like a palm stump, obliterated them, so that they’re unable to arise in the future.
The Realized One has given up future wombs and rebirth into a new state of existence. He has cut them off at the root, made them like a palm stump, obliterated them, so that they’re unable to arise in the future.
In this sense you could rightly say that I’m an abortionist.
But that’s not what you’re talking about.
Suppose, brahmin, there was a chicken with eight or ten or twelve eggs.
And she properly sat on them to keep them warm and incubated.
Now, the chick that is first to break out of the eggshell with its claws and beak and hatch safely:
should that be called the eldest or the youngest?”
“Master, Gotama, that should be called the eldest.
For it is the eldest among them.”
“In the same way, in this population lost in ignorance, trapped in their shells, I alone have broken open the egg of ignorance and realized the supreme perfect awakening.
So, brahmin, I am the eldest and the first in the world.
My energy was roused up and unflagging, my mindfulness was established and lucid, my body was tranquil and undisturbed, and my mind was immersed in samādhi.
Quite secluded from sensual pleasures, secluded from unskillful qualities, I entered and remained in the first absorption, which has the rapture and bliss born of seclusion, while placing the mind and keeping it connected.
As the placing of the mind and keeping it connected were stilled, I entered and remained in the second absorption, which has the rapture and bliss born of immersion, with internal clarity and confidence, and unified mind, without placing the mind and keeping it connected.
And with the fading away of rapture, I entered and remained in the third absorption, where I meditated with equanimity, mindful and aware, personally experiencing the bliss of which the noble ones declare, ‘Equanimous and mindful, one meditates in bliss.’
With the giving up of pleasure and pain, and the ending of former happiness and sadness, I entered and remained in the fourth absorption, without pleasure or pain, with pure equanimity and mindfulness.
When my mind had immersed in samādhi like this—purified, bright, flawless, rid of corruptions, pliable, workable, steady, and imperturbable—I extended it toward recollection of past lives.
I recollected many kinds of past lives. That is:
one, two, three, four, five, ten, twenty, thirty, forty, fifty, a hundred, a thousand, a hundred thousand rebirths; many eons of the world contracting, many eons of the world expanding, many eons of the world contracting and expanding.
I remembered: ‘There, I was named this, my clan was that, I looked like this, and that was my food.
This was how I felt pleasure and pain, and that was how my life ended.
When I passed away from that place I was reborn somewhere else. There, too, I was named this, my clan was that, I looked like this, and that was my food. This was how I felt pleasure and pain, and that was how my life ended. When I passed away from that place I was reborn here.’ And so I recollected my many kinds of past lives, with features and details.
This was the first knowledge, which I achieved in the first watch of the night.
Ignorance was destroyed and knowledge arose; darkness was destroyed and light arose, as happens for a meditator who is diligent, keen, and resolute.
This was my first breaking out, like a chick breaking out of the eggshell.
When my mind had immersed in samādhi like this—purified, bright, flawless, rid of corruptions, pliable, workable, steady, and imperturbable—I extended it toward knowledge of the death and rebirth of sentient beings.
With clairvoyance that is purified and superhuman, I saw sentient beings passing away and being reborn—inferior and superior, beautiful and ugly, in a good place or a bad place. I understood how sentient beings are reborn according to their deeds:
‘These dear beings did bad things by way of body, speech, and mind.
They spoke ill of the noble ones; they had wrong view; and they acted out of that wrong view.
When their body breaks up, after death, they’re reborn in a place of loss, a bad place, the underworld, hell.
These dear beings, however, did good things by way of body, speech, and mind.
They never spoke ill of the noble ones; they had right view; and they acted out of that right view. When their body breaks up, after death, they’re reborn in a good place, a heavenly realm.’ And so, with clairvoyance that is purified and superhuman, I saw sentient beings passing away and being reborn—inferior and superior, beautiful and ugly, in a good place or a bad place. I understood how sentient beings are reborn according to their deeds.
This was the second knowledge, which I achieved in the middle watch of the night.
Ignorance was destroyed and knowledge arose; darkness was destroyed and light arose, as happens for a meditator who is diligent, keen, and resolute.
This was my second breaking out, like a chick breaking out of the eggshell.
When my mind had immersed in samādhi like this—purified, bright, flawless, rid of corruptions, pliable, workable, steady, and imperturbable—I extended it toward knowledge of the ending of defilements.
I truly understood: ‘This is suffering’ … ‘This is the origin of suffering’ … ‘This is the cessation of suffering’ … ‘This is the practice that leads to the cessation of suffering’.
I truly understood: ‘These are defilements’ … ‘This is the origin of defilements’ … ‘This is the cessation of defilements’ … ‘This is the practice that leads to the cessation of defilements’.
Knowing and seeing like this, my mind was freed from the defilements of sensuality, desire to be reborn, and ignorance.
When it was freed, I knew it was freed.
I understood: ‘Rebirth is ended; the spiritual journey has been completed; what had to be done has been done; there is no return to any state of existence.’
This was the third knowledge, which I achieved in the last watch of the night.
Ignorance was destroyed and knowledge arose; darkness was destroyed and light arose, as happens for a meditator who is diligent, keen, and resolute.
This was my third breaking out, like a chick breaking out of the eggshell.”
When he said this, the brahmin Verañja said to the Buddha:
“Master Gotama is the eldest! Master Gotama is the best!
Excellent, Master Gotama! Excellent!
As if he were righting the overturned, or revealing the hidden, or pointing out the path to the lost, or lighting a lamp in the dark so people with good eyes can see what’s there, Master Gotama has made the teaching clear in many ways.
I go for refuge to Master Gotama, to the teaching, and to the mendicant Saṅgha.
From this day forth, may Master Gotama remember me as a lay follower who has gone for refuge for life.”
Numbered Discourses
Sabbath
With Bojjhā on the Sabbath
At one time the Buddha was staying near Sāvatthī in Jeta’s Grove, Anāthapiṇḍika’s monastery.
Then the laywoman Bojjhā went up to the Buddha, bowed, and sat down to one side.
The Buddha said to her:
“Bojjhā, the observance of the sabbath with its eight factors is very fruitful and beneficial and splendid and bountiful.
And how should it be observed?
It’s when a noble disciple reflects:
‘As long as they live, the perfected ones give up killing living creatures, renouncing the rod and the sword. They are scrupulous and kind, and live full of compassion for all living beings.
I, too, for this day and night will give up killing living creatures, renouncing the rod and the sword. I’ll be scrupulous and kind, and live full of compassion for all living beings.
I will observe the sabbath by doing as the perfected ones do in this respect.’
This is its first factor. …
‘As long as they live, the perfected ones give up high and luxurious beds. They sleep in a low place, either a small bed or a straw mat.
I, too, for this day and night will give up high and luxurious beds. I’ll sleep in a low place, either a small bed or a straw mat.
I will observe the sabbath by doing as the perfected ones do in this respect.’
This is its eighth factor.
The observance of the sabbath with its eight factors in this way is very fruitful and beneficial and splendid and bountiful.
How much so?
Suppose you were to rule as sovereign lord over these sixteen great countries—Aṅga, Magadha, Kāsī, Kosala, Vajjī, Malla, Ceti, Vaṅga, Kuru, Pañcāla, Maccha, Sūrusena, Assaka, Avanti, Gandhāra, and Kamboja—full of the seven kinds of precious things.
This wouldn’t be worth a sixteenth part of the sabbath with its eight factors.
Why is that?
Because human kingship is a poor thing compared to the happiness of the gods.
Fifty years in the human realm is one day and night for the Gods of the Four Great Kings.
Thirty such days make up a month.
Twelve such months make up a year.
The life span of the Gods of the Four Great Kings is five hundred of these divine years.
It’s possible that a woman or man who has observed the eight-factored sabbath will—when their body breaks up, after death—be reborn in the company of the Gods of the Four Great Kings.
This is what I was referring to when I said:
‘Human kingship is a poor thing compared to the happiness of the gods.’
A hundred years in the human realm …
Two hundred years in the human realm …
Four hundred years in the human realm …
Eight hundred years in the human realm …
Sixteen hundred years in the human realm is one day and night for the Gods Who Control the Creations of Others.
Thirty such days make up a month.
Twelve such months make up a year.
The life span of the gods who control the creations of others is sixteen thousand of these divine years.
It’s possible that a woman or man who has observed the eight-factored sabbath will—when their body breaks up, after death—be reborn in the company of the Gods Who Control the Creations of Others.
This is what I was referring to when I said:
‘Human kingship is a poor thing compared to the happiness of the gods.’
You shouldn’t kill living creatures, or steal,
or lie, or drink alcohol.
Be celibate, refraining from sex,
and don’t eat at night, the wrong time.
Not wearing garlands or applying perfumes,
you should sleep on a low bed, or a mat on the ground.
This is the eight-factored sabbath, they say,
explained by the Buddha, who has gone to suffering’s end.
The moon and sun are both fair to see,
radiating as far as they revolve.
Those shining ones in the sky light up the quarters,
dispelling the darkness as they traverse the heavens.
All of the wealth that’s found in this realm—
pearls, gems, fine beryl too,
horn-gold or mountain gold,
or natural gold dug up by marmots—
they’re not worth a sixteenth part
of the mind developed with love,
as starlight cannot rival the moon.
So an ethical woman or man,
who has observed the eight-factored sabbath,
having made merit whose outcome is happiness,
blameless, they go to a heavenly place.”
Numbered Discourses
A Field
“Mendicants, when a field has eight factors a seed sown in it is not very fruitful or rewarding or productive.
What eight factors does it have?
It’s when a field has mounds and ditches. It has stones and gravel. It’s salty. It doesn’t have deep furrows. And it’s not equipped with water inlets, water outlets, irrigation channels, and boundaries.
When a field has these eight factors a seed sown in it is not fruitful or rewarding or productive.
In the same way, when an ascetic or brahmin has eight factors a gift given to them is not very fruitful or beneficial or splendid or bountiful.
What eight factors do they have?
It’s when an ascetic or brahmin has wrong view, wrong thought, wrong speech, wrong action, wrong livelihood, wrong effort, wrong mindfulness, and wrong immersion.
When an ascetic or brahmin has these eight factors a gift given to them is not very fruitful or beneficial or splendid or bountiful.
When a field has eight factors a seed sown in it is very fruitful and rewarding and productive.
What eight factors does it have?
It’s when a field doesn’t have mounds and ditches. It doesn’t have stones and gravel. It’s not salty. It has deep furrows. And it’s equipped with water inlets, water outlets, irrigation channels, and boundaries.
When a field has these eight factors a seed sown in it is very fruitful and rewarding and productive.
In the same way, when an ascetic or brahmin has eight factors a gift given to them is very fruitful and beneficial and splendid and bountiful.
What eight factors do they have?
It’s when an ascetic or brahmin has right view, right thought, right speech, right action, right livelihood, right effort, right mindfulness, and right immersion.
When an ascetic or brahmin has these eight factors a gift given to them is very fruitful and beneficial and splendid and bountiful.
When the field is excellent,
and the seed sown in it is excellent,
and the rainfall is excellent,
the crop of grain will be excellent.
Its health is excellent,
its growth is excellent,
its maturation is excellent,
and its fruit is excellent.
So too, when you give excellent food
to those of excellent ethics,
it leads to many excellences,
for what you did was excellent.
So if a person wants excellence,
let them excel in this.
You should frequent those with excellent wisdom,
so that your own excellence will flourish.
Excelling in knowledge and conduct,
and having excellence of mind,
you perform excellent deeds,
and gain excellent benefits.
Truly knowing the world,
and having attained excellence of view,
one who excels in mind proceeds,
relying on excellence in the path.
Shaking off all stains,
and attaining the excellence of extinguishment,
you’re freed from all sufferings:
this is complete excellence.”
Numbered Discourses
The Benefits of Love
So I have heard.
At one time the Buddha was staying near Sāvatthī in Jeta’s Grove, Anāthapiṇḍika’s monastery.
There the Buddha addressed the mendicants,
“Mendicants!”
“Venerable sir,” they replied.
The Buddha said this:
“Mendicants, you can expect eight benefits when the heart’s release by love has been cultivated, developed, and practiced, made a vehicle and a basis, kept up, consolidated, and properly implemented.
What eight?
You sleep at ease. You wake happily. You don’t see bad dreams. Humans love you. Non-humans love you. Deities protect you. You can’t be harmed by fire, poison, or blade. If you don’t reach any higher, you’ll be reborn in a Brahmā realm.
You can expect these eight benefits when the heart’s release by love has been cultivated, developed, and practiced, made a vehicle and a basis, kept up, consolidated, and properly implemented.
A mindful one who develops
limitless love
weakens the fetters,
seeing the ending of attachments.
Loving just one creature with a hateless heart
makes you a good person.
Compassionate for all creatures,
a noble one creates abundant merit.
The royal potentates conquered this land
and traveled around sponsoring sacrifices—
horse sacrifice, human sacrifice,
the sacrifices of the ‘stick-casting’, the ‘royal soma drinking’, and the ‘unbarred’.
These are not worth a sixteenth part
of the mind developed with love,
as all the constellations of stars
aren’t worth a sixteenth part of the moon’s light.
Don’t kill or cause others to kill,
don’t conquer or encourage others to conquer,
with love for all sentient beings,
you’ll have no enmity for anyone.”
Numbered Discourses
With Dīghajāṇu
At one time the Buddha was staying in the land of the Koliyans, where they have a town named Kakkarapatta.
Then Dīghajāṇu the Koliyan went up to the Buddha, bowed, sat down to one side, and said to the Buddha:
“Sir, we are laypeople who enjoy sensual pleasures and living at home with our children. We use sandalwood imported from Kāsi, we wear garlands, perfumes, and makeup, and we accept gold and money.
May the Buddha please teach us the Dhamma in a way that leads to our welfare and happiness in this life and in future lives.”
“Byagghapajja, these four things lead to the welfare and happiness of a gentleman in this life.
What four?
Accomplishment in initiative, protection, good friendship, and balanced finances.
And what is accomplishment in initiative?
It’s when a gentleman earns a living by means such as
farming, trade, raising cattle, archery, government service, or one of the professions.
He understands how to go about these things in order to complete and organize the work.
This is called accomplishment in initiative.
And what is accomplishment in protection?
It’s when a gentleman owns legitimate wealth that he has earned by his own efforts and initiative, built up with his own hands, gathered by the sweat of the brow.
He ensures it is guarded and protected, thinking:
‘How can I prevent my wealth from being taken by rulers or bandits, consumed by fire, swept away by flood, or taken by unloved heirs?’
This is called accomplishment in protection.
And what is accomplishment in good friendship?
It’s when a gentleman resides in a town or village. And in that place there are householders or their children who may be young or old, but are mature in conduct, accomplished in faith, ethics, generosity, and wisdom. He associates with them, converses and engages in discussion. And he emulates the same kind of accomplishment in faith, ethics, generosity, and wisdom.
This is called accomplishment in good friendship.
And what is accomplishment in balanced finances?
It’s when a gentleman, knowing his income and expenditure, balances his finances, being neither too extravagant nor too frugal. He thinks, ‘In this way my income will exceed my expenditure, not the reverse.’
It’s like an appraiser or their apprentice who, holding up the scales, knows that it’s low by this much or high by this much.
In the same way, a gentleman, knowing his income and expenditure, balances his finances, being neither too extravagant nor too frugal. He thinks, ‘In this way my income will exceed my expenditure, not the reverse.’
If a gentleman has little income but an opulent life, people will say:
‘This gentleman eats their wealth like a fig-eater!’
If a gentleman has a large income but a spartan life, people will say:
‘This gentleman is starving themselves to death!’
But a gentleman, knowing his income and expenditure, leads a balanced life, neither too extravagant nor too frugal, thinking, ‘In this way my income will exceed my expenditure, not the reverse.’
This is called accomplishment in balanced finances.
There are four drains on wealth that has been gathered in this way.
Womanizing, drinking, gambling, and having bad friends, companions, and associates.
Suppose there was a large reservoir with four inlets and four drains.
And someone was to open up the drains and close off the inlets,
and the heavens don’t provide enough rain.
You’d expect that large reservoir to dwindle, not expand.
In the same way, there are four drains on wealth that has been gathered in this way.
Womanizing, drinking, gambling, and having bad friends, companions, and associates.
There are four inlets for wealth that has been gathered in this way.
Not womanizing, drinking, or gambling, and having good friends, companions, and associates.
Suppose there was a large reservoir with four inlets and four drains.
And someone was to open up the inlets and close off the drains,
and the heavens provide plenty of rain.
You’d expect that large reservoir to expand, not dwindle.
In the same way, there are four inlets for wealth that has been gathered in this way.
Not womanizing, drinking, or gambling, and having good friends, companions, and associates.
These are the four things that lead to the welfare and happiness of a gentleman in this life.
These four things lead to the welfare and happiness of a gentleman in future lives.
What four?
Accomplishment in faith, ethics, generosity, and wisdom.
And what is accomplishment in faith?
It’s when a gentleman has faith in the Realized One’s awakening:
‘That Blessed One is perfected, a fully awakened Buddha, accomplished in knowledge and conduct, holy, knower of the world, supreme guide for those who wish to train, teacher of gods and humans, awakened, blessed.’
This is called accomplishment in faith.
And what is accomplishment in ethics?
It’s when a gentleman doesn’t kill living creatures, steal, commit sexual misconduct, lie, or consume alcoholic drinks that cause negligence.
This is called accomplishment in ethics.
And what is accomplishment in generosity?
It’s when a gentleman lives at home rid of the stain of stinginess, freely generous, open-handed, loving to let go, committed to charity, loving to give and to share.
This is called accomplishment in generosity.
And what is accomplishment in wisdom?
It’s when a gentleman is wise. He has the wisdom of arising and passing away which is noble, penetrative, and leads to the complete ending of suffering.
This is called accomplishment in wisdom.
These are the four things that lead to the welfare and happiness of a gentleman in future lives.
They’re enterprising in the workplace,
diligent in managing things,
they balance their finances,
and preserve their wealth.
Faithful, accomplished in ethics,
kind, rid of stinginess,
they always purify the path
to well-being in lives to come.
And so these eight qualities
of a faithful householder
are declared by the one who is truly named
to lead to happiness in both spheres,
welfare and benefit in this life,
and happiness in the future lives.
This is how, for a householder,
merit grows by generosity.”
Numbered Discourses
Householders
Second: Powers
Then Venerable Sāriputta went up to the Buddha, bowed, and sat down to one side.
The Buddha said to him:
“Sāriputta, how many powers does a mendicant who has ended the defilements have that qualify them to claim:
‘My defilements have ended.’”
“Sir, a mendicant who has ended the defilements has eight powers that qualify them to claim:
‘My defilements have ended.’
What eight?
Firstly, a mendicant with defilements ended has clearly seen with right wisdom all conditions as truly impermanent.
This is a power that a mendicant who has ended the defilements relies on to claim:
‘My defilements have ended.’
Furthermore, a mendicant with defilements ended has clearly seen with right wisdom that sensual pleasures are truly like a pit of glowing coals.
This is a power that a mendicant who has ended the defilements relies on to claim:
‘My defilements have ended.’
Furthermore, the mind of a mendicant with defilements ended slants, slopes, and inclines to seclusion. They’re withdrawn, loving renunciation, and they’ve totally done with defiling influences.
This is a power that a mendicant who has ended the defilements relies on to claim:
‘My defilements have ended.’
Furthermore, a mendicant with defilements ended has well developed the four kinds of mindfulness meditation.
This is a power that a mendicant who has ended the defilements relies on to claim:
‘My defilements have ended.’
Furthermore, a mendicant with defilements ended has well developed the four bases of psychic power …
the five faculties …
the seven awakening factors …
the noble eightfold path.
This is a power that a mendicant who has ended the defilements relies on to claim:
‘My defilements have ended.’
A mendicant who has ended the defilements has these eight powers that qualify them to claim:
‘My defilements have ended.’”
Numbered Discourses
The Great Chapter
A Wild Colt
“Mendicants, I will teach you about eight wild colts and eight defects in horses, and about eight wild people and eight defects in people.
Listen and pay close attention, I will speak.”
“Yes, sir,” they replied.
The Buddha said this:
“And what, mendicants, are the eight wild colts and eight defects in horses?
Firstly, when the trainer says ‘giddyup!’ and spurs and goads them on, some wild colts back right up and spin the chariot behind them.
Some wild colts are like that.
This is the first defect of a horse.
Furthermore, when the trainer says ‘giddyup!’ and spurs and goads them on, some wild colts jump back, wreck the hub, and break the triple rod.
Some wild colts are like that.
This is the second defect of a horse.
Furthermore, when the trainer says ‘giddyup!’ and spurs and goads them on, some wild colts shake the cart-pole off their thigh and trample it.
Some wild colts are like that.
This is the third defect of a horse.
Furthermore, when the trainer says ‘giddyup!’ and spurs and goads them on, some wild colts take a wrong turn, sending the chariot off track.
Some wild colts are like that.
This is the fourth defect of a horse.
Furthermore, when the trainer says ‘giddyup!’ and spurs and goads them on, some wild colts rear up and strike out with their fore-legs.
Some wild colts are like that.
This is the fifth defect of a horse.
Furthermore, when the trainer says ‘giddyup!’ and spurs and goads them on, some wild colts ignore the trainer and the goad, spit out the bit, and go wherever they want.
Some wild colts are like that.
This is the sixth defect of a horse.
Furthermore, when the trainer says ‘giddyup!’ and spurs and goads them on, some wild colts don’t step forward or turn back but stand right there still as a post.
Some wild colts are like that.
This is the seventh defect of a horse.
Furthermore, when the trainer says ‘giddyup!’ and spurs and goads them on, some wild colts tuck in their fore-legs and hind-legs, and sit right down on their four legs.
Some wild colts are like that.
This is the eighth defect of a horse.
These are the eight wild colts and the eight defects in horses.
And what are the eight wild people and eight defects in people?
Firstly, the mendicants accuse a mendicant of an offense.
But the accused mendicant evades it by saying they don’t remember.
I say that this person is comparable to the wild colts who, when the trainer says ‘giddyup!’ and spurs and goads them on, back right up and spin the chariot behind them.
Some wild people are like that.
This is the first defect of a person.
Furthermore, the mendicants accuse a mendicant of an offense.
But the accused mendicant objects to the accuser:
‘What has an incompetent fool like you got to say?
How on earth could you imagine you’ve got something worth saying!’
I say that this person is comparable to the wild colts who, when the trainer says ‘giddyup!’ and spurs and goads them on, jump back, wreck the hub, and break the triple rod.
Some wild people are like that.
This is the second defect of a person.
Furthermore, the mendicants accuse a mendicant of an offense.
But the accused mendicant retorts to the accuser:
‘Well, you’ve fallen into such-and-such an offense. You should deal with that first.’
I say that this person is comparable to the wild colts who, when the trainer says ‘giddyup!’ and spurs and goads them on, shake the cart-pole off their thigh and trample it.
Some wild people are like that.
This is the third defect of a person.
Furthermore, the mendicants accuse a mendicant of an offense.
But the accused mendicant dodges the issue, distracts the discussion with irrelevant points, and displays annoyance, hate, and bitterness.
I say that this person is comparable to the wild colts who, when the trainer says ‘giddyup!’ and spurs and goads them on, take a wrong turn, sending the chariot off track.
Some wild people are like that.
This is the fourth defect of a person.
Furthermore, the mendicants accuse a mendicant of an offense.
But the accused mendicant gesticulates while speaking in the middle of the Saṅgha.
I say that this person is comparable to the wild colts who, when the trainer says ‘giddyup!’ and spurs and goads them on, rear up and strike out with their fore-legs.
Some wild people are like that.
This is the fifth defect of a person.
Furthermore, the mendicants accuse a mendicant of an offense.
But the accused mendicant ignores the Saṅgha and the accusation and, though still guilty of the offense, they go wherever they want.
I say that this person is comparable to the wild colts who, when the trainer says ‘giddyup!’ and spurs and goads them on, ignore the trainer and the goad, spit out the bit, and go wherever they want.
Some wild people are like that.
This is the sixth defect of a person.
Furthermore, the mendicants accuse a mendicant of an offense.
But the accused mendicant neither confesses to the offense nor denies it, but frustrates the Saṅgha by staying silent.
I say that this person is comparable to the wild colts who, when the trainer says ‘giddyup!’ and spurs and goads them on, don’t step forward or turn back but stand right there still as a post.
Some wild people are like that.
This is the seventh defect of a person.
Furthermore, the mendicants accuse a mendicant of an offense.
But the accused mendicant says this:
‘Why are you venerables making so much of an issue over me? Now I’ll resign the training and return to a lesser life.’
When they have resigned the training, they say:
‘Well, venerables, are you happy now?’
I say that this person is comparable to the wild colts who, when the trainer says ‘giddyup!’ and spurs and goads them on, tuck in their fore-legs and hind-legs, and sit right down on their four legs.
Some wild people are like that.
This is the eighth defect of a person.
These are the eight wild people and eight defects in people.”
Numbered Discourses
Sabbath
The Sabbath With Eight Factors, In Brief
So I have heard.
At one time the Buddha was staying near Sāvatthī in Jeta’s Grove, Anāthapiṇḍika’s monastery.
There the Buddha addressed the mendicants,
“Mendicants!”
“Venerable sir,” they replied.
The Buddha said this:
“Mendicants, the observance of the sabbath with its eight factors is very fruitful and beneficial and splendid and bountiful.
And how should it be observed?
It’s when a noble disciple reflects:
‘As long as they live, the perfected ones give up killing living creatures, renouncing the rod and the sword. They are scrupulous and kind, and live full of compassion for all living beings.
I, too, for this day and night will give up killing living creatures, renouncing the rod and the sword. I’ll be scrupulous and kind, and live full of compassion for all living beings.
I will observe the sabbath by doing as the perfected ones do in this respect.’
This is its first factor.
‘As long as they live, the perfected ones give up stealing. They take only what’s given, and expect only what’s given. They keep themselves clean by not thieving.
I, too, for this day and night will give up stealing. I’ll take only what’s given, and expect only what’s given. I’ll keep myself clean by not thieving.
I will observe the sabbath by doing as the perfected ones do in this respect.’
This is its second factor.
‘As long as they live, the perfected ones give up unchastity. They are celibate, set apart, avoiding the common practice of sex.
I, too, for this day and night will give up unchastity. I will be celibate, set apart, avoiding the common practice of sex.
I will observe the sabbath by doing as the perfected ones do in this respect.’
This is its third factor.
‘As long as they live, the perfected ones give up lying. They speak the truth and stick to the truth. They’re honest and trustworthy, and don’t trick the world with their words.
I, too, for this day and night will give up lying. I’ll speak the truth and stick to the truth. I’ll be honest and trustworthy, and won’t trick the world with my words.
I will observe the sabbath by doing as the perfected ones do in this respect.’
This is its fourth factor.
‘As long as they live, the perfected ones give up alcoholic drinks that cause negligence.
I, too, for this day and night will give up alcoholic drinks that cause negligence.
I will observe the sabbath by doing as the perfected ones do in this respect.’
This is its fifth factor.
‘As long as they live, the perfected ones eat in one part of the day, abstaining from eating at night and from food at the wrong time.
I, too, for this day and night will eat in one part of the day, abstaining from eating at night and food at the wrong time.
I will observe the sabbath by doing as the perfected ones do in this respect.’
This is its sixth factor.
‘As long as they live, the perfected ones give up dancing, singing, music, and seeing shows; and beautifying and adorning themselves with garlands, fragrance, and makeup.
I, too, for this day and night will give up dancing, singing, music, and seeing shows; and beautifying and adorning myself with garlands, fragrance, and makeup.
I will observe the sabbath by doing as the perfected ones do in this respect.’
This is its seventh factor.
‘As long as they live, the perfected ones give up high and luxurious beds. They sleep in a low place, either a small bed or a straw mat.
I, too, for this day and night will give up high and luxurious beds. I’ll sleep in a low place, either a small bed or a straw mat.
I will observe the sabbath by doing as the perfected ones do in this respect.’
This is its eighth factor.
The observance of the sabbath with its eight factors in this way is very fruitful and beneficial and splendid and bountiful.”
Numbered Discourses
Gifts of a Good Person
“Mendicants, there are these eight gifts of a good person.
What eight?
Their gift is pure, good quality, timely, appropriate, intelligent, and regular. While giving their heart is confident, and afterwards they’re uplifted.
These are the eight gifts of a good person.
He gives pure, good quality, and timely gifts
of appropriate food and drinks
regularly to spiritual practitioners
who are fertile fields of merit.
They never regret
giving away many material things.
Discerning people praise
giving such gifts.
An intelligent person sacrifices like this,
faithful, with a mind of letting go.
Such an astute person is reborn
in a happy, pleasing world.”
Numbered Discourses
The Great Chapter
First: Catching
“Mendicants, a woman catches a man using eight features.
What eight?
With weeping,
appearance,
gifts of wildflowers,
and touches.
A woman catches a man using these eight features.
But those beings who are caught by touch are well and truly caught.”
Numbered Discourses
A Good Person
“Mendicants, a good person is born in a family for the benefit, welfare, and happiness of the people.
For the benefit, welfare, and happiness of mother and father; children and partners; bondservants, workers, and staff; friends and colleagues; departed ancestors; the king; the deities; and ascetics and brahmins.
It’s like a great rain cloud, which nourishes all the crops for the benefit, welfare, and happiness of the people.
In the same way, a good person is born in a family for the benefit, welfare, and happiness of the people. …
A wise person living at home
benefits many people.
Neither by day or at night do they neglect
their mother, father, and ancestors.
They venerate them in accord with the teaching,
remembering what they have done.
One of settled faith and good nature
venerates the homeless renunciates,
the mendicant spiritual practitioners,
knowing their good-hearted qualities.
Good for the king, good for the gods,
and good for relatives and friends.
In fact, they’re good for everyone,
well grounded in the true teaching.
Rid of the stain of stinginess,
they’ll enjoy a world of grace.”
Numbered Discourses
Mindfulness
A Master Thief
“Mendicants, a master thief with eight factors is soon executed, and doesn’t have long to live.
What eight?
He attacks unprovoked. He steals everything without exception. He kills a woman. He rapes a girl. He robs a monk. He robs the royal treasury. He works close to home. He’s not skilled at hiding his booty.
A master thief with these eight factors is soon executed, and doesn’t have long to live.
A master thief with eight factors is not soon executed, and lives long.
What eight?
He doesn’t attack unprovoked. He doesn’t steal everything without exception. He doesn’t kill a woman. He doesn’t rape a girl. He doesn’t rob a monk. He doesn’t rob the royal treasury. He doesn’t work close to home. He’s skilled at hiding his booty.
A master thief with these eight factors is not soon executed, and lives long.”
Numbered Discourses
Earthquakes
Good Enough
“Mendicants, a mendicant with six qualities is good enough for themselves and others.
A mendicant is quick-witted when it comes to skillful teachings.
They readily memorize the teachings they’ve heard.
They examine the meaning of teachings they’ve memorized.
Understanding the meaning and the teaching, they practice accordingly.
They’re a good speaker. Their voice is polished, clear, articulate, and expresses the meaning.
They educate, encourage, fire up, and inspire their spiritual companions.
A mendicant with these six qualities is good enough for themselves and others.
A mendicant with five qualities is good enough for themselves and others.
What five?
A mendicant is not quick-witted when it comes to skillful teachings.
They readily memorize the teachings they’ve heard.
They examine the meaning of teachings they’ve memorized.
Understanding the meaning and the teaching, they practice accordingly.
They’re a good speaker. Their voice is polished, clear, articulate, and expresses the meaning.
They educate, encourage, fire up, and inspire their spiritual companions.
A mendicant with these five qualities is good enough for themselves and others.
A mendicant with four qualities is good enough for themselves but not for others.
What four?
A mendicant is quick-witted when it comes to skillful teachings.
They readily memorize the teachings they’ve heard.
They examine the meaning of teachings they’ve memorized.
Understanding the meaning and the teaching, they practice accordingly.
But they’re not a good speaker. Their voice isn’t polished, clear, articulate, and doesn’t express the meaning.
They don’t educate, encourage, fire up, and inspire their spiritual companions.
A mendicant with these four qualities is good enough for themselves but not for others.
A mendicant with four qualities is good enough for others but not for themselves.
What four?
A mendicant is quick-witted when it comes to skillful teachings.
They readily memorize the teachings they’ve heard.
But they don’t examine the meaning of teachings they’ve memorized.
Understanding the meaning and the teaching, they don’t practice accordingly.
They’re a good speaker. Their voice is polished, clear, articulate, and expresses the meaning.
They educate, encourage, fire up, and inspire their spiritual companions.
A mendicant with these four qualities is good enough for others but not for themselves.
A mendicant with three qualities is good enough for themselves but not for others.
What three?
A mendicant is not quick-witted when it comes to skillful teachings.
They readily memorize the teachings they’ve heard.
They examine the meaning of teachings they’ve memorized.
Understanding the meaning and the teaching, they practice accordingly.
But they’re not a good speaker. Their voice isn’t polished, clear, articulate, and doesn’t express the meaning.
They don’t educate, encourage, fire up, and inspire their spiritual companions.
A mendicant with these three qualities is good enough for themselves but not for others.
A mendicant with three qualities is good enough for others but not for themselves.
What three?
A mendicant is not quick-witted when it comes to skillful teachings.
They readily memorize the teachings they’ve heard.
But they don’t examine the meaning of teachings they’ve memorized.
Understanding the meaning and the teaching, they don’t practice accordingly.
They’re a good speaker. Their voice is polished, clear, articulate, and expresses the meaning.
They educate, encourage, fire up, and inspire their spiritual companions.
A mendicant with these three qualities is good enough for others but not for themselves.
A mendicant with two qualities is good enough for themselves but not for others.
A mendicant is not quick-witted when it comes to skillful teachings.
And they don’t readily memorize the teachings they’ve heard.
But they examine the meaning of teachings they have memorized.
Understanding the meaning and the teaching, they practice accordingly.
They’re not a good speaker. Their voice isn’t polished, clear, articulate, and doesn’t express the meaning.
They don’t educate, encourage, fire up, and inspire their spiritual companions.
A mendicant with these two qualities is good enough for themselves but not for others.
A mendicant with two qualities is good enough for others but not for themselves.
A mendicant is not quick-witted when it comes to skillful teachings.
And they don’t readily memorize the teachings they’ve heard.
Nor do they examine the meaning of teachings they’ve memorized.
Understanding the meaning and the teaching, they don’t practice accordingly.
But they’re a good speaker. Their voice is polished, clear, articulate, and expresses the meaning.
They educate, encourage, fire up, and inspire their spiritual companions.
A mendicant with these two qualities is good enough for others but not for themselves.”
Numbered Discourses
Abbreviated Texts Beginning With Greed
“Of hate …
hostility …
contempt …
stinginess …
deviousness …
obstinacy …
aggression …
arrogance …
for insight into negligence …
complete understanding …
complete ending …
giving up …
fading away …
cessation …
letting go of negligence
these eight things should be developed.”
The Book of the Eights is finished.
Numbered Discourses
Mindfulness
Reconciliation
“Mendicants, the Saṅgha may, if it wishes, perform an act requiring that a mendicant who has eight qualities should pursue reconciliation.
What eight?
They try to prevent the lay people from getting material possessions. They try to harm lay people. They insult and abuse lay people. They divide lay people against each other. They criticize the Buddha, the teaching, and the Saṅgha. They don’t keep a legitimate promise made to a lay person.
The Saṅgha may, if it wishes, perform an act requiring that a mendicant who has eight qualities should pursue reconciliation.
The Saṅgha may, if it wishes, revoke the act requiring that a mendicant who has eight qualities should pursue reconciliation.
What eight?
They don’t try to prevent the lay people from getting material possessions. They don’t try to harm lay people. They don’t insult and abuse lay people. They don’t divide lay people against each other. They don’t criticize the Buddha, the teaching, and the Saṅgha. They keep a legitimate promise made to a lay person.
The Saṅgha may, if it wishes, revoke the act requiring that a mendicant who has eight qualities should pursue reconciliation.”
Numbered Discourses
First: Worldly Conditions
“Mendicants, the eight worldly conditions revolve around the world, and the world revolves around the eight worldly conditions.
What eight?
Gain and loss, fame and disgrace, praise and blame, pleasure and pain.
These eight worldly conditions revolve around the world, and the world revolves around these eight worldly conditions.
Gain and loss, fame and disgrace,
praise and blame, and pleasure and pain.
These qualities among people are impermanent,
transient, and perishable.
A clever and mindful person knows these things,
seeing that they’re perishable.
Desirable things don’t disturb their mind,
nor are they repelled by the undesirable.
Both favoring and opposing
are cleared and ended, they are no more.
Knowing the stainless, sorrowless state,
they understand rightly, going beyond rebirth.”
Numbered Discourses
Mindfulness
With Nāgita
At one time the Buddha was wandering in the land of the Kosalans together with a large Saṅgha of mendicants when he arrived at a village of the Kosalan brahmins named Icchānaṅgala.
He stayed in a forest near Icchānaṅgala.
The brahmins and householders of Icchānaṅgala heard:
“It seems the ascetic Gotama—a Sakyan, gone forth from a Sakyan family—has arrived at Icchānaṅgala. He is staying in a forest near Icchānaṅgala.
He has this good reputation:
‘That Blessed One is perfected, a fully awakened Buddha, accomplished in knowledge and conduct, holy, knower of the world, supreme guide for those who wish to train, teacher of gods and humans, awakened, blessed.’ …
It’s good to see such perfected ones.”
Then, when the night had passed, they took many different foods and went to the forest near Icchānaṅgala, where they stood outside the gates making a dreadful racket.
Now, at that time Venerable Nāgita was the Buddha’s attendant.
Then the Buddha said to Nāgita,
“Nāgita, who’s making that dreadful racket? You’d think it was fishermen hauling in a catch!”
“Sir, it’s these brahmins and householders of Icchānaṅgala. They’ve brought many different foods, and they’re standing outside the gates wanting to offer it specially to the Buddha and the mendicant Saṅgha.”
“Nāgita, may I never become famous. May fame not come to me.
There are those who can’t get the bliss of renunciation, the bliss of seclusion, the bliss of peace, the bliss of awakening when they want, without trouble or difficulty like I can.
Let them enjoy the filthy, lazy pleasure of possessions, honor, and popularity.”
“Sir, may the Blessed One please relent now! May the Holy One relent!
Now is the time for the Buddha to relent.
Wherever the Buddha now goes, the brahmins and householders will incline the same way, as will the people of town and country.
It’s like when it rains heavily and the water flows downhill.
In the same way, wherever the Buddha now goes, the brahmins and householders will incline the same way, as will the people of town and country.
Why is that?
Because of the Buddha’s ethics and wisdom.”
“Nāgita, may I never become famous. May fame not come to me.
There are those who can’t get the bliss of renunciation, the bliss of seclusion, the bliss of peace, the bliss of awakening when they want, without trouble or difficulty like I can.
Let them enjoy the filthy, lazy pleasure of possessions, honor, and popularity.
Even some of the deities can’t get the bliss of renunciation, the bliss of seclusion, the bliss of peace, the bliss of awakening when they want, without trouble or difficulty like I can.
When you all come together to enjoy each other’s company, I think:
‘These venerables mustn’t get the bliss of renunciation, the bliss of seclusion, the bliss of peace, the bliss of awakening when they want, without trouble or difficulty like I can.
That must be because they come together to enjoy each other’s company.’
Take mendicants I see poking each other with their fingers, giggling and playing together.
I think to myself:
‘These venerables mustn’t get the bliss of renunciation, the bliss of seclusion, the bliss of peace, the bliss of awakening when they want, without trouble or difficulty like I can.
That must be because they’re poking each other with their fingers, giggling and playing together.’
Take mendicants I see eat as much as they like until their bellies are full, then indulge in the pleasures of sleeping, lying, and drowsing.
I think to myself:
‘These venerables mustn’t get the bliss of renunciation, the bliss of seclusion, the bliss of peace, the bliss of awakening when they want, without trouble or difficulty like I can.
That must be because they eat as much as they like until their bellies are full, then indulge in the pleasures of sleeping, lying, and drowsing.’
Take a mendicant living in the neighborhood of a village who I see sitting immersed in samādhi.
I think to myself:
‘Now a monastery worker, a novice, or a fellow practitioner will make this venerable fall from immersion.
So I’m not pleased that that mendicant is living in the neighborhood of a village.
Take a mendicant in the wilderness who I see sitting nodding in meditation.
I think to myself:
‘Now this venerable, having dispelled that sleepiness and weariness, will focus just on the unified perception of wilderness.’
So I’m pleased that that mendicant is living in the wilderness.
Take a mendicant in the wilderness who I see sitting without being immersed in samādhi.
I think to myself:
‘Now if this venerable’s mind is not immersed in samādhi they will immerse it; or if it is immersed in samādhi, they will preserve it.’
So I’m pleased that that mendicant is living in the wilderness.
Take a mendicant in the wilderness who I see sitting immersed in samādhi.
I think to myself:
‘Now this venerable will free the unfreed mind or preserve the freed mind.’
So I’m pleased that that mendicant is living in the wilderness.
Take a mendicant who I see living in the neighborhood of a village receiving robes, alms-food, lodgings, and medicines and supplies for the sick.
Enjoying possessions, honor, and popularity they neglect retreat, and they neglect remote lodgings in the wilderness and the forest.
They come down to villages, towns and capital cities and make their homes there.
So I’m not pleased that that mendicant is living in the neighborhood of a village.
Take a mendicant who I see in the wilderness receiving robes, alms-food, lodgings, and medicines and supplies for the sick.
Fending off possessions, honor, and popularity they don’t neglect retreat, and they don’t neglect remote lodgings in the wilderness and the forest.
So I’m pleased that that mendicant is living in the wilderness.
Nāgita, when I’m walking along a road and I don’t see anyone ahead or behind I feel relaxed, even if I need to urinate or defecate.”
Numbered Discourses
With Ujjaya
Then Ujjaya the brahmin went up to the Buddha, and exchanged greetings with him.
When the greetings and polite conversation were over, he sat down to one side and said to the Buddha:
“Master Gotama, we wish to travel abroad.
May the Buddha please teach us the Dhamma in a way that leads to our welfare and happiness in this life and in future lives.”
“Brahmin, these four things lead to the welfare and happiness of a gentleman in this life.
What four?
Accomplishment in initiative, protection, good friendship, and balanced finances.
And what is accomplishment in initiative?
A gentleman may earn a living by means such as
farming, trade, raising cattle, archery, government service, or one of the professions.
He understands how to go about these things in order to complete and organize the work.
This is called accomplishment in initiative.
And what is accomplishment in protection?
It’s when a gentleman owns legitimate wealth that he has earned by his own efforts and initiative, built up with his own hands, gathered by the sweat of the brow.
He ensures it is guarded and protected, thinking:
‘How can I prevent my wealth from being taken by rulers or bandits, consumed by fire, swept away by flood, or taken by unloved heirs?’
This is called accomplishment in protection.
And what is accomplishment in good friendship?
It’s when a gentleman resides in a town or village. And in that place there are householders or their children who may be young or old, but are mature in conduct, accomplished in faith, ethics, generosity, and wisdom. He associates with them, converses and engages in discussion. And he emulates the same kind of accomplishment in faith, ethics, generosity, and wisdom.
This is called accomplishment in good friendship.
And what is accomplishment in balanced finances?
It’s when a gentleman, knowing his income and expenditure, balances his finances, being neither too extravagant nor too frugal. He thinks, ‘In this way my income will exceed my expenditure, not the reverse.’
It’s like an appraiser or their apprentice who, holding up the scales, knows that it’s low by this much or high by this much.
In the same way, a gentleman, knowing his income and expenditure, balances his finances, being neither too extravagant nor too frugal. He thinks, ‘In this way my income will exceed my expenditure, not the reverse.’
If a gentleman has little income but an opulent life, people will say:
‘This gentleman eats their wealth like a fig-eater!’
If a gentleman has a large income but a spartan life, people will say:
‘This gentleman is starving themselves to death!’
But a gentleman, knowing his income and expenditure, leads a balanced life, neither too extravagant nor too frugal, thinking, ‘In this way my income will exceed my expenditure, not the reverse.’
This is called accomplishment in balanced finances.
There are four drains on wealth that has been gathered in this way.
Womanizing, drinking, gambling, and having bad friends, companions, and associates.
Suppose there was a large reservoir with four inlets and four drains.
And someone was to open up the drains and close off the inlets, and the heavens don’t provide enough rain.
You’d expect that large reservoir to dwindle, not expand.
In the same way, there are four drains on wealth that has been gathered in this way.
Womanizing, drinking, gambling, and having bad friends, companions, and associates.
There are four inlets for wealth that has been gathered in this way.
Not womanizing, drinking, or gambling, and having good friends, companions, and associates.
Suppose there was a large reservoir with four inlets and four drains.
And someone was to open up the inlets and close off the drains, and the heavens provide plenty of rain.
You’d expect that large reservoir to expand, not dwindle.
In the same way, there are four inlets for wealth that has been gathered in this way.
Not womanizing, drinking, or gambling, and having good friends, companions, and associates.
These are the four things that lead to the welfare and happiness of a gentleman in this life.
These four things lead to the welfare and happiness of a gentleman in future lives.
What four?
Accomplishment in faith, ethics, generosity, and wisdom.
And what is accomplishment in faith?
It’s when a gentleman has faith in the Realized One’s awakening:
‘That Blessed One is perfected, a fully awakened Buddha, accomplished in knowledge and conduct, holy, knower of the world, supreme guide for those who wish to train, teacher of gods and humans, awakened, blessed.’
This is called accomplishment in faith.
And what is accomplishment in ethics?
It’s when a gentleman doesn’t kill living creatures, steal, commit sexual misconduct, lie, or consume alcoholic drinks that cause negligence.
This is called accomplishment in ethics.
And what is accomplishment in generosity?
It’s when a gentleman lives at home rid of the stain of stinginess, freely generous, open-handed, loving to let go, committed to charity, loving to give and to share.
This is called accomplishment in generosity.
And what is accomplishment in wisdom?
It’s when a gentleman is wise. He has the wisdom of arising and passing away which is noble, penetrative, and leads to the complete ending of suffering.
This is called accomplishment in wisdom.
These are the four things that lead to the welfare and happiness of a gentleman in future lives.
They’re enterprising in the workplace,
diligent in managing things,
they balance their finances,
and preserve their wealth.
Faithful, accomplished in ethics,
kind, rid of stinginess,
they always purify the path
to well-being in lives to come.
And so these eight qualities
of a faithful householder
are declared by the one who is truly named
to lead to happiness in both spheres,
welfare and benefit in this life,
and happiness in the next.
This is how, for a householder,
merit grows by generosity.”
Numbered Discourses
Uttara on Failure
At one time Venerable Uttara was staying on the Saṅkheyyaka Mountain in the Mahisa region near Dhavajālikā.
There Uttara addressed the mendicants:
“Mendicants, it’s good for a mendicant to check their own failings from time to time.
It’s good for a mendicant to check the failings of others from time to time.
It’s good for a mendicant to check their own successes from time to time.
It’s good for a mendicant to check the successes of others from time to time.”
Now at that time the great king Vessavaṇa was on his way from the north to the south on some business.
He heard Venerable Uttara teaching this to the mendicants on Saṅkheyyaka Mountain.
Then Vessavaṇa vanished from Saṅkheyyaka Mountain and appeared among the gods of the Thirty-Three, as easily as a strong person would extend or contract their arm.
Then he went up to Sakka, lord of gods, and said to him:
“Please sir, you should know this.
Venerable Uttara is teaching the mendicants on Saṅkheyyaka Mountain in this way:
‘It’s good for a mendicant from time to time to check their own failings. …
the failings of others …
their own successes …
the successes of others.’
Then, as easily as a strong person would extend or contract their arm, Sakka vanished from the gods of the Thirty-Three and reappeared on Saṅkheyyaka Mountain in front of Venerable Uttara.
Then Sakka went up to Venerable Uttara, bowed, stood to one side, and said to him:
“Is it really true, sir, that you teach the mendicants in this way:
‘It’s good for a mendicant from time to time to check their own failings …
the failings of others …
their own successes …
the successes of others’?”
“Indeed, lord of gods.”
“Sir, did this teaching come to you from your own inspiration, or was it spoken by the Blessed One, the perfected one, the fully awakened Buddha?”
“Well then, lord of gods, I shall give you a simile.
For by means of a simile some sensible people understand the meaning of what is said.
Suppose there was a large heap of grain not far from a town or village.
And a large crowd were to take away grain
with carrying poles, baskets, hip sacks, or their cupped hands.
If someone were to go to that crowd and ask them
where they got the grain from, how should that crowd rightly reply?”
“Sir, they should reply that they took it from the large heap of grain.”
“In the same way, lord of gods, whatever is well spoken is spoken by the Blessed One, the perfected one, the fully awakened Buddha.
Both myself and others rely completely on that when we speak.”
“It’s incredible, sir, it’s amazing!
How well this was said by Venerable Uttara!
‘Whatever is well spoken is spoken by the Blessed One, the perfected one, the fully awakened Buddha.
Both myself and others rely completely on that when we speak.’
At one time the Buddha was staying near Rājagaha, on the Vulture’s Peak Mountain, not long after Devadatta had left.
There the Buddha spoke to the mendicants about Devadatta:
‘Mendicants, it’s good for a mendicant from time to time to check their own failings …
the failings of others …
their own successes …
the successes of others.
Overcome and overwhelmed by eight things that oppose the true teaching, Devadatta is going to a place of loss, to hell, there to remain for an eon, irredeemable.
What eight?
Overcome and overwhelmed by gain …
disgrace …
dishonor …
wicked desires …
bad friendship, Devadatta is going to a place of loss, to hell, there to remain for an eon, irredeemable.
Overcome and overwhelmed by these eight things that oppose the true teaching, Devadatta is going to a place of loss, to hell, there to remain for an eon, irredeemable.
It’s good for a mendicant, whenever they encounter it, to overcome gain …
disgrace …
dishonor …
wicked desires …
bad friendship.
What advantage does a mendicant gain by overcoming these eight things?
The distressing and feverish defilements that might arise in someone who lives without overcoming these eight things do not arise when they have overcome them.
This is the advantage that a mendicant gains by overcoming these eight things.
So you should train like this:
“Whenever we encounter it, we will overcome gain …
disgrace …
dishonor …
wicked desires …
bad friendship.”
That’s how you should train.’
Sir, Uttara, this exposition of the teaching is not established anywhere in the four assemblies—
monks, nuns, laymen, and laywomen.
Sir, learn this exposition of the teaching!
Memorize this exposition of the teaching!
Remember this exposition of the teaching!
Sir, this exposition of the teaching is beneficial and relates to the fundamentals of the spiritual life.”
Numbered Discourses
Second: Disliked
“Mendicants, a mendicant with eight qualities is disliked and disapproved by their spiritual companions, not respected or admired.
What eight?
It’s when a mendicant desires material possessions, honor, and to be looked up to. They know neither moderation nor the proper time. Their conduct is impure, they talk a lot, and they insult and abuse their spiritual companions.
A mendicant with these eight qualities is disliked and disapproved by their spiritual companions, not respected or admired.
A mendicant with eight qualities is liked and approved by their spiritual companions, and respected and admired.
What eight?
It’s when a mendicant doesn’t desire material possessions, honor, and to be looked up to. They know moderation and the proper time. Their conduct is pure, they don’t talk a lot, and they don’t insult and abuse their spiritual companions.
A mendicant with these eight qualities is liked and approved by their spiritual companions, and respected and admired.”
Numbered Discourses
Earthquakes
Desire
“Mendicants, there are eight kinds of people found in the world.
What eight?
First, when a mendicant stays secluded, living independently, a desire arises for material possessions.
They try hard, strive, and make an effort to get them.
But material possessions don’t come to them.
And so they sorrow and wail and lament, beating their breast and falling into confusion because they don’t get those material possessions.
This is called
a mendicant who lives desiring material possessions. They try hard, strive, and make an effort to get them. But when possessions don’t come to them, they sorrow and lament. They’ve fallen from the true teaching.
Next, when a mendicant stays secluded, living independently, a desire arises for material possessions.
They try hard, strive, and make an effort to get them.
And material possessions do come to them.
And so they become indulgent and fall into negligence regarding those material possessions.
This is called
a mendicant who lives desiring material possessions. They try hard, strive, and make an effort to get them. And when possessions come to them, they become intoxicated and negligent. They’ve fallen from the true teaching.
Next, when a mendicant stays secluded, living independently, a desire arises for material possessions.
They don’t try hard, strive, and make an effort to get them.
And material possessions don’t come to them.
And so they sorrow and wail and lament, beating their breast and falling into confusion because they don’t get those material possessions.
This is called
a mendicant who lives desiring material possessions. They don’t try hard, strive, and make an effort to get them. And when possessions don’t come to them, they sorrow and lament. They’ve fallen from the true teaching.
Next, when a mendicant stays secluded, living independently, a desire arises for material possessions.
They don’t try hard, strive, and make an effort to get them.
But material possessions do come to them.
And so they become indulgent and fall into negligence regarding those material possessions.
This is called
a mendicant who lives desiring material possessions. They don’t try hard, strive, and make an effort to get them. But when possessions come to them, they become intoxicated and negligent. They’ve fallen from the true teaching.
Next, when a mendicant stays secluded, living independently, a desire arises for material possessions.
They try hard, strive, and make an effort to get them.
But material possessions don’t come to them.
But they don’t sorrow and wail and lament, beating their breast and falling into confusion because they don’t get those material possessions.
This is called
a mendicant who lives desiring material possessions. They try hard, strive, and make an effort to get them. But when possessions don’t come to them, they don’t sorrow and lament. They haven’t fallen from the true teaching.
Next, when a mendicant stays secluded, living independently, a desire arises for material possessions.
They try hard, strive, and make an effort to get them.
And material possessions do come to them.
But they don’t become indulgent and fall into negligence regarding those material possessions.
This is called
a mendicant who lives desiring material possessions. They try hard, strive, and make an effort to get them. But when possessions come to them, they don’t become intoxicated and negligent. They haven’t fallen from the true teaching.
Next, when a mendicant stays secluded, living independently, a desire arises for material possessions.
They don’t try hard, strive, and make an effort to get them.
And material possessions don’t come to them.
But they don’t sorrow and wail and lament, beating their breast and falling into confusion because they don’t get those material possessions.
This is called
a mendicant who lives desiring material possessions. They don’t try hard, strive, and make an effort to get them. And when possessions don’t come to them, they don’t sorrow and lament. They haven’t fallen from the true teaching.
Next, when a mendicant stays secluded, living independently, a desire arises for material possessions.
They don’t try hard, strive, and make an effort to get them.
But material possessions do come to them.
But they don’t become indulgent and fall into negligence regarding those material possessions.
This is called
a mendicant who lives desiring material possessions. They don’t try hard, strive, and make an effort to get them. And when possessions come to them, they don’t become intoxicated and negligent. They haven’t fallen from the true teaching.
These are the eight people found in the world.”
Numbered Discourses
Earthquakes
A Teaching in Brief
Then a mendicant went up to the Buddha, bowed, sat down to one side, and said to him,
“Sir, may the Buddha please teach me Dhamma in brief. When I’ve heard it, I’ll live alone, withdrawn, diligent, keen, and resolute.”
“This is exactly how some foolish people ask me for something.
But when the teaching has been explained they think only of following me around.”
“Sir, may the Buddha please teach me Dhamma in brief! May the Holy One teach me the Dhamma in brief! Hopefully I can understand the meaning of what the Buddha says! Hopefully I can be an heir of the Buddha’s teaching!”
“Well then, mendicant, you should train like this:
‘My mind will be steady and well settled internally. And bad, unskillful qualities that have arisen will not occupy my mind.’
That’s how you should train.
When your mind is steady and well settled internally, and bad, unskillful qualities that have arisen don’t occupy your mind, then you should train like this:
‘I will develop the heart’s release by love. I’ll cultivate it, make it my vehicle and my basis, keep it up, consolidate it, and properly implement it.’
That’s how you should train.
When this immersion is well developed and cultivated in this way, you should develop it while placing the mind and keeping it connected. You should develop it without placing the mind, but just keeping it connected. You should develop it without placing the mind or keeping it connected. You should develop it with rapture. You should develop it without rapture. You should develop it with pleasure. You should develop it with equanimity.
When this immersion is well developed and cultivated in this way, you should train like this:
‘I will develop the heart’s release by compassion …’ …
‘I will develop the heart’s release by rejoicing …’ …
‘I will develop the heart’s release by equanimity. I’ll cultivate it, make it my vehicle and my basis, keep it up, consolidate it, and properly implement it.’
That’s how you should train.
When this immersion is well developed and cultivated in this way, you should develop it while placing the mind and keeping it connected. You should develop it without placing the mind, but just keeping it connected. You should develop it without placing the mind or keeping it connected. You should develop it with rapture. You should develop it without rapture. You should develop it with pleasure. You should develop it with equanimity.
When this immersion is well developed and cultivated in this way, you should train like this:
‘I’ll meditate observing an aspect of the body—keen, aware, and mindful, rid of desire and aversion for the world.’
That’s how you should train.
When this immersion is well developed and cultivated in this way, you should develop it while placing the mind and keeping it connected. You should develop it without placing the mind, but just keeping it connected. You should develop it without placing the mind or keeping it connected. You should develop it with rapture. You should develop it without rapture. You should develop it with pleasure. You should develop it with equanimity.
When this immersion is well developed and cultivated in this way, you should train like this:
‘I’ll meditate on an aspect of feelings …’ …
‘I’ll meditate on an aspect of principles—keen, aware, and mindful, rid of desire and aversion for the world.’
That’s how you should train.
When this immersion is well developed and cultivated in this way, you should develop it while placing the mind and keeping it connected. You should develop it without placing the mind, but just keeping it connected. You should develop it without placing the mind or keeping it connected. You should develop it with rapture. You should develop it without rapture. You should develop it with pleasure. You should develop it with equanimity.
When this immersion is well developed and cultivated in this way, wherever you walk, you’ll walk comfortably. Wherever you stand, you’ll stand comfortably. Wherever you sit, you’ll sit comfortably. Wherever you lie down, you’ll lie down comfortably.”
When that mendicant had been given this advice by the Buddha, he got up from his seat, bowed, and respectfully circled the Buddha, keeping him on his right, before leaving.
Then that mendicant, living alone, withdrawn, diligent, keen, and resolute, soon realized the supreme culmination of the spiritual path in this very life. He lived having achieved with his own insight the goal for which gentlemen rightly go forth from the lay life to homelessness.
He understood: “Rebirth is ended; the spiritual journey has been completed; what had to be done has been done; there is no return to any state of existence.”
And that mendicant became one of the perfected.
Numbered Discourses
Second: Eight People
“Mendicants, these eight people are worthy of offerings dedicated to the gods, worthy of hospitality, worthy of a religious donation, worthy of greeting with joined palms, and are the supreme field of merit for the world.
What eight?
The stream-enterer and the one practicing to realize the fruit of stream-entry. The once-returner and the one practicing to realize the fruit of once-return. The non-returner and the one practicing to realize the fruit of non-return. The perfected one, and the one practicing for perfection.
These are the eight people who are worthy of offerings dedicated to the gods, worthy of hospitality, worthy of a religious donation, worthy of greeting with joined palms, and are the supreme field of merit for the world.
Four practicing the path,
and four established in the fruit.
This is the exalted Saṅgha,
the eight people among sentient beings.
For humans, those merit-seeking creatures,
who sponsor sacrifices,
making worldly merit,
what’s given here is very fruitful.”
Numbered Discourses
Earthquakes
Assemblies
“Mendicants, there are these eight assemblies.
What eight?
The assemblies of aristocrats, brahmins, householders, and ascetics. An assembly of the gods under the Four Great Kings. An assembly of the gods under the Thirty-Three. An assembly of Māras. An assembly of Brahmās.
I recall having approached an assembly of hundreds of aristocrats.
There I used to sit with them, converse, and engage in discussion.
And my appearance and voice became just like theirs.
I educated, encouraged, fired up, and inspired them with a Dhamma talk.
But when I spoke they didn’t know:
‘Who is this that speaks? Is it a god or a human?’
And when my Dhamma talk was finished I vanished.
But when I vanished they didn’t know:
‘Who was that who vanished? Was it a god or a human?’
I recall having approached an assembly of hundreds of brahmins …
householders …
ascetics …
the gods under the Four Great Kings …
the gods under the Thirty-Three …
There too I used to sit with them, converse, and engage in discussion.
And my appearance and voice became just like theirs.
I educated, encouraged, fired up, and inspired them with a Dhamma talk.
But when I spoke they didn’t know:
‘Who is this that speaks? Is it a god or a human?’
And when my Dhamma talk was finished I vanished.
But when I vanished they didn’t know:
‘Who was that who vanished? Was it a god or a human?’
These are the eight assemblies.”
Numbered Discourses
Second: Inspiring All Around
“A mendicant is faithful, but not ethical.
So they’re incomplete in that respect,
and should fulfill it, thinking:
‘How can I become faithful and ethical?’
When the mendicant is faithful and ethical,
they’re complete in that respect.
A mendicant is faithful and ethical, but not learned. …
they’re not a Dhamma speaker …
they don’t frequent assemblies …
they don’t teach Dhamma to the assembly with assurance …
they don’t have direct meditative experience of the peaceful liberations that are formless, transcending form …
they don’t realize the undefiled freedom of heart and freedom by wisdom in this very life, and live having realized it with their own insight due to the ending of defilements.
So they’re incomplete in that respect,
and should fulfill it, thinking:
‘How can I become faithful, ethical, and learned, a Dhamma speaker, one who frequents assemblies, one who teaches Dhamma to the assembly with assurance, one who gets the formless liberations, and one who lives having realized the ending of defilements?’
When they’re faithful, ethical, and learned, a Dhamma speaker, one who frequents assemblies, one who teaches Dhamma to the assembly with assurance, one who gets the formless liberations, and one who lives having realized the ending of defilements,
they’re complete in that respect.
A mendicant who has these eight qualities is inspiring all around, and is complete in every respect.”
Numbered Discourses
The Great Chapter
Second: Catching
“Mendicants, a man catches a woman using eight features.
What eight?
With weeping,
appearance,
gifts of wildflowers,
and touches.
A man catches a woman using these eight features.
But those beings who are caught by touch are well and truly caught.”
Numbered Discourses
The Great Chapter
With Sīha
At one time the Buddha was staying near Vesālī, at the Great Wood, in the hall with the peaked roof.
Now at that time several very prominent Licchavis were sitting together at the meeting hall, praising the Buddha, his teaching, and the Saṅgha in many ways.
Now at that time General Sīha, a disciple of the Jains, was sitting in that assembly.
He thought,
“That Blessed One must without a doubt be a perfected one, a fully awakened Buddha. For several very prominent Licchavis are praising the Buddha, his teaching, and the Saṅgha in many ways.
Why don’t I go to see that Blessed One, the perfected one, the fully awakened Buddha!”
Then General Sīha went to Nigaṇṭha Nātaputta and said to him,
“Sir, I’d like to go to see the ascetic Gotama.”
“But Sīha, you believe in the doctrine of action. Why should you go to see the ascetic Gotama, who teaches a doctrine of inaction?
For the ascetic Gotama believes in a doctrine of inaction, he teaches inaction, and he guides his disciples in that way.”
Then Sīha’s determination to go and see the Buddha died down.
For a second time, several prominent Licchavis were sitting together at the meeting hall, praising the Buddha, his teaching, and the Saṅgha in many ways.
And for a second time Sīha thought:
“Why don’t I go to see that Blessed One, the perfected one, the fully awakened Buddha!”
Then General Sīha went to Nigaṇṭha Nātaputta …
Then for a second time Sīha’s determination to go and see the Buddha died down.
For a third time, several prominent Licchavis were sitting together at the meeting hall, praising the Buddha, his teaching, and the Saṅgha in many ways.
And for a third time Sīha thought,
“That Blessed One must without a doubt be a perfected one, a fully awakened Buddha. For several very prominent Licchavis are praising the Buddha, his teaching, and the Saṅgha in many ways.
What can these Jains do to me, whether I consult with them or not?
Why don’t I, without consulting them, go to see that Blessed One, the perfected one, the fully awakened Buddha!”
Then Sīha, with around five hundred chariots, set out from Vesālī in the middle of the day to see the Buddha.
He went by carriage as far as the terrain allowed, then descended and went by foot.
Then General Sīha went up to the Buddha, bowed, sat down to one side, and said to him:
“Sir, I have heard this:
‘The ascetic Gotama believes in a doctrine of inaction, he teaches inaction, and he guides his disciples in that way.’
I trust those who say this repeat what the Buddha has said, and do not misrepresent him with an untruth? Is their explanation in line with the teaching? Are there any legitimate grounds for rebuke and criticism?
For we don’t want to misrepresent the Blessed One.”
“There is, Sīha, a sense in which you could rightly say that
I believe in inaction, I teach inaction, and I guide my disciples in that way.
And there is a sense in which you could rightly say that
I believe in action, I teach action, and I guide my disciples in that way.
And there is a sense in which you could rightly say that
I believe in annihilationism, I teach annihilation, and I guide my disciples in that way.
And there is a sense in which you could rightly say that
I’m disgusted, I teach disgust, and I guide my disciples in that way.
And there is a sense in which you could rightly say that
I'm an exterminator, I teach extermination, and I guide my disciples in that way.
And there is a sense in which you could rightly say that
I’m a mortifier, I teach mortification, and I guide my disciples in that way.
And there is a sense in which you could rightly say that
I’m an abortionist, I teach abortion, and I guide my disciples in that way.
And there is a sense in which you could rightly say that
I’m ambitious, I teach ambition, and I guide my disciples in that way.
And what’s the sense in which you could rightly say that
I believe in inaction, I teach inaction, and I guide my disciples in that way?
I teach inaction regarding bad bodily, verbal, and mental conduct,
and the many kinds of unskillful things.
In this sense you could rightly say that I teach inaction.
And what’s the sense in which you could rightly say that
I believe in action, I teach action, and I guide my disciples in that way?
I teach action regarding good bodily, verbal, and mental conduct,
and the many kinds of skillful things.
In this sense you could rightly say that I teach action.
And what’s the sense in which you could rightly say that
I believe in annihilationism, I teach annihilation, and I guide my disciples in that way?
I teach the annihilation of greed, hate, and delusion,
and the many kinds of unskillful things.
In this sense you could rightly say that I teach annihilationism.
And what’s the sense in which you could rightly say that
I’m disgusted, I teach disgust, and I guide my disciples in that way?
I’m disgusted by bad conduct by way of body, speech, and mind,
and by attainment of the many kinds of unskillful things.
In this sense you could rightly say that I’m disgusted.
And what’s the sense in which you could rightly say that
I'm an exterminator, I teach extermination, and I guide my disciples in that way?
I teach the extermination of greed, hate, and delusion,
and the many kinds of unskillful things.
In this sense you could rightly say that I’m an exterminator.
And what’s the sense in which you could rightly say that
I’m a mortifier, I teach mortification, and I guide my disciples in that way?
I say that bad conduct by way of body, speech, and mind should be mortified.
I say that a mortifier is someone who has given up unskillful qualities that should be mortified. They’ve cut them off at the root, made them like a palm stump, obliterated them, so that they’re unable to arise in the future.
The Realized One is someone who has given up unskillful qualities that should be mortified. He has cut them off at the root, made them like a palm stump, obliterated them, so that they’re unable to arise in the future.
In this sense you could rightly say that I’m a mortifier.
And what’s the sense in which you could rightly say that
I’m an abortionist, I teach abortion, and I guide my disciples in that way?
I say that an abortionist is someone who has given up future wombs and rebirth into a new state of existence. They’ve cut them off at the root, made them like a palm stump, obliterated them, so that they’re unable to arise in the future.
The Realized One has given up future wombs and rebirth into a new state of existence. He has cut them off at the root, made them like a palm stump, obliterated them, so that they’re unable to arise in the future.
In this sense you could rightly say that I’m an abortionist.
And what’s the sense in which you could rightly say that
I’m ambitious, I teach ambition, and I guide my disciples in that way?
I’m ambitious to offer solace, the highest solace, I teach solace, and I guide my disciples in that way.
In this sense you could rightly say that I’m ambitious.”
When he said this, General Sīha said to the Buddha,
“Excellent, sir! Excellent!
From this day forth, may the Buddha remember me as a lay follower who has gone for refuge for life.”
“Sīha, you should act after careful consideration.
It’s good for well-known people such as yourself to act after careful consideration.”
“Now I’m even more delighted and satisfied with the Buddha, since he tells me to act after careful consideration.
For if the followers of other paths were to gain me as a disciple, they’d carry a banner all over Vesālī, saying:
‘General Sīha has become our disciple!’
And yet the Buddha tells me to act after careful consideration.
For a second time, I go for refuge to the Buddha, to the teaching, and to the mendicant Saṅgha.
From this day forth, may the Buddha remember me as a lay follower who has gone for refuge for life.”
“For a long time now, Sīha, your family has been a well-spring of support for the Jain ascetics. You should consider giving to them when they come.”
“Now I’m even more delighted and satisfied with the Buddha, since he tells me to
consider giving to the Jain ascetics when they come.
Sir, I have heard this:
‘The ascetic Gotama says,
“Gifts should only be given to me, and to my disciples.
Only what is given to me is very fruitful, not what is given to others.
Only what is given to my disciples is very fruitful, not what is given to the disciples of others.”’
Yet the Buddha encourages me to give to the Jain ascetics.
Well, sir, we’ll know the proper time for that.
For a third time, I go for refuge to the Buddha, to the teaching, and to the mendicant Saṅgha.
From this day forth, may the Buddha remember me as a lay follower who has gone for refuge for life.”
Then the Buddha taught Sīha step by step, with
a talk on giving, ethical conduct, and heaven. He explained the drawbacks of sensual pleasures, so sordid and corrupt, and the benefit of renunciation.
And when the Buddha knew that Sīha’s mind was ready, pliable, rid of hindrances, joyful, and confident he explained the special teaching of the Buddhas:
suffering, its origin, its cessation, and the path.
Just as a clean cloth rid of stains would properly absorb dye,
in that very seat the stainless, immaculate vision of the Dhamma arose in General Sīha:
“Everything that has a beginning has an end.”
Then Sīha saw, attained, understood, and fathomed the Dhamma. He went beyond doubt, got rid of indecision, and became self-assured and independent of others regarding the Teacher’s instructions. He said to the Buddha,
“Sir, may the Buddha together with the mendicant Saṅgha please accept tomorrow’s meal from me.”
The Buddha consented in silence.
Then, knowing that the Buddha had consented, Sīha got up from his seat, bowed, and respectfully circled the Buddha, keeping him on his right, before leaving.
Then Sīha addressed a certain man,
“Mister, please find out if there is any meat ready for sale.”
And when the night had passed General Sīha had a variety of delicious foods prepared in his own home. Then he had the Buddha informed of the time, saying,
“Sir, it’s time. The meal is ready.”
Then the Buddha robed up in the morning and, taking his bowl and robe, went to Sīha’s home, where he sat on the seat spread out, together with the Saṅgha of mendicants.
Now at that time many Jain ascetics in Vesālī went from street to street and square to square, calling out with raised arms:
“Today General Sīha has slaughtered a fat calf for the ascetic Gotama’s meal.
The ascetic Gotama knowingly eats meat prepared specially for him: this is a deed he caused.”
Then a certain person went up to Sīha and whispered in his ear,
“Please sir, you should know this.
Many Jain ascetics in Vesālī are going from street to street and square to square, calling out with raised arms:
‘Today General Sīha has slaughtered a fat calf for the ascetic Gotama’s meal.
The ascetic Gotama knowingly eats meat prepared specially for him: this is a deed he caused.’”
“Enough, sir. For a long time those venerables have wanted to discredit the Buddha, his teaching, and his Saṅgha.
They’ll never stop misrepresenting the Buddha with their false, hollow, lying, untruthful claims.
We would never deliberately take the life of a living creature, not even for life’s sake.”
Then Sīha served and satisfied the mendicant Saṅgha headed by the Buddha with his own hands with a variety of delicious foods.
When the Buddha had eaten and washed his hand and bowl, Sīha sat down to one side.
Then the Buddha educated, encouraged, fired up, and inspired him with a Dhamma talk, after which he got up from his seat and left.
Numbered Discourses
Householders
Second: With Hatthaka
At one time the Buddha was staying near Āḷavī, at the Aggāḷava Tree-shrine.
Then the householder Hatthaka of Āḷavī, escorted by around five hundred lay followers, went up to the Buddha, bowed, and sat down to one side.
The Buddha said to Hatthaka:
“Hatthaka, you have a large congregation.
How do you bring together such a large congregation?”
“Sir, I bring together such a large congregation by using the four ways of being inclusive as taught by the Buddha.
When I know that a person
can be included by a gift, I include them by giving a gift.
When I know that a person
can be included by kindly words, I include them by kindly words.
When I know that a person
can be included by taking care of them, I include them by caring for them.
When I know that a person
can be included by equality, I include them by treating them equally.
But also, sir, my family is wealthy.
They wouldn’t think that a poor person was worth listening to in the same way.”
“Good, good, Hatthaka!
This is the right way to bring together a large congregation.
Whether in the past, future, or present, all those who have brought together a large congregation have done so by using these four ways of being inclusive.”
Then the Buddha educated, encouraged, fired up, and inspired Hatthaka of Āḷavī with a Dhamma talk, after which he got up from his seat, bowed, and respectfully circled the Buddha before leaving.
Then, not long after Hatthaka had left, the Buddha addressed the mendicants:
“Mendicants, you should remember the householder Hatthaka of Āḷavī as someone who has eight amazing and incredible qualities.
What eight?
He’s faithful,
and has few wishes.
You should remember the householder Hatthaka of Āḷavī as someone who has these eight amazing and incredible qualities.”
Numbered Discourses
Mindfulness
With Puṇṇiya
Then Venerable Puṇṇiya went up to the Buddha, bowed, sat down to one side, and said to him:
“Sir, what is the cause, what is the reason why sometimes the Realized One feels inspired to teach, and other times not?”
“Puṇṇiya, when a mendicant has faith but doesn’t approach,
the Realized One doesn’t feel inspired to teach.
But when a mendicant has faith and approaches,
the Realized One feels inspired to teach.
When a mendicant has faith and approaches, but doesn’t pay homage …
they pay homage, but don’t ask questions …
they ask questions, but don’t lend an ear …
they lend an ear, but don’t remember the teaching they’ve heard …
they remember the teaching they’ve heard, but don’t reflect on the meaning of the teachings they’ve remembered …
they reflect on the meaning of the teachings they’ve remembered, but, having understood the meaning and the teaching, they don’t practice accordingly.
The Realized One doesn’t feel inspired to teach.
But when a mendicant has faith, approaches, pays homage, asks questions, lends an ear, remembers the teachings, reflects on the meaning, and practices accordingly,
the Realized One feels inspired to teach.
When someone has these eight qualities, the Realized One feels totally inspired to teach.”
Numbered Discourses
Danger
“Mendicants, ‘danger’ is a term for sensual pleasures.
‘Suffering’,
‘disease’,
and ‘womb’ are terms for sensual pleasures.
And why is ‘danger’ a term for sensual pleasures?
Someone who is caught up in sensual greed and shackled by lustful desire is not freed from dangers in the present life or in lives to come. That is why ‘danger’ is a term for sensual pleasures.
And why are ‘suffering’,
‘disease’,
and ‘womb’ terms for sensual pleasures?
Someone who is caught up in sensual greed and shackled by lustful desire is not freed from wombs in the present life or in lives to come. That is why ‘womb’ is a term for sensual pleasures.
Danger, suffering, and disease,
boil, dart, and chain,
and bogs and wombs both.
These describe the sensual pleasures
to which ordinary people are attached.
Swamped by things that seem pleasant,
you go to another womb.
But when a mendicant is keen,
and doesn’t forget awareness,
in this way they transcend
this grueling swamp.
They watch this population as it trembles,
fallen into rebirth and old age.”
Numbered Discourses
Householders
With Jīvaka
At one time the Buddha was staying near Rājagaha in Jīvaka’s Mango Grove.
Then Jīvaka Komārabhacca went up to the Buddha, bowed, sat down to one side, and said to him,
“Sir, how is a lay follower defined?”
“Jīvaka, when you’ve gone for refuge to the Buddha, the teaching, and the Saṅgha,
you’re considered to be a lay follower.”
“But how is an ethical lay follower defined?”
“When a lay follower doesn’t kill living creatures, steal, commit sexual misconduct, lie, or use alcoholic drinks that cause negligence,
they’re considered to be an ethical lay follower.”
“But how do we define a lay follower who is practicing to benefit themselves, not others?”
“A lay follower is accomplished in faith, but doesn’t encourage others to do the same. They’re accomplished in ethical conduct … they’re accomplished in generosity … they like to see the mendicants … they like to hear the true teaching … they memorize the teachings … they examine the meaning …
Understanding the meaning and the teaching, they practice accordingly, but they don’t encourage others to do the same.
That’s how we define a lay follower who is practicing to benefit themselves, not others.”
“But how do we define a lay follower who is practicing to benefit both themselves and others?”
“A lay follower is accomplished in faith and encourages others to do the same.
They’re accomplished in ethical conduct and encourage others to do the same.
They’re accomplished in generosity and encourage others to do the same.
They like to see the mendicants and encourage others to do the same.
They like to hear the true teaching and encourage others to do the same.
They readily memorize the teachings they’ve heard and encourage others to do the same.
They examine the meaning of the teachings they’ve memorized and encourage others to do the same.
Understanding the meaning and the teaching, they practice accordingly and they encourage others to do the same.
That’s how we define a lay follower who is practicing to benefit both themselves and others.”
Numbered Discourses
Earthquakes
Dimensions of Mastery
“Mendicants, there are these eight dimensions of mastery.
What eight?
Perceiving form internally, someone sees visions externally, limited, both pretty and ugly.
Mastering them, they perceive: ‘I know and see.’
This is the first dimension of mastery.
Perceiving form internally, someone sees visions externally, limitless, both pretty and ugly.
Mastering them, they perceive: ‘I know and see.’
This is the second dimension of mastery.
Not perceiving form internally, someone sees visions externally, limited, both pretty and ugly.
Mastering them, they perceive: ‘I know and see.’
This is the third dimension of mastery.
Not perceiving form internally, someone sees visions externally, limitless, both pretty and ugly.
Mastering them, they perceive: ‘I know and see.’
This is the fourth dimension of mastery.
Not perceiving form internally, someone sees visions externally, blue, with blue color, blue hue, and blue tint.
Mastering them, they perceive: ‘I know and see.’
This is the fifth dimension of mastery.
Not perceiving form internally, someone sees visions externally, yellow, with yellow color, yellow hue, and yellow tint.
Mastering them, they perceive: ‘I know and see.’
This is the sixth dimension of mastery.
Not perceiving form internally, someone sees visions externally, red, with red color, red hue, and red tint.
Mastering them, they perceive: ‘I know and see.’
This is the seventh dimension of mastery.
Not perceiving form internally, someone sees visions externally, white, with white color, white hue, and white tint.
Mastering them, they perceive: ‘I know and see.’
This is the eighth dimension of mastery.
These are the eight dimensions of mastery.”
Numbered Discourses
Mindfulness
Terms for the Realized One
“‘Ascetic’ is a term for the Realized One, the perfected one, the fully awakened Buddha.
‘Brahmin’,
‘Knowledge Master’,
‘Unstained’,
‘Immaculate’,
and ‘Freed’ are terms for the Realized One, the perfected one, the fully awakened Buddha.
The supreme should be attained by an ascetic,
a brahmin who has lived the life;
it should be attained by a knowledge master,
The supreme should be attained by the unstained,
stainless and pure;
it should be attained by a knower,
who is free.
I am victorious in battle!
Released, I release others from their chains.
I am a dragon completely tamed,
an adept, I am extinguished.”
Numbered Discourses
Mindfulness
Turning the Bowl Upside Down
“Mendicants, the Saṅgha may, if it wishes, turn the bowl upside down for a lay follower on eight grounds.
What eight?
They try to prevent the mendicants from getting material possessions. They try to harm mendicants. They try to drive mendicants from a monastery. They insult and abuse mendicants. They divide mendicants against each other. They criticize the Buddha, the teaching, and the Saṅgha.
The Saṅgha may, if it wishes, turn the bowl upside down for a lay follower on these eight grounds.
The Saṅgha may, if it wishes, turn the bowl upright for a lay follower on eight grounds.
What eight?
They don’t try to prevent the mendicants from getting material possessions. They don’t try to harm mendicants. They don’t try to drive mendicants from a monastery. They don’t insult and abuse mendicants. They don’t divide mendicants against each other. They don’t criticize the Buddha, the teaching, and the Saṅgha.
The Saṅgha may, if it wishes, turn the bowl upright for a lay follower on these eight grounds.”
Numbered Discourses
Earthquakes
Liberations
“Mendicants, there are these eight liberations.
What eight?
Having physical form, they see visions.
This is the first liberation.
Not perceiving form internally, they see visions externally.
This is the second liberation.
They’re focused only on beauty.
This is the third liberation.
Going totally beyond perceptions of form, with the ending of perceptions of impingement, not focusing on perceptions of diversity, aware that ‘space is infinite’, they enter and remain in the dimension of infinite space.
This is the fourth liberation.
Going totally beyond the dimension of infinite space, aware that ‘consciousness is infinite’, they enter and remain in the dimension of infinite consciousness.
This is the fifth liberation.
Going totally beyond the dimension of infinite consciousness, aware that ‘there is nothing at all’, they enter and remain in the dimension of nothingness.
This is the sixth liberation.
Going totally beyond the dimension of nothingness, they enter and remain in the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception.
This is the seventh liberation.
Going totally beyond the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception, they enter and remain in the cessation of perception and feeling.
This is the eighth liberation.
These are the eight liberations.”
Numbered Discourses
First: Inspiring All Around
“Mendicants, a mendicant is faithful but not ethical.
So they’re incomplete in that respect,
and should fulfill it, thinking:
‘How can I become faithful and ethical?’
When the mendicant is faithful and ethical,
they’re complete in that respect.
A mendicant is faithful and ethical, but not learned.
So they’re incomplete in that respect,
and should fulfill it, thinking:
‘How can I become faithful, ethical, and learned?’
When the mendicant is faithful, ethical, and learned,
they’re complete in that respect.
A mendicant is faithful, ethical, and learned, but not a Dhamma speaker. …
they don’t frequent assemblies …
they don’t teach Dhamma to the assembly with assurance …
they don’t get the four absorptions—blissful meditations in the present life that belong to the higher mind—when they want, without trouble or difficulty …
they don’t realize the undefiled freedom of heart and freedom by wisdom in this very life, and live having realized it with their own insight due to the ending of defilements.
So they’re incomplete in that respect,
and should fulfill it, thinking:
‘How can I become faithful, ethical, and learned, a Dhamma speaker, one who frequents assemblies, one who teaches Dhamma to the assembly with assurance, one who gets the four absorptions when they want, and one who lives having realized the ending of defilements?’
When they’re faithful, ethical, and learned, a Dhamma speaker, one who frequents assemblies, one who teaches Dhamma to the assembly with assurance, one who gets the four absorptions when they want, and one who lives having realized the ending of defilements,
they’re complete in that respect.
A mendicant who has these eight qualities is inspiring all around, and is complete in every respect.”
Numbered Discourses
Mindfulness
Mindfulness and Situational Awareness
“Mendicants, when there is no mindfulness and situational awareness, one who lacks mindfulness and situational awareness has destroyed a vital condition for conscience and prudence.
When there is no conscience and prudence, one who lacks conscience and prudence has destroyed a vital condition for sense restraint.
When there is no sense restraint, one who lacks sense restraint has destroyed a vital condition for ethical conduct.
When there is no ethical conduct, one who lacks ethics has destroyed a vital condition for right immersion.
When there is no right immersion, one who lacks right immersion has destroyed a vital condition for true knowledge and vision.
When there is no true knowledge and vision, one who lacks true knowledge and vision has destroyed a vital condition for disillusionment and dispassion.
When there is no disillusionment and dispassion, one who lacks disillusionment and dispassion has destroyed a vital condition for knowledge and vision of freedom.
Suppose there was a tree that lacked branches and foliage.
Its shoots, bark, softwood, and heartwood would not grow to fullness.
In the same way, when there is no mindfulness and situational awareness, one who lacks mindfulness and situational awareness has destroyed a vital condition for conscience and prudence.
When there is no conscience and prudence …
One who lacks disillusionment and dispassion has destroyed a vital condition for knowledge and vision of freedom.
When there is mindfulness and situational awareness, one who has fulfilled mindfulness and situational awareness has fulfilled a vital condition for conscience and prudence.
When there is conscience and prudence, a person who has fulfilled conscience and prudence has fulfilled a vital condition for sense restraint.
When there is sense restraint, one who has sense restraint has fulfilled a vital condition for ethical conduct.
When there is ethical conduct, one who has fulfilled ethical conduct has fulfilled a vital condition for right immersion.
When there is right immersion, one who has fulfilled right immersion has fulfilled a vital condition for true knowledge and vision.
When there is true knowledge and vision, one who has fulfilled true knowledge and vision has fulfilled a vital condition for disillusionment and dispassion.
When there is disillusionment and dispassion, one who has fulfilled disillusionment and dispassion has fulfilled a vital condition for knowledge and vision of freedom.
Suppose there was a tree that was complete with branches and foliage.
Its shoots, bark, softwood, and heartwood would grow to fullness.
In the same way, when there is mindfulness and situational awareness, one who has fulfilled mindfulness and situational awareness has fulfilled a vital condition for conscience and prudence.
When there is conscience and prudence …
One who has fulfilled disillusionment and dispassion has fulfilled a vital condition for knowledge and vision of freedom.”
Numbered Discourses
Abbreviated Texts Beginning With Greed
“For insight into greed, eight things should be developed.
What eight?
Perceiving form internally, they see visions externally, limited, both pretty and ugly.
Mastering them, they perceive: ‘I know and see.’
Perceiving form internally, they see visions externally, limitless, both pretty and ugly. …
Not perceiving form internally, they see visions externally, limited, both pretty and ugly. …
Not perceiving form internally, they see visions externally, limitless, both pretty and ugly. …
Not perceiving form internally, they see visions externally, blue, with blue color, blue hue, and blue tint. …
Not perceiving form internally, they see visions externally, white, with white color, white hue, and white tint.
Mastering them, they perceive: ‘I know and see.’
For insight into greed, these eight things should be developed.”
Numbered Discourses
Abbreviated Texts Beginning With Greed
“For insight into greed, eight things should be developed.
What eight?
Having physical form, they see visions … not perceiving form internally, they see visions externally … they’re focused only on beauty … going totally beyond perceptions of form, with the ending of perceptions of impingement, not focusing on perceptions of diversity, aware that ‘space is infinite’, they enter and remain in the dimension of infinite space … going totally beyond the dimension of infinite space, aware that ‘consciousness is infinite’, they enter and remain in the dimension of infinite consciousness … going totally beyond the dimension of infinite consciousness, aware that ‘there is nothing at all’, they enter and remain in the dimension of nothingness … going totally beyond the dimension of nothingness, they enter and remain in the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception … going totally beyond the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception, they enter and remain in the cessation of perception and feeling …
For insight into greed, these eight things should be developed.”
Numbered Discourses
Second: Giving
“Faith, conscience, and skillful giving
are qualities good people follow.
For this, they say, is the path of the gods,
which leads to the heavenly realm.”
Numbered Discourses
The Great Chapter
Sabbath
At one time the Buddha was staying near Sāvatthī in the Eastern Monastery, the stilt longhouse of Migāra’s mother.
Now, at that time it was the sabbath, and the Buddha was sitting surrounded by the Saṅgha of monks.
And then, as the night was getting late, in the first watch of the night, Venerable Ānanda got up from his seat, arranged his robe over one shoulder, raised his joined palms toward the Buddha and said,
“Sir, the night is getting late. It is the first watch of the night, and the Saṅgha has been sitting long.
Please, sir, may the Buddha recite the monastic code to the mendicants.”
But when he said this, the Buddha kept silent.
For a second time, as the night was getting late, in the middle watch of the night, Ānanda got up from his seat, arranged his robe over one shoulder, raised his joined palms toward the Buddha and said,
“Sir, the night is getting late. It is the middle watch of the night, and the Saṅgha has been sitting long.
Please, sir, may the Buddha recite the monastic code to the mendicants.”
But for a second time the Buddha kept silent.
For a third time, as the night was getting late, in the last watch of the night, Ānanda got up from his seat, arranged his robe over one shoulder, raised his joined palms toward the Buddha and said,
“Sir, the night is getting late. It is the last watch of the night and dawn stirs, bringing joy to the night.
And the Saṅgha has been sitting long.
Please, sir, may the Buddha recite the monastic code to the mendicants.”
“Ānanda, the assembly is not pure.”
Then Venerable Mahāmoggallāna thought,
“Who is the Buddha talking about?”
Then he focused on comprehending the minds of everyone in the Saṅgha.
He saw that unethical person, of bad qualities, filthy, with suspicious behavior, underhand, no true ascetic or spiritual practitioner—though claiming to be one—rotten inside, corrupt, and depraved, sitting in the middle of the Saṅgha.
When he saw him he got up from his seat, went up to him and said,
“Get up, reverend. The Buddha has seen you.
You can’t live in communion with the mendicants.”
But when he said this, that person kept silent.
For a second time
and a third time,
he asked that monk to leave.
But for a third time that person kept silent.
Then Venerable Mahāmoggallāna took that person by the arm, ejected him out the gate, and bolted the door. Then he went up to the Buddha, and said to him,
“I have ejected that person.
The assembly is pure.
Please, sir, may the Buddha recite the monastic code to the mendicants.”
“It’s incredible, Moggallāna, it’s amazing,
how that silly man waited to be taken by the arm!”
Then the Buddha said to the mendicants:
“Now, mendicants, you should perform the sabbath and recite the monastic code.
From this day forth, I will not perform the sabbath or recite the monastic code.
It’s impossible, mendicants, it can’t happen that a Realized One could recite the monastic code in an impure assembly.
Seeing these eight incredible and amazing things the demons love the ocean.
What eight?
The ocean gradually slants, slopes, and inclines, with no abrupt precipice.
This is the first thing the demons love about the ocean.
Furthermore, many great beings live in the ocean, such as leviathans, leviathan-gulpers, leviathan-gulper-gulpers, demons, dragons, and fairies.
In the ocean there are life-forms a hundred leagues long, or even two hundred, three hundred, four hundred, or five hundred leagues long.
This is the eighth thing the demons love about the ocean.
Seeing these eight incredible and amazing things the demons love the ocean.
In the same way, seeing eight incredible and amazing things, mendicants, the mendicants love this teaching and training.
What eight?
The ocean gradually slants, slopes, and inclines, with no abrupt precipice.
In the same way in this teaching and training the penetration to enlightenment comes from gradual training, progress, and practice, not abruptly.
This is the first thing the mendicants love about this teaching and training. …
Many great beings live in the ocean, such as leviathans, leviathan-gulpers, leviathan-gulper-gulpers, demons, dragons, and fairies. In the ocean there are life-forms a hundred leagues long, or even two hundred, three hundred, four hundred, or five hundred leagues long.
In the same way, great beings live in this teaching and training, and these are those beings.
The stream-enterer and the one practicing to realize the fruit of stream-entry. The once-returner and the one practicing to realize the fruit of once-return. The non-returner and the one practicing to realize the fruit of non-return. The perfected one, and the one practicing for perfection.
This is the eighth thing the mendicants love about this teaching and training.
Seeing these eight incredible and amazing things, the mendicants love this teaching and training.”
Numbered Discourses
The Great Chapter
With Pahārāda
At one time the Buddha was staying in Verañja at the root of a neem tree dedicated to Naḷeru.
Then Pahārāda, lord of demons, went up to the Buddha, bowed, and stood to one side.
The Buddha said to him,
“Well, Pahārāda, do the demons love the ocean?”
“Sir, they do indeed.”
“But seeing what incredible and amazing things do the demons love the ocean?”
“Sir, seeing eight incredible and amazing things the demons love the ocean.
What eight?
The ocean gradually slants, slopes, and inclines, with no abrupt precipice.
This is the first thing the demons love about the ocean.
Furthermore, the ocean is consistent and doesn’t overflow its boundaries.
This is the second thing the demons love about the ocean.
Furthermore, the ocean doesn’t accommodate a corpse,
but quickly carries it to the shore and strands it on the beach.
This is the third thing the demons love about the ocean.
Furthermore, when they reach the ocean, all the great rivers—that is,
the Ganges, Yamunā, Aciravatī, Sarabhū, and Mahī—lose their names and clans and are simply considered ‘the ocean’.
This is the fourth thing the demons love about the ocean.
Furthermore, for all the world’s streams that reach it, and the rain that falls from the sky, the ocean never empties or fills up.
This is the fifth thing the demons love about the ocean.
Furthermore, the ocean has just one taste, the taste of salt.
This is the sixth thing the demons love about the ocean.
Furthermore, the ocean is full of many kinds of treasures, such as pearls, gems, beryl, conch, quartz, coral, silver, gold, rubies, and emeralds.
This is the seventh thing the demons love about the ocean.
Furthermore, many great beings live in the ocean, such as leviathans, leviathan-gulpers, leviathan-gulper-gulpers, demons, dragons, and fairies.
In the ocean there are life-forms a hundred leagues long, or even two hundred, three hundred, four hundred, or five hundred leagues long.
This is the eighth thing the demons love about the ocean.
Seeing these eight incredible and amazing things the demons love the ocean.
Well, sir, do the mendicants love this teaching and training?”
“They do indeed, Pahārāda.”
“But seeing how many incredible and amazing things do the mendicants love this teaching and training?”
“Seeing eight incredible and amazing things, Pahārāda, the mendicants love this teaching and training.
What eight?
The ocean gradually slants, slopes, and inclines, with no abrupt precipice.
In the same way in this teaching and training the penetration to enlightenment comes from gradual training, progress, and practice, not abruptly.
This is the first thing the mendicants love about this teaching and training.
The ocean is consistent and doesn’t overflow its boundaries.
In the same way, when a training rule is laid down for my disciples they wouldn’t break it even for the sake of their own life.
This is the second thing the mendicants love about this teaching and training.
The ocean doesn’t accommodate a corpse, but quickly carries it to the shore and strands it on the beach.
In the same way, the Saṅgha doesn’t accommodate a person who is unethical, of bad qualities, filthy, with suspicious behavior, underhand, no true ascetic or spiritual practitioner—though claiming to be one—rotten inside, corrupt, and depraved.
But they quickly gather and expel them. Even if such a person is sitting in the middle of the Saṅgha, they’re far from the Saṅgha, and the Saṅgha is far from them.
This is the third thing the mendicants love about this teaching and training.
When they reach the ocean, all the great rivers—that is, the Ganges, Yamunā, Aciravatī, Sarabhū, and Mahī—lose their names and clans and are simply considered ‘the ocean’.
In the same way, when they go forth from the lay life to homelessness, all four castes—aristocrats, brahmins, merchants, and workers—lose their former names and clans and are simply considered ‘Sakyan ascetics’.
This is the fourth thing the mendicants love about this teaching and training.
For all the world’s streams that reach it, and the rain that falls from the sky, the ocean never empties or fills up.
In the same way, though several mendicants become fully extinguished through the natural principle of extinguishment, without anything left over, the natural principle of extinguishment never empties or fills up.
This is the fifth thing the mendicants love about this teaching and training.
The ocean has just one taste, the taste of salt.
In the same way, this teaching and training has one taste, the taste of freedom.
This is the sixth thing the mendicants love about this teaching and training.
The ocean is full of many kinds of treasures, such as pearls, gems, beryl, conch, quartz, coral, silver, gold, rubies, and emeralds.
In the same way, this teaching and training is full of many kinds of treasures, such as the four kinds of mindfulness meditation, the four right efforts, the four bases of psychic power, the five faculties, the five powers, the seven awakening factors, and the noble eightfold path.
This is the seventh thing the mendicants love about this teaching and training.
Many great beings live in the ocean, such as leviathans, leviathan-gulpers, leviathan-gulper-gulpers, demons, dragons, and fairies. In the ocean there are life-forms a hundred leagues long, or even two hundred, three hundred, four hundred, or five hundred leagues long.
In the same way, great beings live in this teaching and training, and these are those beings. The stream-enterer and the one practicing to realize the fruit of stream-entry. The once-returner and the one practicing to realize the fruit of once-return. The non-returner and the one practicing to realize the fruit of non-return. The perfected one, and the one practicing for perfection.
This is the eighth thing the mendicants love about this teaching and training.
Seeing these eight incredible and amazing things, Pahārāda, the mendicants love this teaching and training.”
Numbered Discourses
Sabbath
The Sabbath With Eight Factors, In Detail
“Mendicants, the observance of the sabbath with its eight factors is very fruitful and beneficial and splendid and bountiful.
And how should it be observed?
It’s when a noble disciple reflects:
‘As long as they live, the perfected ones give up killing living creatures, renouncing the rod and the sword. They are scrupulous and kind, and live full of compassion for all living beings.
I, too, for this day and night will give up killing living creatures, renouncing the rod and the sword. I’ll be scrupulous and kind, and live full of compassion for all living beings.
I will observe the sabbath by doing as the perfected ones do in this respect.’
This is its first factor. …
‘As long as they live, the perfected ones give up high and luxurious beds. They sleep in a low place, either a small bed or a straw mat.
I, too, for this day and night will give up high and luxurious beds. I’ll sleep in a low place, either a small bed or a straw mat.
I will observe the sabbath by doing as the perfected ones do in this respect.’
This is its eighth factor.
The observance of the sabbath with its eight factors in this way is very fruitful and beneficial and splendid and bountiful.
How much so?
Suppose you were to rule as sovereign lord over these sixteen great countries—Aṅga, Magadha, Kāsī, Kosala, Vajjī, Malla, Ceti, Vaṅga, Kuru, Pañcāla, Maccha, Sūrusena, Assaka, Avanti, Gandhāra, and Kamboja—full of the seven kinds of precious things.
This wouldn’t be worth a sixteenth part of the sabbath with its eight factors.
Why is that?
Because human kingship is a poor thing compared to the happiness of the gods.
Fifty years in the human realm is one day and night for the Gods of the Four Great Kings.
Thirty such days make up a month.
Twelve such months make up a year.
The life span of the Gods of the Four Great Kings is five hundred of these divine years.
It’s possible that a woman or man who has observed the eight-factored sabbath will—when their body breaks up, after death—be reborn in the company of the Gods of the Four Great Kings.
This is what I was referring to when I said:
‘Human kingship is a poor thing compared to the happiness of the gods.’
A hundred years in the human realm is one day and night for the Gods of the Thirty-Three.
Thirty such days make up a month.
Twelve such months make up a year.
The life span of the Gods of the Thirty-Three is a thousand of these divine years.
It’s possible that a woman or man who has observed the eight-factored sabbath will—when their body breaks up, after death—be reborn in the company of the Gods of the Thirty-Three.
This is what I was referring to when I said:
‘Human kingship is a poor thing compared to the happiness of the gods.’
Two hundred years in the human realm is one day and night for the Gods of Yama.
Thirty such days make up a month.
Twelve such months make up a year.
The life span of the Gods of Yama is two thousand of these divine years.
It’s possible that a woman or man who has observed the eight-factored sabbath will—when their body breaks up, after death—be reborn in the company of the Gods of Yama.
This is what I was referring to when I said:
‘Human kingship is a poor thing compared to the happiness of the gods.’
Four hundred years in the human realm is one day and night for the Joyful Gods.
Thirty such days make up a month.
Twelve such months make up a year.
The life span of the Joyful Gods is four thousand of these divine years.
It’s possible that a woman or man who has observed the eight-factored sabbath will—when their body breaks up, after death—be reborn in the company of the Joyful Gods.
This is what I was referring to when I said:
‘Human kingship is a poor thing compared to the happiness of the gods.’
Eight hundred years in the human realm is one day and night for the Gods Who Love to Create.
Thirty such days make up a month.
Twelve such months make up a year.
The life span of the Gods Who Love to Create is eight thousand of these divine years.
It’s possible that a woman or man who has observed the eight-factored sabbath will—when their body breaks up, after death—be reborn in the company of the Gods Who Love to Create.
This is what I was referring to when I said:
‘Human kingship is a poor thing compared to the happiness of the gods.’
Sixteen hundred years in the human realm is one day and night for the Gods Who Control the Creations of Others.
Thirty such days make up a month.
Twelve such months make up a year.
The life span of the Gods Who Control the Creations of Others is sixteen thousand of these divine years.
It’s possible that a woman or man who has observed the eight-factored sabbath will—when their body breaks up, after death—be reborn in the company of the Gods Who Control the Creations of Others.
This is what I was referring to when I said:
‘Human kingship is a poor thing compared to the happiness of the gods.’
You shouldn’t kill living creatures, or steal,
or lie, or drink alcohol.
Be celibate, refraining from sex,
and don’t eat at night, the wrong time.
Not wearing garlands or applying perfumes,
you should sleep on a low bed, or a mat on the ground.
This is the eight-factored sabbath, they say,
explained by the Buddha, who has gone to suffering’s end.
The moon and sun are both fair to see,
radiating as far as they revolve.
Those shining ones in the sky light up the quarters,
dispelling the darkness as they traverse the heavens.
All of the wealth that’s found in this realm—
pearls, gems, fine beryl too,
horn-gold or mountain gold,
or natural gold dug up by marmots—
they’re not worth a sixteenth part
of the sabbath with its eight factors,
as starlight cannot rival the moon.
So an ethical woman or man,
who has observed the eight-factored sabbath,
having made merit whose outcome is happiness,
blameless, they go to a heavenly place.”
Numbered Discourses
Overflowing Merit
“Mendicants, there are these eight kinds of overflowing merit, overflowing goodness. They nurture happiness and are conducive to heaven, ripening in happiness and leading to heaven. They lead to what is likable, desirable, agreeable, to welfare and happiness.
What eight?
Firstly, a noble disciple has gone for refuge to the Buddha.
This is the first kind of overflowing merit …
Furthermore, a noble disciple has gone for refuge to the teaching.
This is the second kind of overflowing merit …
Furthermore, a noble disciple has gone for refuge to the Saṅgha.
This is the third kind of overflowing merit …
Mendicants, these five gifts are great, primordial, long-standing, traditional, and ancient. They are uncorrupted, as they have been since the beginning. They’re not being corrupted now nor will they be. Sensible ascetics and brahmins don’t look down on them.
What five?
Firstly, a noble disciple gives up killing living creatures.
By so doing they give to countless sentient beings the gift of freedom from fear, enmity, and ill will.
And they themselves also enjoy unlimited freedom from fear, enmity, and ill will.
This is the first gift that is a great offering, primordial, long-standing, traditional, and ancient. It is uncorrupted, as it has been since the beginning. It’s not being corrupted now nor will it be. Sensible ascetics and brahmins don’t look down on it.
This is the fourth kind of overflowing merit …
Furthermore, a noble disciple gives up stealing. …
Furthermore, a noble disciple gives up sexual misconduct. …
Furthermore, a noble disciple gives up lying. …
Furthermore, a noble disciple gives up alcoholic drinks that cause negligence.
By so doing they give to countless sentient beings the gift of freedom from fear, enmity, and ill will.
And they themselves also enjoy unlimited freedom from fear, enmity, and ill will.
This is the fifth gift that is a great offering, primordial, long-standing, traditional, and ancient. It is uncorrupted, as it has been since the beginning. It’s not being corrupted now nor will it be. Sensible ascetics and brahmins don’t look down on it.
This is the eighth kind of overflowing merit …
These are the eight kinds of overflowing merit, overflowing goodness. They nurture happiness and are conducive to heaven, ripening in happiness and leading to heaven. They lead to what is likable, desirable, agreeable, to welfare and happiness.”
Numbered Discourses
Earthquakes
Earthquakes
At one time the Buddha was staying near Vesālī, at the Great Wood, in the hall with the peaked roof.
Then the Buddha robed up in the morning and, taking his bowl and robe, entered Vesālī for alms.
Then, after the meal, on his return from alms-round, he addressed Venerable Ānanda,
“Ānanda, get your sitting cloth.
Let’s go to the Cāpāla shrine for the day’s meditation.”
“Yes, sir,” replied Ānanda. Taking his sitting cloth he followed behind the Buddha.
Then the Buddha went up to the Cāpāla shrine, where he sat on the seat spread out.
When he was seated he said to Venerable Ānanda:
“Ānanda, Vesālī is lovely. And the Udena, Gotamaka, Sattamba, Bahuputta, Sārandada, and Cāpāla shrines are all lovely.
Whoever has developed and cultivated the four bases of psychic power—made them a vehicle and a basis, kept them up, consolidated them, and properly implemented them—may, if they wish, live on for the eon or what’s left of the eon.
The Realized One has developed and cultivated the four bases of psychic power, made them a vehicle and a basis, kept them up, consolidated them, and properly implemented them.
If he wished, the Realized One could live on for the eon or what’s left of the eon.”
But Ānanda didn’t get it, even though the Buddha dropped such an obvious hint, such a clear sign.
He didn’t beg the Buddha,
“Sir, may the Blessed One please remain for the eon! May the Holy One please remain for the eon! That would be for the welfare and happiness of the people, for the benefit, welfare, and happiness of gods and humans.” For his mind was as if possessed by Māra.
For a second time …
And for a third time, the Buddha said to him:
“Ānanda, Vesālī is lovely. And the Udena, Gotamaka, Sattamba, Bahuputta, Sārandada, and Cāpāla shrines are all lovely.
Whoever has developed and cultivated the four bases of psychic power—made them a vehicle and a basis, kept them up, consolidated them, and properly implemented them—may, if they wish, live on for the eon or what’s left of the eon.
The Realized One has developed and cultivated the four bases of psychic power, made them a vehicle and a basis, kept them up, consolidated them, and properly implemented them. If he wished, the Realized One could live on for the eon or what’s left of the eon.”
But Ānanda didn’t get it, even though the Buddha dropped such an obvious hint, such a clear sign.
He didn’t beg the Buddha,
“Sir, may the Blessed One please remain for the eon! May the Holy One please remain for the eon! That would be for the welfare and happiness of the people, for the benefit, welfare, and happiness of gods and humans.” For his mind was as if possessed by Māra.
Then the Buddha said to Venerable Ānanda,
“Go now, Ānanda, at your convenience.”
“Yes, sir,” replied Ānanda. He rose from his seat, bowed, and respectfully circled the Buddha, keeping him on his right, before sitting at the root of a tree close by.
And then, not long after Ānanda had left, Māra the Wicked said to the Buddha:
“Sir, may the Blessed One now become fully extinguished! May the Holy One now become fully extinguished! Now is the time for the Buddha to become fully extinguished.
Sir, you once made this statement:
‘Wicked One, I will not become fully extinguished until I have monk disciples who are competent, educated, assured, learned, have memorized the teachings, and practice in line with the teachings; not until they practice appropriately, living in line with the teaching; not until they’ve learned their tradition, and explain, teach, assert, establish, open, analyze, and make it clear; not until they can legitimately and completely refute the doctrines of others that come up, and teach with a demonstrable basis.’
Today you do have such monk disciples.
May the Blessed One now become fully extinguished! May the Holy One now become fully extinguished! Now is the time for the Buddha to become fully extinguished.
Sir, you once made this statement:
‘Wicked One, I will not become fully extinguished until I have nun disciples who are competent, educated, assured, learned …’ …
‘Wicked One, I will not become fully extinguished until I have layman disciples who are competent, educated, assured, learned …’ …
‘Wicked One, I will not become fully extinguished until I have laywoman disciples who are competent, educated, assured, learned …’ …
Today you do have such laywoman disciples.
Sir, may the Blessed One now become fully extinguished! May the Holy One become fully extinguished! Now is the time for the Buddha to become fully extinguished.
Sir, you once made this statement:
‘Wicked One, I will not become fully extinguished until my spiritual path is successful and prosperous, extensive, popular, widespread, and well proclaimed wherever there are gods and humans.’
Today your spiritual path is successful and prosperous, extensive, popular, widespread, and well proclaimed wherever there are gods and humans.
Sir, may the Blessed One now become fully extinguished! May the Holy One become fully extinguished! Now is the time for the Buddha to become fully extinguished.”
“Relax, Wicked One.
The final extinguishment of the Realized One will be soon.
Three months from now the Realized One will finally be extinguished.”
So at the Cāpāla tree shrine the Buddha, mindful and aware, surrendered the life force.
When he did so there was a great earthquake, awe-inspiring and hair-raising, and thunder cracked the sky.
Then, knowing the meaning of this, on that occasion the Buddha expressed this heartfelt sentiment:
“Weighing up the incomparable against an extension of life,
the sage surrendered the life force.
Happy inside, serene,
he burst out of this self-made chain like a suit of armor.”
Then Venerable Ānanda thought,
“That was a really big earthquake!
That was really a very big earthquake; awe-inspiring and hair-raising, and thunder cracked the sky!
What’s the cause, what’s the reason for a great earthquake?”
Then Venerable Ānanda went up to the Buddha, bowed, sat down to one side, and said to him,
“Sir, that was a really big earthquake!
That was really a very big earthquake; awe-inspiring and hair-raising, and thunder cracked the sky!
What’s the cause, what’s the reason for a great earthquake?”
“Ānanda, there are these eight causes and reasons for a great earthquake.
What eight?
This great earth is grounded on water, the water is grounded on air, and the air stands in space.
At a time when a great wind blows, it stirs the water, and the water stirs the earth.
This is the first cause and reason for a great earthquake.
Furthermore, there is an ascetic or brahmin with psychic power who has achieved mastery of the mind, or a god who is mighty and powerful.
They’ve developed a limited perception of earth and a limitless perception of water.
They make the earth shake and rock and tremble.
This is the second cause and reason for a great earthquake.
Furthermore, when the being intent on awakening passes away from the host of Joyful Gods, he’s conceived in his mother’s belly, mindful and aware. Then the earth shakes and rocks and trembles.
This is the third cause and reason for a great earthquake.
Furthermore, when the being intent on awakening comes out of his mother’s belly mindful and aware, the earth shakes and rocks and trembles.
This is the fourth cause and reason for a great earthquake.
Furthermore, when the Realized One realizes the supreme perfect awakening, the earth shakes and rocks and trembles.
This is the fifth cause and reason for a great earthquake.
Furthermore, when the Realized One rolls forth the supreme Wheel of Dhamma, the earth shakes and rocks and trembles.
This is the sixth cause and reason for a great earthquake.
Furthermore, when the Realized One, mindful and aware, surrenders the life force, the earth shakes and rocks and trembles.
This is the seventh cause and reason for a great earthquake.
Furthermore, when the Realized One becomes fully extinguished through the natural principle of extinguishment, without anything left over, the earth shakes and rocks and trembles.
This is the eighth cause and reason for a great earthquake.
These are the eight causes and reasons for a great earthquake.”
Numbered Discourses
Householders
First: Powers
“Mendicants, there are these eight powers.
What eight?
Crying is the power of babies. Anger is the power of females. Weapons are the power of bandits. Authority is the power of rulers. Complaining is the power of fools. Reason is the power of the astute. Reflection is the power of the learned. Patience is the power of ascetics and brahmins.
These are the eight powers.”
Numbered Discourses
Second: Worldly Conditions
“Mendicants, the eight worldly conditions revolve around the world, and the world revolves around the eight worldly conditions.
What eight?
Gain and loss, fame and disgrace, praise and blame, pleasure and pain.
These eight worldly conditions revolve around the world, and the world revolves around these eight worldly conditions.
An uneducated ordinary person encounters gain and loss, fame and disgrace, praise and blame, and pleasure and pain.
And so does an educated noble disciple.
What, then, is the difference between an ordinary uneducated person and an educated noble disciple?”
“Our teachings are rooted in the Buddha.
He is our guide and our refuge.
Sir, may the Buddha himself please clarify the meaning of this. The mendicants will listen and remember it.”
“Well then, mendicants, listen and pay close attention, I will speak.”
“Yes, sir,” they replied.
The Buddha said this:
“Mendicants, an uneducated ordinary person encounters gain.
They don’t reflect:
‘I’ve encountered this gain.
It’s impermanent, suffering, and perishable.’ They don’t truly understand it.
They encounter loss …
disgrace …
pleasure …
They don’t reflect:
‘I’ve encountered this pain.
It’s impermanent, suffering, and perishable.’ They don’t truly understand it.
So gain and loss, fame and disgrace, praise and blame, and pleasure and pain occupy their mind.
They favor gain and oppose loss.
They favor fame and oppose disgrace.
They favor praise and oppose blame.
They favor pleasure and oppose pain.
Being so full of favoring and opposing, they’re not freed from rebirth, old age, and death, from sorrow, lamentation, pain, sadness, and distress.
They’re not freed from suffering, I say.
An educated noble disciple encounters gain.
They reflect:
‘I’ve encountered this gain.
It’s impermanent, suffering, and perishable.’ They truly understand it.
They encounter loss …
disgrace …
pleasure …
They reflect:
‘I’ve encountered this pain.
It’s impermanent, suffering, and perishable.’ They truly understand it.
So gain and loss, fame and disgrace, praise and blame, and pleasure and pain don’t occupy their mind.
They don’t favor gain or oppose loss.
They don’t favor fame or oppose disgrace.
They don’t favor praise or oppose blame.
They don’t favor pleasure or oppose pain.
Having given up favoring and opposing, they’re freed from rebirth, old age, and death, from sorrow, lamentation, pain, sadness, and distress.
They’re freed from suffering, I say.
This is the difference between an educated noble disciple and an uneducated ordinary person.
Gain and loss, fame and disgrace,
praise and blame, and pleasure and pain.
These qualities among people are impermanent,
transient, and perishable.
A clever and mindful person knows these things,
seeing that they’re perishable.
Desirable things don’t disturb their mind,
nor are they repelled by the undesirable.
Both favoring and opposing
are cleared and ended, they are no more.
Knowing the stainless, sorrowless state,
they understand rightly, going beyond rebirth.”
Numbered Discourses
With Gotamī
At one time the Buddha was staying in the land of the Sakyans, near Kapilavatthu in the Banyan Tree Monastery.
Then Mahāpajāpatī Gotamī went up to the Buddha, bowed, stood to one side, and said to him:
“Sir, please let females gain the going forth from the lay life to homelessness in the teaching and training proclaimed by the Realized One.”
“Enough, Gotamī.
Don’t advocate for females to gain the going forth from the lay life to homelessness in the teaching and training proclaimed by the Realized One.”
For a second time …
For a third time, Mahāpajāpatī Gotamī said to the Buddha:
“Sir, please let females gain the going forth from the lay life to homelessness in the teaching and training proclaimed by the Realized One.”
“Enough, Gotamī.
Don’t advocate for females to gain the going forth from the lay life to homelessness in the teaching and training proclaimed by the Realized One.”
Then Mahāpajāpatī Gotamī thought, “The Buddha does not permit females to go forth.” Miserable and sad, weeping, with a tearful face, she bowed, and respectfully circled the Buddha, keeping him on her right, before leaving.
When the Buddha had stayed in Kapilavatthu as long as he wished, he set out for Vesālī.
Traveling stage by stage, he arrived at Vesālī,
where he stayed at the Great Wood, in the hall with the peaked roof.
Then Mahāpajāpatī Gotamī had her hair cut off and dressed in ocher robes. Together with several Sakyan ladies she set out for Vesālī.
Traveling stage by stage, she arrived at Vesālī and went to the Great Wood, the hall with the peaked roof.
Then Mahāpajāpatī Gotamī stood crying outside the gate, her feet swollen, her limbs covered with dust, miserable and sad, with tearful face.
Venerable Ānanda saw her standing there,
and said to her,
“Gotamī, why do you stand crying outside the gate, your feet swollen, your limbs covered with dust, miserable and sad, with tearful face?”
“Sir, Ānanda, it’s because the Buddha does not permit females to go forth in the teaching and training proclaimed by the Realized One.”
“Well then, Gotamī, wait here just a moment, while I ask the Buddha to grant the going forth for females.”
Then Venerable Ānanda went up to the Buddha, bowed, sat down to one side, and said to him:
“Sir, Mahāpajāpatī Gotamī is standing crying outside the gate, her feet swollen, her limbs covered with dust, miserable and sad, with tearful face.
She says that it’s because the Buddha does not permit females to go forth.
Sir, please let females gain the going forth from the lay life to homelessness in the teaching and training proclaimed by the Realized One.”
“Enough, Ānanda.
Don’t advocate for females to gain the going forth from the lay life to homelessness in the teaching and training proclaimed by the Realized One.”
For a second time …
For a third time, Ānanda said to the Buddha:
“Sir, please let females gain the going forth from the lay life to homelessness in the teaching and training proclaimed by the Realized One.”
“Enough, Ānanda.
Don’t advocate for females to gain the going forth from the lay life to homelessness in the teaching and training proclaimed by the Realized One.”
Then Venerable Ānanda thought,
“The Buddha does not permit females to go forth.
Why don’t I try another approach?”
Then Venerable Ānanda said to the Buddha,
“Sir, is a female able to realize the fruits of stream-entry, once-return, non-return, and perfection once she has gone forth?”
“She is able, Ānanda.”
“If a female is able to realize the fruits of stream-entry, once-return, non-return, and perfection once she has gone forth.
Sir, Mahāpajāpatī has been very helpful to the Buddha. She is his aunt who raised him, nurtured him, and gave him her milk.
When the Buddha’s birth mother passed away, she nurtured him at her own breast.
Sir, please let females gain the going forth from the lay life to homelessness in the teaching and training proclaimed by the Realized One.”
“Ānanda, if Mahāpajāpatī Gotamī accepts these eight principles of respect, that will be her ordination.
A nun, even if she has been ordained for a hundred years, should bow down to a monk who was ordained that very day. She should rise up for him, greet him with joined palms, and observe proper etiquette toward him.
This principle should be honored, respected, esteemed, and venerated, and not transgressed so long as life lasts.
A nun should not commence the rainy season residence in a monastery without monks.
This principle should be honored, respected, esteemed, and venerated, and not transgressed so long as life lasts.
Each fortnight the nuns should expect two things from the community of monks:
the date of the sabbath, and visiting for advice.
This principle should be honored, respected, esteemed, and venerated, and not transgressed so long as life lasts.
After completing the rainy season residence the nuns should invite admonition from the communities of both monks and nuns in regard to anything that was
seen, heard, or suspected.
This principle should be honored, respected, esteemed, and venerated, and not transgressed so long as life lasts.
A nun who has committed a grave offense should undergo penance in the communities of both monks and nuns for a fortnight.
This principle should be honored, respected, esteemed, and venerated, and not transgressed so long as life lasts.
A trainee nun who has trained in the six rules for two years should seek ordination from the communities of both monks and nuns.
This principle should be honored, respected, esteemed, and venerated, and not transgressed so long as life lasts.
A nun should not abuse or insult a monk in any way.
This principle should be honored, respected, esteemed, and venerated, and not transgressed so long as life lasts.
From this day forth it is forbidden for nuns to criticize monks, but it is not forbidden for monks to criticize nuns.
This principle should be honored, respected, esteemed, and venerated, and not transgressed so long as life lasts.
If Mahāpajāpatī Gotamī accepts these eight principles of respect, that will be her ordination.”
Then Ānanda, having learned these eight principles of respect from the Buddha himself, went to Mahāpajāpatī Gotamī and said:
“Gotamī, if you accept eight principles of respect, that will be your ordination.
A nun, even if she has been ordained for a hundred years, should bow down to a monk who was ordained that very day. She should rise up for him, greet him with joined palms, and observe proper etiquette toward him.
This principle should be honored, respected, esteemed, and venerated, and not transgressed so long as life lasts. …
From this day forth it is forbidden for nuns to criticize monks, but it is not forbidden for monks to criticize nuns.
This principle should be honored, respected, esteemed, and venerated, and not transgressed so long as life lasts.
If you accept these eight principles of respect, that will be your ordination.”
“Ānanda, suppose there was a woman or man who was young, youthful, and fond of adornments, and had bathed their head. After getting a garland of lotuses, jasmine, or liana flowers, they would take them in both hands and place them on the crown of the head.
In the same way, sir, I accept these eight principles of respect as not to be transgressed so long as life lasts.”
Then Venerable Ānanda went up to the Buddha, bowed, sat down to one side, and said to the Buddha:
“Sir, Mahāpajāpatī Gotamī has accepted the eight principles of respect as not to be transgressed so long as life lasts.”
“Ānanda, if females had not gained the going forth from the lay life to homelessness in the teaching and training proclaimed by the Realized One, the spiritual life would have lasted long. The true teaching would have remained for a thousand years.
But since they have gained the going forth, now the spiritual life will not last long.
The true teaching will remain only five hundred years.
It’s like those families with many women and few men. They’re easy prey for bandits and thieves.
In the same way, the spiritual life does not last long in a teaching and training where females gain the going forth.
It’s like a field full of rice. Once the disease called ‘white bones’ attacks, it doesn’t last long.
In the same way, the spiritual life does not last long in a teaching and training where females gain the going forth.
It’s like a field full of sugar cane. Once the disease called ‘red rot’ attacks, it doesn’t last long.
In the same way, the spiritual life does not last long in a teaching and training where females gain the going forth.
As a man might build a dyke around a large lake as a precaution against the water overflowing,
in the same way as a precaution I’ve prescribed the eight principles of respect as not to be transgressed so long as life lasts.”
Numbered Discourses
Devadatta’s Failure
At one time the Buddha was staying near Rājagaha, on the Vulture’s Peak Mountain, not long after Devadatta had left.
There the Buddha spoke to the mendicants about Devadatta:
“Mendicants, it’s good for a mendicant to check their own failings from time to time.
It’s good for a mendicant to check the failings of others from time to time.
It’s good for a mendicant to check their own successes from time to time.
It’s good for a mendicant to check the successes of others from time to time.
Overcome and overwhelmed by eight things that oppose the true teaching, Devadatta is going to a place of loss, to hell, there to remain for an eon, irredeemable.
What eight?
Overcome and overwhelmed by gain …
disgrace …
dishonor …
wicked desires …
bad friendship, Devadatta is going to a place of loss, to hell, there to remain for an eon, irredeemable.
Overcome and overwhelmed by these eight things that oppose the true teaching, Devadatta is going to a place of loss, to hell, there to remain for an eon, irredeemable.
It’s good for a mendicant, whenever they encounter it, to overcome gain …
disgrace …
dishonor …
wicked desires …
bad friendship.
What advantage does a mendicant gain by overcoming these eight things?
The distressing and feverish defilements that might arise in someone who lives without overcoming these eight things do not arise when they have overcome them.
This is the advantage that a mendicant gains by overcoming these eight things.
So, mendicants, you should train like this:
‘Whenever we encounter it, we will overcome gain …
disgrace …
dishonor …
wicked desires …
bad friendship.’
That’s how you should train.”
Numbered Discourses
First: Eight People
“Mendicants, these eight people are worthy of offerings dedicated to the gods, worthy of hospitality, worthy of a religious donation, worthy of greeting with joined palms, and are the supreme field of merit for the world.
What eight?
The stream-enterer and the one practicing to realize the fruit of stream-entry. The once-returner and the one practicing to realize the fruit of once-return. The non-returner and the one practicing to realize the fruit of non-return. The perfected one, and the one practicing for perfection.
These are the eight people who are worthy of offerings dedicated to the gods, worthy of hospitality, worthy of a religious donation, worthy of greeting with joined palms, and are the supreme field of merit for the world.
Four practicing the path,
and four established in the fruit.
This is the upright Saṅgha,
with wisdom, ethics, and immersion.
For humans, those merit-seeking creatures,
who sponsor sacrifices,
making worldly merit,
what is given to the Saṅgha is very fruitful.”
Numbered Discourses
Householders
First: With Hatthaka
At one time the Buddha was staying near Āḷavī, at the Aggāḷava Tree-shrine.
There the Buddha addressed the mendicants:
“Mendicants, you should remember the householder Hatthaka of Āḷavī as someone who has seven amazing and incredible qualities.
What seven?
He’s faithful,
conscientious,
You should remember the householder Hatthaka of Āḷavī as someone who has these seven amazing and incredible qualities.”
That is what the Buddha said.
When he had spoken, the Holy One got up from his seat and entered his dwelling.
Then a certain mendicant robed up in the morning and, taking his bowl and robe, went to the home of the householder Hatthaka of Āḷavī, where he sat on the seat spread out.
Then Hatthaka went up to that mendicant, bowed, and sat down to one side.
The mendicant said to Hatthaka:
“Householder, the Buddha declared that you have seven amazing and incredible qualities.
What seven?
He said that you’re faithful,
The Buddha declared that you have these seven amazing and incredible qualities.”
“But sir, I trust that no white-clothed lay people were present?”
“No, there weren’t any white-clothed lay people present.”
“That’s good, sir.”
Then that mendicant, after taking alms-food in Hatthaka of Āḷavī’s home, got up from his seat and left.
Then after the meal, on his return from alms-round, he went to the Buddha, bowed, sat down to one side, and told him of what he had discussed with the householder Hatthaka.
The Buddha said:
“Good, good, mendicant!
That gentleman has few wishes.
He doesn’t want his own good qualities to be made known to others.
Well then, mendicant, you should remember the householder Hatthaka of Āḷavī as someone who has this eighth amazing and incredible quality, that is, fewness of wishes.”
Numbered Discourses
Mindfulness
Proper Behavior in a Case of Aggravated Misconduct
“Mendicants, a mendicant who has been convicted of aggravated misconduct must behave themselves properly in eight respects.
They must not perform an ordination, give dependence, or be attended by a novice. They must not consent to being appointed as adviser for nuns, and if they are appointed they should not give such advice. They must not consent to any Saṅgha appointment. They must not be put in an isolated place. They must not give rehabilitation in any offense similar to that which they transgressed.
A mendicant who has been convicted of aggravated misconduct must behave themselves properly in these eight respects.”
Numbered Discourses
Householders
Anuruddha and the Great Thoughts
At one time the Buddha was staying in the land of the Bhaggas on Crocodile Hill, in the deer park at Bhesakaḷā’s Wood.
And at that time Venerable Anuruddha was staying in the land of the Cetīs in the Eastern Bamboo Park.
Then as Anuruddha was in private retreat this thought came to his mind:
“This teaching is for those of few wishes, not those of many wishes.
It’s for the contented, not those who lack contentment.
It’s for the secluded, not those who enjoy company.
It’s for the energetic, not the lazy.
It’s for the mindful, not the unmindful.
It’s for those with immersion, not those without immersion.
It’s for the wise, not the witless.”
Then the Buddha knew what Anuruddha was thinking. As easily as a strong person would extend or contract their arm, he vanished from the deer park at Bhesakaḷā’s Wood in the land of the Bhaggas and reappeared in front of Anurruddha in the Eastern Bamboo Park in the land of the Cetīs,
and sat on the seat spread out.
Anuruddha bowed to the Buddha and sat down to one side.
The Buddha said to him:
“Good, good, Anuruddha!
It’s good that you reflect on these thoughts of a great man:
‘This teaching is for those of few wishes, not those of many wishes.
It’s for the contented, not those who lack contentment.
It’s for the secluded, not those who enjoy company.
It’s for the energetic, not the lazy.
It’s for the mindful, not the unmindful.
It’s for those with immersion, not those without immersion.
It’s for the wise, not the witless.’
Well then, Anuruddha, you should also reflect on the following eighth thought of a great man:
‘This teaching is for those who don’t enjoy proliferating and don’t like to proliferate, not for those who enjoy proliferating and like to proliferate.’
First you’ll reflect on these eight thoughts of a great man. Then whenever you want, quite secluded from sensual pleasures, secluded from unskillful qualities, you’ll enter and remain in the first absorption, which has the rapture and bliss born of seclusion, while placing the mind and keeping it connected.
You’ll enter and remain in the second absorption, which has the rapture and bliss born of immersion, with internal clarity and confidence, and unified mind, without placing the mind and keeping it connected.
You’ll enter and remain in the third absorption, where you’ll meditate with equanimity, mindful and aware, personally experiencing the bliss of which the noble ones declare, ‘Equanimous and mindful, one meditates in bliss.’
Giving up pleasure and pain, and ending former happiness and sadness, you’ll enter and remain in the fourth absorption, without pleasure or pain, with pure equanimity and mindfulness.
First you’ll reflect on these eight thoughts of a great man, and you’ll get the four absorptions—blissful meditations in the present life that belong to the higher mind—when you want, without trouble or difficulty. Then as you live contented your rag robe will seem to you like a chest full of garments of different colors seems to a householder or householder’s child.
It will be for your enjoyment, relief, and comfort, and for alighting upon extinguishment.
As you live contented your scraps of alms-food will seem to you like boiled fine rice with the dark grains picked out, served with many soups and sauces seems to a householder or householder’s child.
It will be for your enjoyment, relief, and comfort, and for alighting upon extinguishment.
As you live contented your lodging at the root of a tree will seem to you like a bungalow, plastered inside and out, draft-free, with latches fastened and windows shuttered seems to a householder or householder’s child.
It will be for your enjoyment, relief, and comfort, and for alighting upon extinguishment.
As you live contented your lodging at the root of a tree will seem to you like a couch spread with woolen covers—shag-piled, pure white, or embroidered with flowers—and spread with a fine deer hide, with a canopy above and red pillows at both ends seems to a householder or householder’s child.
It will be for your enjoyment, relief, and comfort, and for alighting upon extinguishment.
As you live contented your fermented urine as medicine will seem to you like various medicines—ghee, butter, oil, honey, molasses, and salt—seem to a householder or householder’s child.
It will be for your enjoyment, relief, and comfort, and for alighting upon extinguishment.
Well then, Anuruddha, for the next rainy season residence you should stay right here in the land of the Cetīs in the Eastern Bamboo Park.”
“Yes, sir,” Anuruddha replied.
After advising Anuruddha like this, the Buddha—as easily as a strong person would extend or contract their arm, vanished from the Eastern Bamboo Park in the land of the Cetīs and reappeared in the deer park at Bhesakaḷā’s Wood in the land of the Bhaggas.
He sat on the seat spread out
and addressed the mendicants:
“Mendicants, I will teach you the eight thoughts of a great man. Listen …
And what are the eight thoughts of a great man?
This teaching is for those of few wishes, not those of many wishes.
It’s for the contented, not those who lack contentment.
It’s for the secluded, not those who enjoy company.
It’s for the energetic, not the lazy.
It’s for the mindful, not the unmindful.
It’s for those with immersion, not those without immersion.
It’s for the wise, not the witless.
It’s for those who don’t enjoy proliferating and don’t like to proliferate, not for those who enjoy proliferating and like to proliferate.
‘This teaching is for those of few wishes, not those of many wishes.’
That’s what I said, but why did I say it?
A mendicant with few wishes doesn’t wish: ‘May they know me as having few wishes!’ When contented, they don’t wish: ‘May they know me as contented!’ When secluded, they don’t wish: ‘May they know me as secluded!’ When energetic, they don’t wish: ‘May they know me as energetic!’ When mindful, they don’t wish: ‘May they know me as mindful!’ When immersed, they don’t wish: ‘May they know me as immersed!’ When wise, they don’t wish: ‘May they know me as wise!’ When not enjoying proliferation, they don’t wish: ‘May they know me as one who doesn’t enjoy proliferating!’
‘This teaching is for those of few wishes, not those of many wishes.’
That’s what I said, and this is why I said it.
‘This teaching is for the contented, not those who lack contentment.’ That’s what I said, but why did I say it?
It’s for a mendicant who’s content with any kind of robes, alms-food, lodgings, and medicines and supplies for the sick.
‘This teaching is for the contented, not those who lack contentment.’
That’s what I said, and this is why I said it.
‘This teaching is for the secluded, not those who enjoy company.’ That’s what I said, but why did I say it?
It’s for a mendicant who lives secluded. But monks, nuns, laymen, laywomen, rulers and their ministers, founders of religious sects and their disciples go to visit them.
With a mind slanting, sloping, and inclining to seclusion, withdrawn, and loving renunciation, that mendicant invariably gives each of them a talk emphasizing the topic of dismissal.
‘This teaching is for the secluded, not those who enjoy company.’
That’s what I said, and this is why I said it.
‘This teaching is for the energetic, not the lazy.’ That’s what I said, but why did I say it?
It’s for a mendicant who lives with energy roused up for giving up unskillful qualities and embracing skillful qualities. They’re strong, staunchly vigorous, not slacking off when it comes to developing skillful qualities.
‘This teaching is for the energetic, not the lazy.’
That’s what I said, and this is why I said it.
‘This teaching is for the mindful, not the unmindful.’
That’s what I said, but why did I say it?
It’s for a mendicant who’s mindful. They have utmost mindfulness and alertness, and can remember and recall what was said and done long ago.
‘This teaching is for the mindful, not the unmindful.’
That’s what I said, and this is why I said it.
‘This teaching is for those with immersion, not those without immersion.’
That’s what I said, but why did I say it?
It’s for a mendicant who, quite secluded from sensual pleasures, secluded from unskillful qualities, enters and remains in the first absorption … second absorption … third absorption … fourth absorption.
‘This teaching is for those with immersion, not those without immersion.’
That’s what I said, and this is why I said it.
‘This teaching is for the wise, not the witless.’
That’s what I said, but why did I say it?
It’s for a mendicant who’s wise. They have the wisdom of arising and passing away which is noble, penetrative, and leads to the complete ending of suffering.
‘This teaching is for the wise, not the witless.’
That’s what I said, and this is why I said it.
‘This teaching is for those who don’t enjoy proliferating and don’t like to proliferate, not for those who enjoy proliferating and like to proliferate.’
That’s what I said, but why did I say it?
It’s for a mendicant whose mind is eager, confident, settled, and decided regarding the cessation of proliferation.
‘This teaching is for those who don’t enjoy proliferating and don’t like to proliferate, not for those who enjoy proliferating and like to proliferate.’
That’s what I said, and this is why I said it.”
Then Anuruddha stayed the next rainy season residence right there in the land of the Cetīs in the Eastern Bamboo Park.
And Anuruddha, living alone, withdrawn, diligent, keen, and resolute, soon realized the supreme culmination of the spiritual path in this very life. He lived having achieved with his own insight the goal for which gentlemen rightly go forth from the lay life to homelessness.
He understood: “Rebirth is ended; the spiritual journey has been completed; what had to be done has been done; there is no return to any state of existence.”
And Venerable Anuruddha became one of the perfected.
And on the occasion of attaining perfection he recited these verses:
“Knowing my thoughts,
the supreme Teacher in the world
came to me in a mind-made body,
using his psychic power.
He taught me more
than I had thought of.
The Buddha who loves non-proliferation
taught me non-proliferation.
Understanding that teaching,
I happily did his bidding.
I’ve attained the three knowledges,
and have fulfilled the Buddha’s instructions.”
Numbered Discourses
First: Disliked
“Mendicants, a mendicant with eight qualities is disliked and disapproved by their spiritual companions, not respected or admired.
What eight?
It’s when a mendicant praises the disliked and criticizes the liked. They desire material possessions and honor. They lack conscience and prudence. They have wicked desires and wrong view.
A mendicant with these eight qualities is disliked and disapproved by their spiritual companions, not respected or admired.
A mendicant with eight qualities is liked and approved by their spiritual companions, and respected and admired.
What eight?
It’s when a mendicant doesn’t praise the disliked and criticize the liked. They don’t desire material possessions and honor. They have conscience and prudence. They have few desires and right view.
A mendicant with these eight qualities is liked and approved by their spiritual companions, and respected and admired.”
Numbered Discourses
The Great Chapter
Stains
“Mendicants, there are these eight stains.
What eight?
Not reciting is the stain of hymns.
Neglect is the stain of houses.
Laziness is the stain of beauty.
Negligence is a guard’s stain.
Misconduct is a woman’s stain.
Stinginess is a giver’s stain.
Bad, unskillful qualities are a stain in this world and the next.
Worse than any of these is ignorance, the worst stain of all.
These are the eight stains.
Not reciting is the stain of hymns.
The stain of houses is neglect.
Laziness is the stain of beauty.
A guard’s stain is negligence.
Misconduct is a woman’s stain.
A giver’s stain is stinginess.
Bad qualities are a stain
in this world and the next.
But a worse stain than these
is ignorance, the worst stain of all.”
Numbered Discourses
Householders
With Mahānāma
At one time the Buddha was staying in the land of the Sakyans, near Kapilavatthu in the Banyan Tree Monastery.
Then Mahānāma the Sakyan went up to the Buddha, bowed, sat down to one side, and said to him:
“Sir, how is a lay follower defined?”
“Mahānāma, when you’ve gone for refuge to the Buddha, the teaching, and the Saṅgha,
you’re considered to be a lay follower.”
“But how is an ethical lay follower defined?”
“When a lay follower doesn’t kill living creatures, steal, commit sexual misconduct, lie, or use alcoholic drinks that cause negligence,
they’re considered to be an ethical lay follower.”
“But how do we define a lay follower who is practicing to benefit themselves, not others?”
“A lay follower is accomplished in faith, but doesn’t encourage others to do the same.
They’re accomplished in ethical conduct, but don’t encourage others to do the same.
They’re accomplished in generosity, but don’t encourage others to do the same.
They like to see the mendicants, but don’t encourage others to do the same.
They like to hear the true teaching, but don’t encourage others to do the same.
They readily memorize the teachings they’ve heard, but don’t encourage others to do the same.
They examine the meaning of the teachings they’ve memorized, but don’t encourage others to do the same.
Understanding the meaning and the teaching, they practice accordingly, but they don’t encourage others to do the same.
That’s how we define a lay follower who is practicing to benefit themselves, not others.”
“But how do we define a lay follower who is practicing to benefit both themselves and others?”
“A lay follower is accomplished in faith and encourages others to do the same.
They’re accomplished in ethical conduct and encourage others to do the same.
They’re accomplished in generosity and encourage others to do the same.
They like to see the mendicants and encourage others to do the same.
They like to hear the true teaching and encourage others to do the same.
They readily memorize the teachings they’ve heard and encourage others to do the same.
They examine the meaning of the teachings they’ve memorized and encourage others to do the same.
Understanding the meaning and the teaching, they practice accordingly and they encourage others to do the same.
That’s how we define a lay follower who is practicing to benefit both themselves and others.”
Numbered Discourses
Sabbath
With Visākhā on the Loveable Gods
At one time the Buddha was staying near Sāvatthī in the Eastern Monastery, the stilt longhouse of Migāra’s mother.
Then Visākhā, Migāra’s mother, went up to the Buddha, bowed, and sat down to one side.
The Buddha said to her:
“Visākhā, when they have eight qualities females—when their body breaks up, after death—are reborn in company with the Gods of the Lovable Host.
What eight?
Take the case of a female whose mother and father give her to a husband wanting what’s best for her, out of kindness and compassion. She would get up before him and go to bed after him, and be obliging, behaving nicely and speaking politely. …
She’s generous.
She lives at home rid of the stain of stinginess, freely generous, open-handed, loving to let go, committed to charity, loving to give and to share.
When they have these eight qualities females—when their body breaks up, after death—are reborn in company with the Gods of the Lovable Host.
She’d never look down on her husband,
who’s always eager to work hard,
always looking after her,
and bringing whatever she wants.
And a good woman never scolds her husband
with jealous words.
Being astute, she reveres
those respected by her husband.
She gets up early, works tirelessly,
and manages the domestic help.
She’s loveable to her husband,
and preserves his wealth.
A lady who fulfills these duties
according to her husband’s desire,
is reborn among the gods
called ‘Loveable’.”
Numbered Discourses
First: Giving
“Mendicants, there are these eight gifts.
What eight?
A person might give a gift after insulting the recipient.
Or they give out of fear.
Or they give thinking, ‘They gave to me.’
Or they give thinking, ‘They’ll give to me.’
Or they give thinking, ‘It’s good to give.’
Or they give thinking, ‘I cook, they don’t. It wouldn’t be right for me to not give to them.’
Or they give thinking, ‘By giving this gift I’ll get a good reputation.’
Or they give thinking, ‘This is an adornment and requisite for the mind.’
These are the eight gifts.”
Numbered Discourses
“Mendicants, you could rightly call Nanda ‘Gentleman’,
and ‘lustful’.
How could he live the full and pure spiritual life unless he guards the sense doors, eats in moderation, is dedicated to wakefulness, and has mindfulness and situational awareness?
This is how Nanda guards the sense doors.
If he has to look to the east, he wholeheartedly concentrates before looking, thinking:
‘When I look to the east, bad, unskillful qualities of desire and aversion will not overwhelm me.’
In this way he’s aware of the situation.
If he has to look to the west …
If he has to survey the intermediate directions, he wholeheartedly concentrates before looking, thinking:
‘When I survey the intermediate directions, bad, unskillful qualities of desire and aversion will not overwhelm me.’
In this way he’s aware of the situation.
This is how Nanda guards the sense doors.
This is how Nanda eats in moderation.
Nanda reflects properly on the food he eats:
‘Not for fun, indulgence, adornment, or decoration, but only to sustain this body, to avoid harm, and to support spiritual practice. In this way, I shall put an end to old discomfort and not give rise to new discomfort, and I will live blamelessly and at ease.’
This is how Nanda eats in moderation.
This is how Nanda is committed to wakefulness.
Nanda practices walking and sitting meditation by day, purifying his mind from obstacles.
In the evening, he continues to practice walking and sitting meditation.
In the middle of the night, he lies down in the lion’s posture—on the right side, placing one foot on top of the other—mindful and aware, and focused on the time of getting up.
In the last part of the night, he gets up and continues to practice walking and sitting meditation, purifying his mind from obstacles.
This is how Nanda is committed to wakefulness.
This is how Nanda has mindfulness and situational awareness.
Nanda knows feelings as they arise, as they remain, and as they go away.
He knows perceptions as they arise, as they remain, and as they go away.
He knows thoughts as they arise, as they remain, and as they go away.
This is how Nanda has mindfulness and situational awareness.
How could Nanda live the full and pure spiritual life unless he guards the sense doors, eats in moderation, is dedicated to wakefulness, and has mindfulness and situational awareness?”
Numbered Discourses
Awakening
With Sutavā the Wanderer
At one time the Buddha was staying near Rājagaha, on the Vulture’s Peak Mountain.
Then the wanderer Sutavā went up to the Buddha, and exchanged greetings with him.
When the greetings and polite conversation were over, he sat down to one side and said to the Buddha:
“Sir, one time the Buddha was staying right here in Rājagaha, the Mountainfold.
There I heard and learned this in the presence of the Buddha:
‘A mendicant who is perfected—with defilements ended, who has completed the spiritual journey, done what had to be done, laid down the burden, achieved their own true goal, utterly ended the fetters of rebirth, and is rightly freed through enlightenment—can’t transgress in five respects.
A mendicant with defilements ended can’t deliberately take the life of a living creature, take something with the intention to steal, have sex, tell a deliberate lie, or store up goods for their own enjoyment like they did as a lay person.’
I trust I properly heard, learned, attended, and remembered that from the Buddha?”
“Indeed, Sutavā, you properly heard, learned, attended, and remembered that.
In the past, as today, I say this:
‘A mendicant who is perfected—with defilements ended, who has completed the spiritual journey, done what had to be done, laid down the burden, achieved their own true goal, utterly ended the fetters of rebirth, and is rightly freed through enlightenment—can’t transgress in nine respects.
A mendicant with defilements ended can’t deliberately take the life of a living creature, take something with the intention to steal, have sex, tell a deliberate lie, or store up goods for their own enjoyment like they did as a lay person. And they can’t make decisions prejudiced by favoritism, hostility, stupidity, or cowardice.’
In the past, as today, I say this:
‘A mendicant who is perfected—with defilements ended, who has completed the spiritual journey, done what had to be done, laid down the burden, achieved their own true goal, utterly ended the fetters of rebirth, and is rightly freed through enlightenment—can’t transgress in these nine respects.’”
Numbered Discourses
A Safe Place
Requirements for Perfection
“Mendicants, without giving up nine things you can’t realize perfection.
What nine?
Greed, hate, delusion, anger, hostility, disdain, contempt, jealousy, and stinginess.
Without giving up these nine things you can’t realize perfection.
After giving up nine things you can realize perfection.
What nine?
Greed, hate, delusion, anger, hostility, disdain, contempt, jealousy, and stinginess.
After giving up these nine things you can realize the fruit of perfection.”
Numbered Discourses
Mindfulness Meditation
Emotional Shackles
“Mendicants, there are these five emotional shackles.
What five?
Firstly, a mendicant isn’t free of greed, desire, fondness, thirst, passion, and craving for sensual pleasures.
This being so, their mind doesn’t incline toward keenness, commitment, persistence, and striving.
This is the first emotional shackle.
Furthermore, a mendicant isn’t free of greed for the body …
They’re not free of greed for form …
They eat as much as they like until their belly is full, then indulge in the pleasures of sleeping, lying, and drowsing …
They lead the spiritual life wishing to be reborn in one of the orders of gods:
‘By this precept or observance or mortification or spiritual life, may I become one of the gods!’
This being so, their mind doesn’t incline toward keenness, commitment, persistence, and striving.
This is the fifth emotional shackle.
These are the five emotional shackles.
To give up these five emotional shackles you should develop the four kinds of mindfulness meditation.
What four?
It’s when a mendicant meditates by observing an aspect of the body—keen, aware, and mindful, rid of desire and aversion for the world.
They meditate observing an aspect of feelings …
They meditate observing an aspect of principles—keen, aware, and mindful, rid of desire and aversion for the world.
To give up these five emotional shackles you should develop these four kinds of mindfulness meditation.”
Numbered Discourses
The Lion’s Roar
Sāriputta’s Lion’s Roar
At one time the Buddha was staying near Sāvatthī in Jeta’s Grove, Anāthapiṇḍika’s monastery.
Then Venerable Sāriputta went up to the Buddha, bowed, sat down to one side, and said to him,
“Sir, I have completed the rainy season residence at Sāvatthī.
I wish to depart to wander the countryside.”
“Please, Sāriputta, go at your convenience.”
Then Sāriputta got up from his seat, bowed, and respectfully circled the Buddha, keeping him on his right, before leaving.
And then, not long after Sāriputta had left, a certain monk said to the Buddha,
“Sir, Venerable Sāriputta attacked me and left without saying sorry.”
So the Buddha addressed a certain monk,
“Please, monk, in my name tell Sāriputta that
the teacher summons him.”
“Yes, sir,” that monk replied. He went to Sāriputta and said to him,
“Reverend Sāriputta, the teacher summons you.”
“Yes, reverend,” Sāriputta replied.
Now at that time the venerables Mahāmoggallāna and Ānanda took a key and went from dwelling to dwelling, saying:
“Come forth, venerables! Come forth, venerables!
Now Venerable Sāriputta will roar his lion’s roar in the presence of the Buddha!”
Then Venerable Sāriputta went up to the Buddha, bowed, and sat down to one side.
The Buddha said to him:
“Sāriputta, one of your spiritual companions has made this complaint:
‘Venerable Sāriputta attacked me and left without saying sorry.’”
“Sir, someone who had not established mindfulness of the body might well attack one of their spiritual companions and leave without saying sorry.
Suppose they were to toss both clean and unclean things on the earth, like feces, urine, spit, pus, and blood. The earth isn’t horrified, repelled, and disgusted because of this.
In the same way, I live with a heart like the earth, abundant, expansive, limitless, free of enmity and ill will.
Someone who had not established mindfulness of the body might well attack one of their spiritual companions and leave without saying sorry.
Suppose they were to wash both clean and unclean things in water, like feces, urine, spit, pus, and blood. The water isn’t horrified, repelled, and disgusted because of this.
In the same way, I live with a heart like water, abundant, expansive, limitless, free of enmity and ill will.
Someone who had not established mindfulness of the body might well attack one of their spiritual companions and leave without saying sorry.
Suppose a fire was to burn both clean and unclean things, like feces, urine, spit, pus, and blood. The fire isn’t horrified, repelled, and disgusted because of this.
In the same way, I live with a heart like fire, abundant, expansive, limitless, free of enmity and ill will.
Someone who had not established mindfulness of the body might well attack one of their spiritual companions and leave without saying sorry.
Suppose the wind was to blow on both clean and unclean things, like feces, urine, spit, pus, and blood. The wind isn’t horrified, repelled, and disgusted because of this.
In the same way, I live with a heart like the wind, abundant, expansive, limitless, free of enmity and ill will.
Someone who had not established mindfulness of the body might well attack one of their spiritual companions and leave without saying sorry.
Suppose a rag was to wipe up both clean and unclean things, like feces, urine, spit, pus, and blood. The rag isn’t horrified, repelled, and disgusted because of this.
In the same way, I live with a heart like a rag, abundant, expansive, limitless, free of enmity and ill will.
Someone who had not established mindfulness of the body might well attack one of their spiritual companions and leave without saying sorry.
Suppose an outcaste boy or girl, holding a pot and clad in rags, were to enter a town or village. They’d enter with a humble mind.
In the same way, I live with a heart like an outcaste boy or girl, abundant, limitless, measureless, free of enmity and ill will.
Someone who had not established mindfulness of the body might well attack one of their spiritual companions and leave without saying sorry.
Suppose there was a bull with his horns cut, gentle, well tamed and well trained. He’d wander from street to street and square to square without hurting anyone with his feet or horns.
In the same way, I live with a heart like a bull with horns cut, abundant, expansive, limitless, free of enmity and ill will.
Someone who had not established mindfulness of the body might well attack one of their spiritual companions and leave without saying sorry.
Suppose there was a woman or man who was young, youthful, and fond of adornments, and had bathed their head. If the corpse of a snake or a dog or a human were hung around their neck, they’d be horrified, repelled, and disgusted.
In the same way, I’m horrified, repelled, and disgusted by this rotten body.
Someone who had not established mindfulness of the body might well attack one of their spiritual companions and leave without saying sorry.
Suppose someone was to carry around a bowl of fat that was leaking and oozing from holes and cracks.
In the same way, I carry around this body that’s leaking and oozing from holes and cracks.
Someone who had not established mindfulness of the body might well attack one of their spiritual companions and leave without saying sorry.”
Then that monk rose from his seat, placed his robe over one shoulder, bowed with his head at the Buddha’s feet, and said,
“I have made a mistake, sir. It was foolish, stupid, and unskillful of me to speak ill of Venerable Sāriputta with a false, hollow, lying, untruthful claim.
Please, sir, accept my mistake for what it is, so I will restrain myself in future.”
“Indeed, monk, you made a mistake. It was foolish, stupid, and unskillful of you to act in that way.
But since you have recognized your mistake for what it is, and have dealt with it properly, I accept it.
For it is growth in the training of the Noble One to recognize a mistake for what it is, deal with it properly, and commit to restraint in the future.”
Then the Buddha said to Venerable Sāriputta,
“Sāriputta, forgive that silly man before his head explodes into seven pieces right here.”
“I will pardon that venerable if he asks me:
‘May the venerable please pardon me too.’”
Numbered Discourses
Similarity
Extinguishment Is Visible in This Very Life
“Reverend, they say that ‘extinguishment is visible in this very life’.
In what way did the Buddha say extinguishment is visible in this very life?”
“First, take a mendicant who, quite secluded from sensual pleasures … enters and remains in the first absorption.
To this extent the Buddha said that extinguishment is visible in this very life in a qualified sense. …
Furthermore, take a mendicant who, going totally beyond the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception, enters and remains in the cessation of perception and feeling. And, having seen with wisdom, their defilements come to an end.
To this extent the Buddha said that extinguishment is visible in this very life in a definitive sense.”
Numbered Discourses
Abodes of Sentient Beings
Grounds for Resentment
“Mendicants, there are nine grounds for resentment.
What nine?
Thinking: ‘They did wrong to me,’ you harbor resentment.
Thinking: ‘They are doing wrong to me’ …
‘They will do wrong to me’ …
‘They did wrong to someone I love’ …
‘They are doing wrong to someone I love’ …
‘They will do wrong to someone I love’ …
‘They helped someone I dislike’ …
‘They are helping someone I dislike’ …
Thinking: ‘They will help someone I dislike,’ you harbor resentment.
These are the nine grounds for resentment.”
Numbered Discourses
Similarity
Extinguishment
“Reverend, they speak of ‘extinguishment’. …”
Numbered Discourses
A Safe Place
The Deathless
“Reverend, they speak of ‘the deathless’. …”
Numbered Discourses
The Lion’s Roar
The Simile of the Boil
“Mendicants, suppose there was a boil that was many years old.
And that boil had nine orifices that were continually open wounds.
Whatever oozed out of them
would be filthy, stinking, and disgusting.
Whatever leaked out them
would be filthy, stinking, and disgusting.
‘Boil’ is a term for this body made up of the four primary elements, produced by mother and father, built up from rice and porridge, liable to impermanence, to wearing away and erosion, to breaking up and destruction.
And that boil has nine orifices that are continually open wounds.
Whatever oozes out of them
is filthy, stinking, and disgusting.
Whatever leaks out of them
is filthy, stinking, and disgusting.
So, mendicants, have no illusion about this body.”
Numbered Discourses
A Safe Place
Reaching a Place Without Fear
“Reverend, they speak of ‘reaching a place without fear’. …”
Numbered Discourses
Abbreviated Texts Beginning with Greed
“For insight into greed, nine things should be developed.
What nine?
The perceptions of ugliness, death, repulsiveness of food, dissatisfaction with the whole world, impermanence, suffering in impermanence, not-self in suffering, giving up, and fading away.
For insight into greed, these nine things should be developed.”
Numbered Discourses
Mindfulness Meditation
Grasping Aggregates
“Mendicants, there are these five grasping aggregates.
What five?
The grasping aggregates of form, feeling, perception, choices, and consciousness.
These are the five grasping aggregates.
To give up these five grasping aggregates you should develop the four kinds of mindfulness meditation. …”
Numbered Discourses
Similarity
Freed by Wisdom
“Reverend, they speak of a person called ‘freed by wisdom’.
What is the one freed by wisdom that the Buddha spoke of?”
“First, take a mendicant who, quite secluded from sensual pleasures … enters and remains in the first absorption.
And they understand that with wisdom.
To this extent the Buddha spoke of the one freed by wisdom in a qualified sense. …
Furthermore, take a mendicant who, going totally beyond the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception, enters and remains in the cessation of perception and feeling. And, having seen with wisdom, their defilements come to an end.
And they understand that with wisdom.
To this extent the Buddha spoke of the one freed by wisdom in a definitive sense.”
Numbered Discourses
A Safe Place
Progressive Tranquility
“Reverend, they speak of ‘progressive tranquility’. …”
Numbered Discourses
The Great Chapter
The Simile of the Cow
“Mendicants, suppose there was a mountain cow who was foolish, incompetent, unskillful, and lacked common sense when roaming on rugged mountains.
She might think,
‘Why don’t I go somewhere I’ve never been before? I could eat grass and drink water that I’ve never tried before.’
She’d take a step with a fore-hoof; but before it was properly set down, she’d lift up a hind-hoof.
She wouldn’t go somewhere she’d never been before, or eat grass and drink water that she’d never tried before.
And she’d never return safely to the place she had started from.
Why is that?
Because that mountain cow was foolish, incompetent, unskillful, and lacked common sense when roaming on rugged mountains.
In the same way, some foolish, incompetent, unskillful mendicant, lacking common sense, quite secluded from sensual pleasures, secluded from unskillful qualities, enters and remains in the first absorption, which has the rapture and bliss born of seclusion, while placing the mind and keeping it connected.
But they don’t cultivate, develop, and make much of that foundation; they don’t ensure it is properly stabilized.
They think,
‘Why don’t I, as the placing of the mind and keeping it connected are stilled, enter and remain in the second absorption, which has the rapture and bliss born of immersion, with internal clarity and confidence, and unified mind, without placing the mind and keeping it connected.’
But they’re not able to enter and remain in the second absorption.
They think,
‘Why don’t I, quite secluded from sensual pleasures, secluded from unskillful qualities, enter and remain in the first absorption, which has the rapture and bliss born of seclusion, while placing the mind and keeping it connected.’
But they’re not able to enter and remain in the first absorption.
This is called a mendicant who has slipped and fallen from both sides. They’re like the mountain cow who was foolish, incompetent, unskillful, and lacking in common sense when roaming on rugged mountains.
Suppose there was a mountain cow who was astute, competent, skillful, and used common sense when roaming on rugged mountains.
She might think,
‘Why don’t I go somewhere I’ve never been before? I could eat grass and drink water that I’ve never tried before.’
She’d take a step with a fore-hoof; and after it was properly set down, she’d lift up a hind-hoof.
She’d go somewhere she’d never been before, and eat grass and drink water that she’d never tried before.
And she’d return safely to the place she had started from.
Why is that?
Because that mountain cow was astute, competent, skillful, and used common sense when roaming on rugged mountains.
In the same way, some astute, competent, skillful mendicant, using common sense, quite secluded from sensual pleasures, secluded from unskillful qualities, enters and remains in the first absorption, which has the rapture and bliss born of seclusion, while placing the mind and keeping it connected.
They cultivate, develop, and make much of that foundation, ensuring that it’s properly stabilized.
They think,
‘Why don’t I, as the placing of the mind and keeping it connected are stilled, enter and remain in the second absorption, which has the rapture and bliss born of immersion, with internal clarity and confidence, and unified mind, without placing the mind and keeping it connected.’
Without charging at the second absorption, as the placing of the mind and keeping it connected are stilled, they enter and remain in the second absorption.
They cultivate, develop, and make much of that foundation, ensuring that it’s properly stabilized.
They think,
‘Why don’t I, with the fading away of rapture, enter and remain in the third absorption, where I will meditate with equanimity, mindful and aware, personally experiencing the bliss of which the noble ones declare, “Equanimous and mindful, one meditates in bliss.”’
Without charging at the third absorption, with the fading away of rapture, they enter and remain in the third absorption.
They cultivate, develop, and make much of that foundation, ensuring that it’s properly stabilized.
They think,
‘Why don’t I, with the giving up of pleasure and pain, and the ending of former happiness and sadness, enter and remain in the fourth absorption, without pleasure or pain, with pure equanimity and mindfulness.’
Without charging at the fourth absorption, with the giving up of pleasure and pain, and the ending of former happiness and sadness, they enter and remain in the fourth absorption.
They cultivate, develop, and make much of that foundation, ensuring that it’s properly stabilized.
They think,
‘Why don’t I, going totally beyond perceptions of form, with the ending of perceptions of impingement, not focusing on perceptions of diversity, aware that “space is infinite”, enter and remain in the dimension of infinite space.’
Without charging at the dimension of infinite space, with the fading away of rapture, they enter and remain in the dimension of infinite space.
They cultivate, develop, and make much of that foundation, ensuring that it’s properly stabilized.
They think,
‘Why don’t I, going totally beyond the dimension of infinite space, aware that “consciousness is infinite”, enter and remain in the dimension of infinite consciousness.’
Without charging at the dimension of infinite consciousness, they enter and remain in the dimension of infinite consciousness.
They cultivate, develop, and make much of that foundation, ensuring that it’s properly stabilized.
They think,
‘Why don’t I, going totally beyond the dimension of infinite consciousness, aware that “there is nothing at all”, enter and remain in the dimension of nothingness.’
Without charging at the dimension of nothingness, they enter and remain in the dimension of nothingness.
They cultivate, develop, and make much of that foundation, ensuring that it’s properly stabilized.
They think,
‘Why don’t I, going totally beyond the dimension of nothingness, enter and remain in the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception.’
Without charging at the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception, they enter and remain in the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception.
They cultivate, develop, and make much of that foundation, ensuring that it’s properly stabilized.
They think,
‘Why don’t I, going totally beyond the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception, enter and remain in the cessation of perception and feeling.’
Without charging at the cessation of perception and feeling, they enter and remain in the cessation of perception and feeling.
When a mendicant enters and emerges from all these attainments, their mind becomes pliable and workable.
With a pliable and workable mind, their immersion becomes limitless and well developed.
They become capable of realizing anything that can be realized by insight to which they extend the mind, in each and every case.
They might wish:
‘May I wield the many kinds of psychic power: multiplying myself and becoming one again … controlling my body as far as the Brahmā realm.’
They are capable of realizing it, in each and every case.
They might wish:
‘With clairaudience that is purified and superhuman, may I hear both kinds of sounds, human and divine, whether near or far.’
They are capable of realizing it, in each and every case.
They might wish:
‘May I understand the minds of other beings and individuals, having comprehended them with my mind.
May I understand mind with greed as “mind with greed”,
and mind without greed as “mind without greed”;
mind with hate as “mind with hate”,
and mind without hate as “mind without hate”;
mind with delusion as “mind with delusion”,
and mind without delusion as “mind without delusion”;
constricted mind …
scattered mind …
expansive mind …
unexpansive mind …
mind that is not supreme …
mind that is supreme …
mind immersed in samādhi …
mind not immersed in samādhi …
freed mind …
and unfreed mind as “unfreed mind”.’
They are capable of realizing it, in each and every case.
They might wish:
‘May I recollect many kinds of past lives. That is: one, two, three, four, five, ten, twenty, thirty, forty, fifty, a hundred, a thousand, a hundred thousand rebirths; many eons of the world contracting, many eons of the world expanding, many eons of the world contracting and expanding. They remember: “There, I was named this, my clan was that, I looked like this, and that was my food. This was how I felt pleasure and pain, and that was how my life ended. When I passed away from that place I was reborn somewhere else. There, too, I was named this, my clan was that, I looked like this, and that was my food. This was how I felt pleasure and pain, and that was how my life ended. When I passed away from that place I was reborn here.” May I recollect my many past lives, with features and details.’
They’re capable of realizing it, in each and every case.
They might wish:
‘With clairvoyance that is purified and superhuman, may I see sentient beings passing away and being reborn—inferior and superior, beautiful and ugly, in a good place or a bad place—and understand how sentient beings are reborn according to their deeds.’
They’re capable of realizing it, in each and every case.
They might wish:
‘May I realize the undefiled freedom of heart and freedom by wisdom in this very life, and live having realized it with my own insight due to the ending of defilements.’
They’re capable of realizing it, in each and every case.”
Numbered Discourses
The Great Chapter
Progressive Meditations
“Mendicants, there are these nine progressive meditations.
What nine?
The first absorption, the second absorption, the third absorption, the fourth absorption, the dimension of infinite space, the dimension of infinite consciousness, the dimension of nothingness, the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception, and the cessation of perception and feeling.
These are the nine progressive meditations.”
Numbered Discourses
Awakening
“Mendicants, there are these four powers.
What four?
The powers of wisdom, energy, blamelessness, and inclusiveness.
And what is the power of wisdom?
One has clearly seen and clearly contemplated with wisdom those qualities that are skillful and considered to be skillful; those that are unskillful … blameworthy … blameless … dark … bright … to be cultivated … not to be cultivated … not worthy of the noble ones … worthy of the noble ones and considered to be worthy of the noble ones.
This is called the power of wisdom.
And what is the power of energy?
One generates enthusiasm, tries, makes an effort, exerts the mind, and strives to give up those qualities that are unskillful and considered to be unskillful; those that are blameworthy … dark … not to be cultivated … not worthy of the noble ones and considered to be not worthy of the noble ones.
One generates enthusiasm, tries, makes an effort, exerts the mind, and strives to gain those qualities that are skillful and considered to be skillful; those that are blameless … bright … to be cultivated … worthy of the noble ones and considered to be worthy of the noble ones.
This is called the power of energy.
And what is the power of blamelessness?
It’s when a mendicant has blameless conduct by way of body, speech, and mind.
This is called the power of blamelessness.
And what is the power of inclusiveness?
There are these four ways of being inclusive.
Giving, kindly words, taking care, and equality.
The best of gifts is the gift of the teaching.
The best sort of kindly speech is to teach the Dhamma again and again to someone who is engaged and who lends an ear.
The best way of taking care is to encourage, settle, and ground the unfaithful in faith, the unethical in ethics, the stingy in generosity, and the ignorant in wisdom.
The best kind of equality is the equality of a stream-enterer with another stream-enterer, a once-returner with another once-returner, a non-returner with another non-returner, and a perfected one with another perfected one.
This is called the power of inclusiveness.
These are the four powers.
A noble disciple who has these four powers has got past five fears.
What five?
Fear regarding livelihood, disrepute, feeling insecure in an assembly, death, and bad rebirth.
Then that noble disciple reflects:
‘I have no fear regarding livelihood.
Why would I be afraid of that?
I have these four powers:
the powers of wisdom, energy, blamelessness, and inclusiveness.
A witless person might fear for their livelihood.
A lazy person might fear for their livelihood.
A person who does blameworthy things by way of body, speech, and mind might fear for their livelihood.
A person who does not include others might fear for their livelihood.
I have no fear of disrepute …
I have no fear about feeling insecure in an assembly …
I have no fear of death …
I have no fear of a bad rebirth.
Why would I be afraid of that?
I have these four powers:
the powers of wisdom, energy, blamelessness, and inclusiveness.
A witless person might be afraid of a bad rebirth.
A lazy person might be afraid of a bad rebirth.
A person who does blameworthy things by way of body, speech, and mind might be afraid of a bad rebirth.
A person who does not include others might be afraid of a bad rebirth.’
A noble disciple who has these four powers has got past these five fears.”
Numbered Discourses
The Great Chapter
With the Householder Tapussa
At one time the Buddha was staying in the land of the Mallas, near the Mallian town named Uruvelakappa.
Then the Buddha robed up in the morning and, taking his bowl and robe, entered Uruvelakappa for alms.
Then, after the meal, on his return from alms-round, he addressed Venerable Ānanda,
“Ānanda, you stay right here, while I plunge deep into the Great Wood for the day’s meditation.”
“Yes, sir,” Ānanda replied.
Then the Buddha plunged deep into the Great Wood and sat at the root of a tree for the day’s meditation.
The householder Tapussa went up to Venerable Ānanda, bowed, sat down to one side, and said to him:
“Sir, Ānanda, we are laypeople who enjoy sensual pleasures. We like sensual pleasures, we love them and take joy in them.
But renunciation seems like an abyss.
I have heard that in this teaching and training there are very young mendicants whose minds are eager for renunciation; they’re confident, settled, and decided about it. They see it as peaceful.
Renunciation is the dividing line between the multitude and the mendicants in this teaching and training.”
“Householder, we should see the Buddha about this matter.
Come, let’s go to the Buddha and inform him about this.
As he answers, so we’ll remember it.”
“Yes, sir,” replied Tapussa.
Then Ānanda together with Tapussa went to the Buddha, bowed, and sat down to one side.
Ānanda told him what had happened.
“That’s so true, Ānanda! That’s so true!
Before my awakening—when I was still unawakened but intent on awakening—I too thought,
‘Renunciation is good! Seclusion is good!’
But my mind wasn’t eager for renunciation; it wasn’t confident, settled, and decided about it. I didn’t see it as peaceful.
Then I thought,
‘What is the cause, what is the reason why my mind isn’t eager for renunciation, and not confident, settled, and decided about it? Why don’t I see it as peaceful?’
Then I thought,
‘I haven’t seen the drawbacks of sensual pleasures, and so I haven’t cultivated that. I haven’t realized the benefits of renunciation, and so I haven’t developed that.
That’s why my mind isn’t eager for renunciation, and not confident, settled, and decided about it. And it’s why I don’t see it as peaceful.’
Then I thought,
‘Suppose that, seeing the drawbacks of sensual pleasures, I were to cultivate that. And suppose that, realizing the benefits of renunciation, I were to develop that.
It’s possible that my mind would be eager for renunciation; it would be confident, settled, and decided about it. And I would see it as peaceful.’
And so, after some time, I saw the drawbacks of sensual pleasures and cultivated that, and I realized the benefits of renunciation and developed that.
Then my mind was eager for renunciation; it was confident, settled, and decided about it. I saw it as peaceful.
And so, quite secluded from sensual pleasures, secluded from unskillful qualities, I entered and remained in the first absorption, which has the rapture and bliss born of seclusion, while placing the mind and keeping it connected.
While I was in that meditation, perceptions and attentions accompanied by sensual pleasures beset me, and that was an affliction for me.
Suppose a happy person were to experience pain; that would be an affliction for them.
In the same way, when perceptions and attentions accompanied by sensual pleasures beset me, that was an affliction for me.
Then I thought,
‘Why don’t I, as the placing of the mind and keeping it connected are stilled … enter and remain in the second absorption?’
But my mind wasn’t eager to stop placing the mind; it wasn’t confident, settled, and decided about it. I didn’t see it as peaceful.
Then I thought,
‘What is the cause, what is the reason why my mind isn’t eager to stop placing the mind, and not confident, settled, and decided about it? Why don’t I see it as peaceful?’
Then I thought,
‘I haven’t seen the drawbacks of placing the mind, and so I haven’t cultivated that. I haven’t realized the benefits of not placing the mind, and so I haven’t developed that.
That’s why my mind isn’t eager to stop placing the mind, and not confident, settled, and decided about it. And it’s why I don’t see it as peaceful.’
Then I thought,
‘Suppose that, seeing the drawbacks of placing the mind, I were to cultivate that. And suppose that, realizing the benefits of not placing the mind, I were to develop that. It’s possible that my mind would be eager to stop placing the mind; it would be confident, settled, and decided about it. And I would see it as peaceful.’
And so, after some time, I saw the drawbacks of placing the mind and cultivated that, and I realized the benefits of not placing the mind and developed that.
Then my mind was eager to stop placing the mind; it was confident, settled, and decided about it. I saw it as peaceful.
And so, as the placing of the mind and keeping it connected were stilled … I was entering and remaining in the second absorption.
While I was in that meditation, perceptions and attentions accompanied by placing the mind beset me, and that was an affliction for me.
Suppose a happy person were to experience pain; that would be an affliction for them.
In the same way, when perceptions and attentions accompanied by placing the mind and keeping it connected beset me, that was an affliction for me.
Then I thought,
‘Why don’t I, with the fading away of rapture, enter and remain in the third absorption, where I will meditate with equanimity, mindful and aware, personally experiencing the bliss of which the noble ones declare, “Equanimous and mindful, one meditates in bliss”?’
But my mind wasn’t eager for freedom from rapture; it wasn’t confident, settled, and decided about it. I didn’t see it as peaceful.
Then I thought,
‘What is the cause, what is the reason why my mind isn’t eager for freedom from rapture, and not confident, settled, and decided about it? Why don’t I see it as peaceful?’
Then I thought,
‘I haven’t seen the drawbacks of rapture, and so I haven’t cultivated that. I haven’t realized the benefits of freedom from rapture, and so I haven’t developed that.
That’s why my mind isn’t eager for freedom from rapture, and not confident, settled, and decided about it. And it’s why I don’t see it as peaceful.’
Then I thought,
‘Suppose that, seeing the drawbacks of rapture, I were to cultivate that. And suppose that, realizing the benefits of freedom from rapture, I were to develop that. It’s possible that my mind would be eager to be free from rapture; it would be confident, settled, and decided about it. And I would see it as peaceful.’
And so, after some time, I saw the drawbacks of rapture and cultivated that, and I realized the benefits of freedom from rapture and developed that.
Then my mind was eager for freedom from rapture; it was confident, settled, and decided about it. I saw it as peaceful.
And so, with the fading away of rapture … I was entering and remaining in the third absorption.
While I was in that meditation, perceptions and attentions accompanied by rapture beset me, and that was an affliction for me.
Suppose a happy person were to experience pain; that would be an affliction for them.
In the same way, when perceptions and attentions accompanied by rapture beset me, that was an affliction for me.
Then I thought,
‘Why don’t I, with the giving up of pleasure and pain, and the ending of former happiness and sadness, enter and remain in the fourth absorption, without pleasure or pain, with pure equanimity and mindfulness?’
But my mind wasn’t eager to be without pleasure and pain; it wasn’t confident, settled, and decided about it. I didn’t see it as peaceful.
Then I thought,
‘What is the cause, what is the reason why my mind isn’t eager to be without pleasure and pain, and not confident, settled, and decided about it? Why don’t I see it as peaceful?’
Then I thought,
‘I haven’t seen the drawbacks of equanimous bliss, and so I haven’t cultivated that. I haven’t realized the benefits of being without pleasure and pain, and so I haven’t developed that.
That’s why my mind isn’t eager to be without pleasure and pain, and not confident, settled, and decided about it. And it’s why I don’t see it as peaceful.’
Then I thought,
‘Suppose that, seeing the drawbacks of equanimous bliss, I were to cultivate that. And suppose that, realizing the benefits of being without pleasure and pain, I were to develop that. It’s possible that my mind would be eager to be without pleasure and pain; it would be confident, settled, and decided about it. And I would see it as peaceful.’
And so, after some time, I saw the drawbacks of equanimous bliss and cultivated that, and I realized the benefits of being without pleasure and pain and developed that.
Then my mind was eager to be without pleasure and pain; it was confident, settled, and decided about it. I saw it as peaceful.
And so, giving up pleasure and pain … I was entering and remaining in the fourth absorption.
While I was in that meditation, perceptions and attentions accompanied by equanimous bliss beset me, and that was an affliction for me.
Suppose a happy person were to experience pain; that would be an affliction for them.
In the same way, when perceptions and attentions accompanied by equanimous bliss beset me, that was an affliction for me.
Then I thought,
‘Why don’t I, going totally beyond perceptions of form, with the ending of perceptions of impingement, not focusing on perceptions of diversity, aware that “space is infinite”, enter and remain in the dimension of infinite space?’
But my mind wasn’t eager for the dimension of infinite space; it wasn’t confident, settled, and decided about it. I didn’t see it as peaceful.
Then I thought,
‘What is the cause, what is the reason why my mind isn’t eager for the dimension of infinite space, and not confident, settled, and decided about it? Why don’t I see it as peaceful?’
Then I thought,
‘I haven’t seen the drawbacks of forms, and so I haven’t cultivated that. I haven’t realized the benefits of the dimension of infinite space, and so I haven’t developed that.
That’s why my mind isn’t eager for the dimension of infinite space, and not confident, settled, and decided about it. And it’s why I don’t see it as peaceful.’
Then I thought,
‘Suppose that, seeing the drawbacks of forms, I were to cultivate that. And suppose that, realizing the benefits of the dimension of infinite space, I were to develop that. It’s possible that my mind would be eager for the dimension of infinite space; it would be confident, settled, and decided about it. And I would see it as peaceful.’
And so, after some time, I saw the drawbacks of forms and cultivated that, and I realized the benefits of the dimension of infinite space and developed that.
Then my mind was eager for the dimension of infinite space; it was confident, settled, and decided about it. I saw it as peaceful.
And so, going totally beyond perceptions of form, with the ending of perceptions of impingement, not focusing on perceptions of diversity, aware that ‘space is infinite’, I was entering and remaining in the dimension of infinite space.
While I was in that meditation, perceptions and attentions accompanied by forms beset me, and that was an affliction for me.
Suppose a happy person were to experience pain; that would be an affliction for them.
In the same way, when perceptions and attentions accompanied by forms beset me, that was an affliction for me.
Then I thought,
‘Why don’t I, going totally beyond the dimension of infinite space, aware that “consciousness is infinite”, enter and remain in the dimension of infinite consciousness?’
But my mind wasn’t eager for the dimension of infinite consciousness; it wasn’t confident, settled, and decided about it. I didn’t see it as peaceful.
Then I thought,
‘What is the cause, what is the reason why my mind isn’t eager for the dimension of infinite consciousness, and not confident, settled, and decided about it? Why don’t I see it as peaceful?’
Then I thought,
‘I haven’t seen the drawbacks of the dimension of infinite space, and so I haven’t cultivated that. I haven’t realized the benefits of the dimension of infinite consciousness, and so I haven’t developed that.
That’s why my mind isn’t eager for the dimension of infinite consciousness, and not confident, settled, and decided about it. And it’s why I don’t see it as peaceful.’
Then I thought,
‘Suppose that, seeing the drawbacks of the dimension of infinite space, I were to cultivate that. And suppose that, realizing the benefits of the dimension of infinite consciousness, I were to develop that. It’s possible that my mind would be eager for the dimension of infinite consciousness; it would be confident, settled, and decided about it. And I would see it as peaceful.’
And so, after some time, I saw the drawbacks of the dimension of infinite space and cultivated that, and I realized the benefits of the dimension of infinite consciousness and developed that.
Then my mind was eager for the dimension of infinite consciousness; it was confident, settled, and decided about it. I saw it as peaceful.
And so, going totally beyond the dimension of infinite space, aware that ‘consciousness is infinite’, I was entering and remaining in the dimension of infinite consciousness.
While I was in that meditation, perceptions and attentions accompanied by the dimension of infinite space beset me, and that was an affliction for me.
Suppose a happy person were to experience pain; that would be an affliction for them.
In the same way, when perceptions and attentions accompanied by the dimension of infinite space beset me, that was an affliction for me.
Then I thought,
‘Why don’t I, going totally beyond the dimension of infinite consciousness, aware that “there is nothing at all”, enter and remain in the dimension of nothingness?’
But my mind wasn’t eager for the dimension of nothingness; it wasn’t confident, settled, and decided about it. I didn’t see it as peaceful.
Then I thought,
‘What is the cause, what is the reason why my mind isn’t eager for the dimension of nothingness, and not confident, settled, and decided about it? Why don’t I see it as peaceful?’
Then I thought,
‘I haven’t seen the drawbacks of the dimension of infinite consciousness, and so I haven’t cultivated that. I haven’t realized the benefits of the dimension of nothingness, and so I haven’t developed that.
That’s why my mind isn’t eager for the dimension of nothingness, and not confident, settled, and decided about it. And it’s why I don’t see it as peaceful.’
Then I thought,
‘Suppose that, seeing the drawbacks of the dimension of infinite consciousness, I were to cultivate that. And suppose that, realizing the benefits of the dimension of nothingness, I were to develop that. It’s possible that my mind would be eager for the dimension of nothingness; it would be confident, settled, and decided about it. And I would see it as peaceful.’
And so, after some time, I saw the drawbacks of the dimension of infinite consciousness and cultivated that, and I realized the benefits of the dimension of nothingness and developed that.
Then my mind was eager for the dimension of nothingness; it was confident, settled, and decided about it. I saw it as peaceful.
And so, going totally beyond the dimension of infinite consciousness, aware that ‘there is nothing at all’, I was entering and remaining in the dimension of nothingness.
While I was in that meditation, perceptions and attentions accompanied by the dimension of infinite consciousness beset me, and that was an affliction for me.
Suppose a happy person were to experience pain; that would be an affliction for them.
In the same way, when perceptions and attentions accompanied by the dimension of infinite consciousness beset me, that was an affliction for me.
Then I thought,
‘Why don’t I, going totally beyond the dimension of nothingness, enter and remain in the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception?’
But my mind wasn’t eager for the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception; it wasn’t confident, settled, and decided about it. I didn’t see it as peaceful.
Then I thought,
‘What is the cause, what is the reason why my mind isn’t eager for the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception, and not confident, settled, and decided about it? Why don’t I see it as peaceful?’
Then I thought,
‘I haven’t seen the drawbacks of the dimension of nothingness, and so I haven’t cultivated that. I haven’t realized the benefits of the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception, and so I haven’t developed that.
That’s why my mind isn’t eager for the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception, and not confident, settled, and decided about it. And it’s why I don’t see it as peaceful.’
Then I thought,
‘Suppose that, seeing the drawbacks of the dimension of nothingness, I were to cultivate that. And suppose that, realizing the benefits of the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception, I were to develop that. It’s possible that my mind would be eager for the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception; it would be confident, settled, and decided about it. And I would see it as peaceful.’
And so, after some time, I saw the drawbacks of the dimension of nothingness and cultivated that, and I realized the benefits of the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception and developed that.
Then my mind was eager for the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception; it was confident, settled, and decided about it. I saw it as peaceful.
And so, going totally beyond the dimension of nothingness, I was entering and remaining in the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception.
While I was in that meditation, perceptions and attentions accompanied by the dimension of nothingness beset me, and that was an affliction for me.
Suppose a happy person were to experience pain; that would be an affliction for them.
In the same way, when perceptions and attentions accompanied by the dimension of nothingness beset me, that was an affliction for me.
Then I thought,
‘Why don’t I, going totally beyond the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception, enter and remain in the cessation of perception and feeling?’
But my mind wasn’t eager for the cessation of perception and feeling; it wasn’t confident, settled, and decided about it. I didn’t see it as peaceful.
Then I thought,
‘What is the cause, what is the reason why my mind isn’t eager for the cessation of perception and feeling, and not confident, settled, and decided about it? Why don’t I see it as peaceful?’
Then I thought,
‘I haven’t seen the drawbacks of the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception, and so I haven’t cultivated that. I haven’t realized the benefits of the cessation of perception and feeling, and so I haven’t developed that.
That’s why my mind isn’t eager for the cessation of perception and feeling, and not confident, settled, and decided about it. And it’s why I don’t see it as peaceful.’
Then I thought,
‘Suppose that, seeing the drawbacks of the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception, I were to cultivate that. And suppose that, realizing the benefits of the cessation of perception and feeling, I were to develop that. It’s possible that my mind would be eager for cessation of perception and feeling; it would be confident, settled, and decided about it. And I would see it as peaceful.’
And so, after some time, I saw the drawbacks of the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception and cultivated that, and I realized the benefits of the cessation of perception and feeling and developed that.
Then my mind was eager for the cessation of perception and feeling; it was confident, settled, and decided about it. I saw it as peaceful.
And so, going totally beyond the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception, I was entering and remaining in the cessation of perception and feeling. And, having seen with wisdom, my defilements were ended.
As long as I hadn’t entered into and withdrawn from these nine progressive meditative attainments in both forward and reverse order, I didn’t announce my supreme perfect awakening in this world with its gods, Māras, and Brahmās, this population with its ascetics and brahmins, its gods and humans.
But when I had entered into and withdrawn from these nine progressive meditative attainments in both forward and reverse order, I announced my supreme perfect awakening in this world with its gods, Māras, and Brahmās, this population with its ascetics and brahmins, its gods and humans.
Knowledge and vision arose in me:
‘My freedom is unshakable; this is my last rebirth; now there’ll be no more future lives.’”
Numbered Discourses
The Great Chapter
Brahmin Cosmologists
Then two brahmin cosmologists went up to the Buddha, and exchanged greetings with him.
When the greetings and polite conversation were over, they sat down to one side and said to the Buddha:
“Master Gotama, Pūraṇa Kassapa claims to be all-knowing and all-seeing, to know and see everything without exception, thus:
‘Knowledge and vision are constantly and continually present to me, while walking, standing, sleeping, and waking.’
‘With infinite knowledge I know and see that the world is infinite.’
And the Jain leader Nāṭaputta also claims to be all-knowing and all-seeing, to know and see everything without exception, thus:
‘Knowledge and vision are constantly and continually present to me, while walking, standing, sleeping, and waking.’
‘With infinite knowledge I know and see that the world is finite.’
These two claim to speak from knowledge, but they directly contradict each other. Which one of them speaks the truth, and which falsehood?”
“Enough, brahmins.
Leave this aside:
‘These two claim to speak from knowledge, but they directly contradict each other. Which one of them speaks the truth, and which falsehood?’
I will teach you the Dhamma.
Listen and pay close attention, I will speak.”
“Yes sir,” those brahmins replied.
The Buddha said this:
“Suppose there were four men standing in the four directions. Each of them was extremely fast, with an extremely mighty stride.
They’re as fast as a light arrow easily shot across the shadow of a palm tree by a well-trained expert archer with a strong bow.
Their stride was such that it spanned from the eastern ocean to the western ocean.
Then the man standing in the east would say:
‘I will reach the end of the world by traveling.’
Though he’d travel for his whole lifespan of a hundred years—pausing only to eat and drink, go to the toilet, and sleep to dispel weariness—he’d die along the way, never reaching the end of the world.
Then the man standing in the west …
Then the man standing in the north …
Then the man standing in the south would say:
‘I will reach the end of the world by traveling.’
Though he’d travel for his whole lifespan of a hundred years—pausing only to eat and drink, go to the toilet, and sleep to dispel weariness—he’d die along the way, never reaching the end of the world.
Why is that?
I say it’s not possible to know or see or reach the end of the world by running like this.
But I also say there’s no making an end of suffering without reaching the end of the world.
These five kinds of sensual stimulation are called the world in the training of the Noble One.
What five?
Sights known by the eye that are likable, desirable, agreeable, pleasant, sensual, and arousing.
Sounds known by the ear …
Smells known by the nose …
Tastes known by the tongue …
Touches known by the body that are likable, desirable, agreeable, pleasant, sensual, and arousing.
These five kinds of sensual stimulation are called the world in the training of the Noble One.
Take a mendicant who, quite secluded from sensual pleasures, secluded from unskillful qualities, enters and remains in the first absorption, which has the rapture and bliss born of seclusion, while placing the mind and keeping it connected.
This is called a mendicant who, having gone to the end of the world, meditates at the end of the world.
Others say of them:
‘They’re included in the world, and haven’t yet left the world.’
And I also say this:
‘They’re included in the world, and haven’t yet left the world.’
Furthermore, take a mendicant who, as the placing of the mind and keeping it connected are stilled, enters and remains in the second absorption …
third absorption …
fourth absorption.
This is called a mendicant who, having gone to the end of the world, meditates at the end of the world.
Others say of them:
‘They’re included in the world, and haven’t yet left the world.’
And I also say this:
‘They’re included in the world, and haven’t yet left the world.’
Furthermore, take a mendicant who, going totally beyond perceptions of form, with the ending of perceptions of impingement, not focusing on perceptions of diversity, aware that ‘space is infinite’, enters and remains in the dimension of infinite space.
This is called a mendicant who, having gone to the end of the world, meditates at the end of the world.
Others say of them:
‘They’re included in the world, and haven’t yet left the world.’
And I also say this:
‘They’re included in the world, and haven’t yet left the world.’
Furthermore, take a mendicant who enters and remains in the dimension of infinite consciousness. …
the dimension of nothingness …
the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception.
This is called a mendicant who, having gone to the end of the world, meditates at the end of the world.
Others say of them:
‘They’re included in the world, and haven’t yet left the world.’
And I also say this:
‘They’re included in the world, and haven’t yet left the world.’
Furthermore, take a mendicant who, going totally beyond the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception, enters and remains in the cessation of perception and feeling. And, having seen with wisdom, their defilements come to an end.
This is called a mendicant who, having gone to the end of the world, meditates at the end of the world. And they’ve crossed over clinging to the world.”
Numbered Discourses
Mindfulness Meditation
Hindrances
“Mendicants, there are these five hindrances.
What five?
Sensual desire, ill will, dullness and drowsiness, restlessness and remorse, and doubt.
These are the five hindrances.
To give up these five hindrances you should develop the four kinds of mindfulness meditation.
What four?
It’s when a mendicant meditates by observing an aspect of the body—keen, aware, and mindful, rid of desire and aversion for the world.
They meditate observing an aspect of feelings …
They meditate observing an aspect of principles—keen, aware, and mindful, rid of desire and aversion for the world.
To give up those five hindrances you should develop these four kinds of mindfulness meditation.”
Numbered Discourses
Awakening
With the Wanderer Sajjha
At one time the Buddha was staying near Rājagaha, on the Vulture’s Peak Mountain.
Then the wanderer Sajjha went up to the Buddha, and exchanged greetings with him.
When the greetings and polite conversation were over, he sat down to one side and said to the Buddha:
“Sir, one time the Buddha was staying right here in Rājagaha, the Mountainfold.
There I heard and learned this in the presence of the Buddha:
‘A mendicant who is perfected—with defilements ended, who has completed the spiritual journey, done what had to be done, laid down the burden, achieved their own true goal, utterly ended the fetters of rebirth, and is rightly freed through enlightenment—can’t transgress in five respects.
A mendicant with defilements ended can’t deliberately take the life of a living creature, take something with the intention to steal, have sex, tell a deliberate lie, or store up goods for their own enjoyment like they did as a lay person.’
I trust I properly heard, learned, attended, and remembered that from the Buddha?”
“Indeed, Sajjha, you properly heard, learned, attended, and remembered that.
In the past, as today, I say this:
‘A mendicant who is perfected—with defilements ended, who has completed the spiritual journey, done what had to be done, laid down the burden, achieved their own true goal, utterly ended the fetters of rebirth, and is rightly freed through enlightenment—can’t transgress in nine respects.
A mendicant with defilements ended can’t deliberately kill a living creature, take something with the intention to steal, have sex, tell a deliberate lie, or store up goods for their own enjoyment like they did as a lay person. And they can’t abandon the Buddha, the teaching, the Saṅgha, or the training.’
In the past, as today, I say this:
‘A mendicant who is perfected—with defilements ended, who has completed the spiritual journey, done what had to be done, laid down the burden, achieved their own true goal, utterly ended the fetters of rebirth, and is rightly freed through enlightenment—can’t transgress in these nine respects.’”
Numbered Discourses
Similarity
Freed Both Ways
“Reverend, they speak of a person called ‘freed both ways’.
What is the one freed both ways that the Buddha spoke of?”
“First, take a mendicant who, quite secluded from sensual pleasures … enters and remains in the first absorption.
They meditate directly experiencing that dimension in every way. And they understand that with wisdom.
To this extent the Buddha spoke of the one freed both ways in a qualified sense. …
Furthermore, take a mendicant who, going totally beyond the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception, enters and remains in the cessation of perception and feeling. And, having seen with wisdom, their defilements come to an end.
They meditate directly experiencing that dimension in every way. And they understand that with wisdom.
To this extent the Buddha spoke of the one freed both ways in a definitive sense.”
Numbered Discourses
Abodes of Sentient Beings
Abodes of Sentient Beings
“Mendicants, there are nine abodes of sentient beings.
What nine?
There are sentient beings that are diverse in body and diverse in perception, such as human beings, some gods, and some beings in the underworld.
This is the first abode of sentient beings.
There are sentient beings that are diverse in body and unified in perception, such as the gods reborn in Brahmā’s Host through the first absorption.
This is the second abode of sentient beings.
There are sentient beings that are unified in body and diverse in perception, such as the gods of streaming radiance.
This is the third abode of sentient beings.
There are sentient beings that are unified in body and unified in perception, such as the gods replete with glory.
This is the fourth abode of sentient beings.
There are sentient beings that are non-percipient and do not experience anything, such as the gods who are non-percipient beings.
This is the fifth abode of sentient beings.
There are sentient beings that have gone totally beyond perceptions of form. With the ending of perceptions of impingement, not focusing on perceptions of diversity, aware that ‘space is infinite’, they have been reborn in the dimension of infinite space.
This is the sixth abode of sentient beings.
There are sentient beings that have gone totally beyond the dimension of infinite space. Aware that ‘consciousness is infinite’, they have been reborn in the dimension of infinite consciousness.
This is the seventh abode of sentient beings.
There are sentient beings that have gone totally beyond the dimension of infinite consciousness. Aware that ‘there is nothing at all’, they have been reborn in the dimension of nothingness.
This is the eighth abode of sentient beings.
There are sentient beings that have gone totally beyond the dimension of nothingness. They have been reborn in the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception.
This is the ninth abode of sentient beings.
These are the nine abodes of sentient beings.”
Numbered Discourses
Awakening
With Nandaka
At one time the Buddha was staying near Sāvatthī in Jeta’s Grove, Anāthapiṇḍika’s monastery.
Now at that time Venerable Nandaka was educating, encouraging, firing up, and inspiring the mendicants in the assembly hall with a Dhamma talk.
Then in the late afternoon, the Buddha came out of retreat and went to the assembly hall. He stood outside the door waiting for the talk to end.
When he knew the talk had ended he cleared his throat and knocked with the latch.
The mendicants opened the door for the Buddha,
and he entered the assembly hall, where he sat on the seat spread out.
He said to Nandaka,
“Nandaka, that was a long exposition of the teaching you gave to the mendicants.
My back was aching while I stood outside the door waiting for the talk to end.”
When he said this, Nandaka felt embarrassed and said to the Buddha,
“Sir, we didn’t know that the Buddha was standing outside the door.
If we’d known, I wouldn’t have said so much.”
Then the Buddha, knowing that Nandaka was embarrassed, said to him,
“Good, good, Nandaka!
It’s appropriate for gentlemen like you, who have gone forth in faith from the lay life to homelessness, to sit together for a Dhamma talk.
When you’re sitting together you should do one of two things:
discuss the teachings or keep noble silence.
Nandaka, a mendicant is faithful but not ethical.
So they’re incomplete in that respect,
and should fulfill it, thinking,
‘How can I become faithful and ethical?’
When a mendicant is faithful and ethical, they’re complete in that respect.
A mendicant is faithful and ethical, but does not get internal serenity of heart.
So they’re incomplete in that respect,
and should fulfill it, thinking,
‘How can I become faithful and ethical and get internal serenity of heart?’
When a mendicant is faithful and ethical and gets internal serenity of heart, they’re complete in that respect.
A mendicant is faithful, ethical, and gets internal serenity of heart, but they don’t get the higher wisdom of discernment of principles.
So they’re incomplete in that respect.
Suppose, Nandaka, there was a four-footed animal
that was lame and disabled.
It would be incomplete in that respect.
In the same way, a mendicant is faithful, ethical, and gets internal serenity of heart, but they don’t get the higher wisdom of discernment of principles.
So they’re incomplete in that respect,
and should fulfill it, thinking,
‘How can I become faithful and ethical and get internal serenity of heart and get the higher wisdom of discernment of principles?’
When a mendicant is faithful and ethical and gets internal serenity of heart and gets the higher wisdom of discernment of principles, they’re complete in that respect.”
That is what the Buddha said.
When he had spoken, the Holy One got up from his seat and entered his dwelling.
Then soon after the Buddha left, Venerable Nandaka said to the mendicants,
“Just now, reverends, the Buddha explained a spiritual practice that’s entirely full and pure in four statements, before getting up from his seat and entering his dwelling:
‘Nandaka, a mendicant is faithful but not ethical.
So they’re incomplete in that respect,
and should fulfill it, thinking,
“How can I become faithful and ethical?”
When a mendicant is faithful and ethical, they’re complete in that respect.
A mendicant is faithful and ethical, but does not get internal serenity of heart. …
They get internal serenity of heart, but they don’t get the higher wisdom of discernment of principles.
So they’re incomplete in that respect.
Suppose, Nandaka, there was a four-footed animal that was lame and disabled.
It would be incomplete in that respect.
In the same way, a mendicant is faithful, ethical, and gets internal serenity of heart, but they don’t get the higher wisdom of discernment of principles.
So they’re incomplete in that respect,
and should fulfill it, thinking:
“How can I become faithful and ethical and get internal serenity of heart and get the higher wisdom of discernment of principles?”
When a mendicant is faithful and ethical and gets internal serenity of heart and gets the higher wisdom of discernment of principles,
they’re complete in that respect.’
Reverends, there are these five benefits of listening to the teachings at the right time and discussing the teachings at the right time.
What five?
Firstly, a mendicant teaches the mendicants the Dhamma that’s good in the beginning, good in the middle, and good in the end, meaningful and well-phrased. And they reveal a spiritual practice that’s entirely full and pure.
Whenever they do this, they become liked and approved by the Teacher, respected and admired.
This is the first benefit …
Furthermore, a mendicant teaches the mendicants the Dhamma …
Whenever they do this, they feel inspired by the meaning and the teaching in that Dhamma.
This is the second benefit …
Furthermore, a mendicant teaches the mendicants the Dhamma …
Whenever they do this, they see the meaning of a deep saying in that Dhamma with penetrating wisdom.
This is the third benefit …
Furthermore, a mendicant teaches the mendicants the Dhamma …
Whenever they do this, their spiritual companions esteem them more highly, thinking,
‘For sure this venerable has attained or will attain.’
This is the fourth benefit …
Furthermore, a mendicant teaches the mendicants the Dhamma …
Whenever they do this, there may be trainee mendicants present, who haven’t achieved their heart’s desire, but live aspiring to the supreme sanctuary. Hearing that teaching, they rouse energy for attaining the unattained, achieving the unachieved, and realizing the unrealized.
There may be perfected mendicants present, who have ended the defilements, completed the spiritual journey, done what had to be done, laid down the burden, a chieved their own goal, utterly ended the fetters of rebirth, and are rightly freed through enlightenment. Hearing that teaching, they simply wish to live happily in the present life.
This is the fifth benefit …
These are the five benefits of listening to the teachings at the right time and discussing the teachings at the right time.”
Numbered Discourses
The Lion’s Roar
With Something Left Over
At one time the Buddha was staying near Sāvatthī in Jeta’s Grove, Anāthapiṇḍika’s monastery.
Then Venerable Sāriputta robed up in the morning and, taking his bowl and robe, entered Sāvatthī for alms.
Then it occurred to him,
“It’s too early to wander for alms in Sāvatthī.
Why don’t I go to the monastery of the wanderers who follow other paths?”
Then he went to the monastery of the wanderers who follow other paths, and exchanged greetings with the wanderers there.
When the greetings and polite conversation were over, he sat down to one side.
Now at that time while those wanderers who follow other paths were sitting together this discussion came up among them:
“Reverends, no-one who dies with something left over is exempt from hell, the animal realm, or the ghost realm. They’re not exempt from places of loss, bad places, the underworld.”
Sāriputta neither approved nor dismissed that statement of the wanderers who follow other paths.
He got up from his seat, thinking,
“I will learn the meaning of this statement from the Buddha himself.”
Then Sāriputta wandered for alms in Sāvatthī.
After the meal, on his return from alms-round, he went to the Buddha, bowed, sat down to one side, and told him what had happened.
“Sāriputta, these foolish, incompetent wanderers following other paths: who are they to know whether someone has something left over or not?
There are these nine people who, dying with something left over, are exempt from hell, the animal realm, and the ghost realm. They’re exempt from places of loss, bad places, the underworld.
What nine?
There’s a person who has fulfilled ethics and immersion, but has limited wisdom.
With the ending of the five lower fetters they’re extinguished between one life and the next.
This is the first person …
Furthermore, there’s a person who has fulfilled ethics and immersion, but has limited wisdom.
With the ending of the five lower fetters they’re extinguished upon landing. This is the second person …
With the ending of the five lower fetters they’re extinguished without extra effort.
With the ending of the five lower fetters they’re extinguished with extra effort.
With the ending of the five lower fetters they head upstream, going to the Akaniṭṭha realm.
This is the fifth person …
Furthermore, there’s a person who has fulfilled ethics, but has limited immersion and wisdom.
With the ending of three fetters, and the weakening of greed, hate, and delusion, they’re a once-returner. They come back to this world once only, then make an end of suffering.
This is the sixth person …
Furthermore, there’s a person who has fulfilled ethics, but has limited immersion and wisdom.
With the ending of three fetters, they’re a one-seeder. They will be reborn just one time in a human existence, then make an end of suffering.
This is the seventh person …
Furthermore, there’s a person who has fulfilled ethics, but has limited immersion and wisdom.
With the ending of three fetters, they go from family to family. They will transmigrate between two or three families and then make an end of suffering.
This is the eighth person …
Furthermore, there’s a person who has fulfilled ethics, but has limited immersion and wisdom.
With the ending of three fetters, they have at most seven rebirths. They will transmigrate at most seven times among gods and humans and then make an end of suffering.
This is the ninth person …
These foolish, incompetent wanderers following other paths: who are they to know whether someone has something left over or not?
These are the nine people who, dying with something left over, are exempt from hell, the animal realm, and the ghost realm. They’re exempt from places of loss, bad places, the underworld.
Up until now, Sāriputta, I have not felt the need to give this exposition of the teaching to the monks, nuns, laymen, and laywomen.
Why is that?
For I didn’t want those who heard it to introduce negligence.
However, I have spoken it in order to answer your question.”
Numbered Discourses
Awakening
Awakening
So I have heard.
At one time the Buddha was staying near Sāvatthī in Jeta’s Grove, Anāthapiṇḍika’s monastery.
There the Buddha addressed the mendicants:
“Mendicants, if wanderers who follow other paths were to ask:
‘Reverends, what is the vital condition for the development of the awakening factors?’ How would you answer them?”
“Our teachings are rooted in the Buddha. … The mendicants will listen and remember it.”
“Well then, mendicants, listen and pay close attention, I will speak.”
“Yes, sir,” they replied.
The Buddha said this:
“Mendicants, if wanderers who follow other paths were to ask:
‘Reverends, what is the vital condition for the development of the awakening factors?’ You should answer them:
‘It’s when a mendicant has good friends, companions, and associates.
This is the first vital condition for the development of the awakening factors.
Furthermore, a mendicant is ethical, restrained in the monastic code, conducting themselves well and seeking alms in suitable places. Seeing danger in the slightest fault, they keep the rules they’ve undertaken.
This is the second vital condition for the development of the awakening factors.
Furthermore, a mendicant gets to take part in talk about self-effacement that helps open the heart, when they want, without trouble or difficulty. That is, talk about fewness of wishes, contentment, seclusion, aloofness, arousing energy, ethics, immersion, wisdom, freedom, and the knowledge and vision of freedom.
This is the third vital condition for the development of the awakening factors.
Furthermore, a mendicant lives with energy roused up for giving up unskillful qualities and embracing skillful qualities. They are strong, staunchly vigorous, not slacking off when it comes to developing skillful qualities.
This is the fourth vital condition for the development of the awakening factors.
Furthermore, a mendicant is wise. They have the wisdom of arising and passing away which is noble, penetrative, and leads to the complete ending of suffering.
This is the fifth vital condition for the development of the awakening factors.’
A mendicant with good friends, companions, and associates can expect to
be ethical …
A mendicant with good friends, companions, and associates can expect to
take part in talk about self-effacement that helps open the heart …
A mendicant with good friends, companions, and associates can expect to
live with energy roused up …
A mendicant with good friends, companions, and associates can expect to
But then, a mendicant grounded on these five things should develop four further things.
They should develop the perception of ugliness to give up greed, love to give up hate, mindfulness of breathing to cut off thinking, and perception of impermanence to uproot the conceit ‘I am’.
When you perceive impermanence, the perception of not-self becomes stabilized.
Perceiving not-self, you uproot the conceit ‘I am’ and attain extinguishment in this very life.”
Numbered Discourses
Mindfulness Meditation
Places of Rebirth
“Mendicants, there are five destinations.
What five?
Hell, the animal realm, the ghost realm, humanity, and the gods.
These are the five destinations.
To give up these five destinations you should develop the four kinds of mindfulness meditation. …”
Numbered Discourses
The Lion’s Roar
The Sabbath with Nine Factors
“Mendicants, the observance of the sabbath with its nine factors is very fruitful and beneficial and splendid and bountiful.
And how should it be observed?
It’s when a noble disciple reflects:
‘As long as they live, the perfected ones give up killing living creatures, renouncing the rod and the sword. They are scrupulous and kind, and live full of compassion for all living beings.
I, too, for this day and night will give up killing living creatures, renouncing the rod and the sword. I’ll be scrupulous and kind, and live full of compassion for all living beings.
I will observe the sabbath by doing as the perfected ones do in this respect.’
This is its first factor. …
‘As long as they live, the perfected ones give up high and luxurious beds. They sleep in a low place, either a small bed or a straw mat.
I, too, for this day and night will give up high and luxurious beds. I’ll sleep in a low place, either a small bed or a straw mat.
I will observe the sabbath by doing as the perfected ones do in this respect.’
This is its eighth factor.
They meditate spreading a heart full of love to one direction, and to the second, and to the third, and to the fourth.
In the same way above, below, across, everywhere, all around, they spread a heart full of love to the whole world—abundant, expansive, limitless, free of enmity and ill will.
This is its ninth factor.
The observance of the sabbath with its nine factors in this way is very fruitful and beneficial and splendid and bountiful.”
Numbered Discourses
A Safe Place
A Safe Place
“Reverend, they speak of ‘a safe place’.
In what way did the Buddha speak of a safe place?”
“First, take a mendicant who, quite secluded from sensual pleasures … enters and remains in the first absorption.
To this extent the Buddha spoke of a safe place in a qualified sense. …
Furthermore, take a mendicant who, going totally beyond the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception, enters and remains in the cessation of perception and feeling. And, having seen with wisdom, their defilements come to an end.
To this extent the Buddha spoke of a safe place in a definitive sense.”
Numbered Discourses
A Safe Place
Cessation
“Reverend, they speak of ‘cessation’. …”
Numbered Discourses
Bases of Psychic Power
Weaknesses in Training and the Bases of Psychic Power
“Mendicants, there are these five weaknesses when you’re training.
What five?
Killing living creatures, stealing, sexual misconduct, lying, and using alcoholic drinks that cause negligence.
These are the five weaknesses when you’re training.
To give up these five weaknesses in your training you should develop the four bases of psychic power.
What four?
It’s when a mendicant develops the basis of psychic power that has immersion due to enthusiasm, and active effort.
They develop the basis of psychic power that has immersion due to energy, and active effort.
They develop the basis of psychic power that has immersion due to mental development, and active effort.
They develop the basis of psychic power that has immersion due to inquiry, and active effort.
To give up these five weaknesses in your training you should develop these four bases of psychic power.”
Numbered Discourses
Bases of Psychic Power
Emotional Shackles
“Mendicants, there are these five emotional shackles.
What five?
Firstly, a mendicant isn’t free of greed for sensual pleasures. …
These are the five emotional shackles.
To give up these five emotional shackles you should develop the four bases of psychic power.
What four?
It’s when a mendicant develops the basis of psychic power that has immersion due to enthusiasm, and active effort.
They develop the basis of psychic power that has immersion due to energy, and active effort.
They develop the basis of psychic power that has immersion due to mental development, and active effort.
They develop the basis of psychic power that has immersion due to inquiry, and active effort.
To give up these five emotional shackles you should develop these four bases of psychic power.”
Numbered Discourses
Mindfulness Meditation
Weaknesses in Training and Mindfulness Meditation
“Mendicants, there are these five weaknesses when you’re training.
What five?
Killing living creatures, stealing, sexual misconduct, lying, and using alcoholic drinks that cause negligence.
These are the five weaknesses when you’re training.
To give up these five weaknesses in your training you should develop the four kinds of mindfulness meditation.
What four?
It’s when a mendicant meditates by observing an aspect of the body—keen, aware, and mindful, rid of desire and aversion for the world.
They meditate observing an aspect of feelings …
They meditate observing an aspect of principles—keen, aware, and mindful, rid of desire and aversion for the world.
To give up those five weaknesses in your training you should develop these four kinds of mindfulness meditation.”
Numbered Discourses
The Lion’s Roar
Perceptions
“Mendicants, these nine perceptions, when developed and cultivated, are very fruitful and beneficial. They culminate in the deathless and end with the deathless.
What nine?
The perceptions of ugliness, death, repulsiveness of food, dissatisfaction with the whole world, impermanence, suffering in impermanence, not-self in suffering, giving up, and fading away.
These nine perceptions, when developed and cultivated, are very fruitful and beneficial. They culminate in the deathless and end with the deathless.”
Numbered Discourses
Right Efforts
Weaknesses in Training and Effort
“Mendicants, there are these five weaknesses when you’re training.
What five?
Killing living creatures, stealing, sexual misconduct, lying, and using alcoholic drinks that cause negligence.
These are the five weaknesses when you’re training.
To give up these five weaknesses in your training you should develop the four right efforts.
What four?
It’s when a mendicant generates enthusiasm, tries, makes an effort, exerts the mind, and strives so that bad, unskillful qualities don’t arise.
They generate enthusiasm, try, make an effort, exert the mind, and strive so that bad, unskillful qualities that have arisen are given up.
They generate enthusiasm, try, make an effort, exert the mind, and strive so that skillful qualities arise.
They generate enthusiasm, try, make an effort, exert the mind, and strive so that skillful qualities that have arisen remain, are not lost, but increase, mature, and are completed by development.
To give up these five weaknesses in your training you should develop these four right efforts.”
Numbered Discourses
Abodes of Sentient Beings
Rooted in Craving
“Mendicants, I will teach you about nine things rooted in craving.
And what are the nine things rooted in craving?
Craving is a cause of seeking. Seeking is a cause of gaining material possessions. Gaining material possessions is a cause of assessing. Assessing is a cause of desire and lust. Desire and lust is a cause of attachment. Attachment is a cause of possessiveness. Possessiveness is a cause of stinginess. Stinginess is a cause of safeguarding. Owing to safeguarding, many bad, unskillful things come to be: taking up the rod and the sword, quarrels, arguments, and fights, accusations, divisive speech, and lies.
These are the nine things rooted in craving.”
Numbered Discourses
A Safe Place
Reaching a Safe Place
“Reverend, they speak of ‘reaching a safe place’. …”
Numbered Discourses
Awakening
Association
There Sāriputta addressed the mendicants:
“Reverends, you should distinguish two kinds of people:
those you should associate with, and those you shouldn’t associate with.
You should distinguish two kinds of robes:
those you should wear, and those you shouldn’t wear.
You should distinguish two kinds of almsfood:
that which you should eat, and that which you shouldn’t eat.
You should distinguish two kinds of lodging:
those you should frequent, and those you shouldn’t frequent.
You should distinguish two kinds of market town:
those you should frequent, and those you shouldn’t frequent.
You should distinguish two kinds of country:
those you should frequent, and those you shouldn’t frequent.
You should distinguish two kinds of people:
those you should associate with, and those you shouldn’t associate with.’
That’s what I said, but why did I say it?
Well, should you know of a person:
‘When I associate with this person, unskillful qualities grow, and skillful qualities decline.
And the necessities of life that a renunciate requires—robes, alms-food, lodgings, and medicines and supplies for the sick—are hard to come by.
And the goal of the ascetic life for which I went forth from the lay life to homelessness is not being fully developed.’ In this case you should leave that person at that very time of the day or night, without asking. You shouldn’t follow them.
Whereas, should you know of a person:
‘When I associate with this person, unskillful qualities grow, and skillful qualities decline.
But the necessities of life that a renunciate requires—robes, alms-food, lodgings, and medicines and supplies for the sick—are easy to come by.
However, the goal of the ascetic life for which I went forth from the lay life to homelessness is not being fully developed.’ In this case you should leave that person after reflecting, without asking. You shouldn’t follow them.
Well, should you know of a person:
‘When I associate with this person, unskillful qualities decline, and skillful qualities grow.
And the necessities of life that a renunciate requires—robes, alms-food, lodgings, and medicines and supplies for the sick—are hard to come by.
But the goal of the ascetic life for which I went forth from the lay life to homelessness is being fully developed.’ In this case you should follow that person after appraisal. You shouldn’t leave them.
Whereas, should you know of a person:
‘When I associate with this person, unskillful qualities decline, and skillful qualities grow.
And the necessities of life that a renunciate requires—robes, alms-food, lodgings, and medicines and supplies for the sick—are easy to come by.
And the goal of the ascetic life for which I went forth from the lay life to homelessness is being fully developed.’ In this case you should follow that person. You shouldn’t leave them, even if they send you away.
‘You should distinguish two kinds of people:
those you should associate with, and those you shouldn’t associate with.’
That’s what I said, and this is why I said it.
‘You should distinguish two kinds of robes:
those you should wear, and those you shouldn’t wear.’
That’s what I said, but why did I say it?
Well, should you know of a robe:
‘When I wear this robe, unskillful qualities grow, and skillful qualities decline.’ You should not wear that kind of robe.
Whereas, should you know of a robe:
‘When I wear this robe, unskillful qualities decline, and skillful qualities grow.’ You should wear that kind of robe.
‘You should distinguish two kinds of robes:
those you should wear, and those you shouldn’t wear.’
That’s what I said, and this is why I said it.
‘You should distinguish two kinds of almsfood:
that which you should eat, and that which you shouldn’t eat.’
That’s what I said, but why did I say it?
Well, should you know of almsfood:
‘When I eat this almsfood, unskillful qualities grow, and skillful qualities decline.’ You should not eat that kind of almsfood.
Whereas, should you know of almsfood:
‘When I eat this almsfood, unskillful qualities decline, and skillful qualities grow.’ You should eat that kind of almsfood.
‘You should distinguish two kinds of almsfood:
that which you should eat, and that which you shouldn’t eat.’
That’s what I said, and this is why I said it.
‘You should distinguish two kinds of lodging:
those you should frequent, and those you shouldn’t frequent.’
That’s what I said, but why did I say it?
Well, should you know of a lodging:
‘When I frequent this lodging, unskillful qualities grow, and skillful qualities decline.’ You should not frequent that kind of lodging.
Whereas, should you know of a lodging:
‘When I frequent this lodging, unskillful qualities decline, and skillful qualities grow.’ You should frequent that kind of lodging.
‘You should distinguish two kinds of lodging:
those you should frequent, and those you shouldn’t frequent.’
That’s what I said, and this is why I said it.
‘You should distinguish two kinds of market town:
those you should frequent, and those you shouldn’t frequent.’
That’s what I said, but why did I say it?
Well, should you know of a market town:
‘When I frequent this market town, unskillful qualities grow, and skillful qualities decline.’ You should not frequent that kind of village or town.
Whereas, should you know of a market town:
‘When I frequent this market town, unskillful qualities decline, and skillful qualities grow.’ You should frequent that kind of village or town.
‘You should distinguish two kinds of market town:
those you should frequent, and those you shouldn’t frequent.’
That’s what I said, and this is why I said it.
‘You should distinguish two kinds of country:
those you should frequent, and those you shouldn’t frequent.’
That’s what I said, but why did I say it?
Well, should you know of a country:
‘When I frequent this country, unskillful qualities grow, and skillful qualities decline.’ You should not frequent that kind of country.
Whereas, should you know of a country:
‘When I frequent this country, unskillful qualities decline, and skillful qualities grow.’ You should frequent that kind of country.
‘You should distinguish two kinds of country:
those you should frequent, and those you shouldn’t frequent.’
That’s what I said, and this is why I said it.”
Numbered Discourses
The Lion’s Roar
Families
“Mendicants, visiting a family with nine factors is not worthwhile, or if you’ve already arrived, sitting down is not worthwhile.
What nine?
They don’t politely rise, bow, or offer a seat. They hide what they have. Even when they have much they give little. Even when they have refined things they give coarse things. They give carelessly, not carefully. They don’t sit nearby to listen to the teachings. When you’re speaking, they don’t listen well.
Visiting a family with these nine factors is not worthwhile, or if you’ve already arrived, sitting down is not worthwhile.
Visiting a family with nine factors is worthwhile, or if you’ve already arrived, sitting down is worthwhile.
What nine?
They politely rise, bow, and offer a seat. They don’t hide what they have. When they have much they give much. When they have refined things they give refined things. They give carefully, not carelessly. They sit nearby to listen to the teachings. When you’re speaking, they listen well.
Visiting a family with these nine factors is worthwhile, or if you’ve already arrived, sitting down is worthwhile.”
Numbered Discourses
Similarity
Final Extinguishment
“Reverend, they speak of ‘final extinguishment’. …”
Numbered Discourses
Abbreviated Texts Beginning with Greed
“For the complete understanding of greed …
complete ending …
giving up …
vanishing …
fading away …
cessation …
giving away …
letting go of greed …
these nine things should be developed.”
Numbered Discourses
Awakening
Persons
“Mendicants, these nine people are found in the world.
What nine?
The perfected one and the one practicing for perfection. The non-returner and the one practicing to realize the fruit of non-return. The once-returner and the one practicing to realize the fruit of once-return. The stream-enterer and the one practicing to realize the fruit of stream-entry. And the ordinary person.
These are the nine people found in the world.”
Numbered Discourses
Mindfulness Meditation
Lower Fetters
“Mendicants, there are five lower fetters.
What five?
Identity view, doubt, misapprehension of precepts and observances, sensual desire, and ill will.
These are the five lower fetters.
To give up these five lower fetters you should develop the four kinds of mindfulness meditation. …”
Numbered Discourses
Bases of Psychic Power
Hindrances, Etc.
(This should be expanded in detail as in the chapter on mindfulness meditation.)
Numbered Discourses
The Great Chapter
Depending on Absorption
“Mendicants, I say that the first absorption is a basis for ending the defilements.
The second absorption is also a basis for ending the defilements.
The third absorption is also a basis for ending the defilements.
The fourth absorption is also a basis for ending the defilements.
The dimension of infinite space is also a basis for ending the defilements.
The dimension of infinite consciousness is also a basis for ending the defilements.
The dimension of nothingness is also a basis for ending the defilements.
The dimension of neither perception nor non-perception is also a basis for ending the defilements.
The cessation of perception and feeling is also a basis for ending the defilements.
‘The first absorption is a basis for ending the defilements.’
That’s what I said, but why did I say it?
Take a mendicant who, quite secluded from sensual pleasures, secluded from unskillful qualities, enters and remains in the first absorption.
They contemplate the phenomena there—included in form, feeling, perception, choices, and consciousness—as impermanent, as suffering, as diseased, as an abscess, as a dart, as misery, as an affliction, as alien, as falling apart, as empty, as not-self.
They turn their mind away from those things,
and apply it to the deathless:
‘This is peaceful; this is sublime—that is, the stilling of all activities, the letting go of all attachments, the ending of craving, fading away, cessation, extinguishment.’
Abiding in that they attain the ending of defilements.
If they don’t attain the ending of defilements, with the ending of the five lower fetters they’re reborn spontaneously, because of their passion and love for that meditation. They are extinguished there, and are not liable to return from that world.
It’s like an archer or their apprentice who first practices on a straw man or a clay model. At a later time they become a long-distance shooter, a marksman, who shatters large objects.
In the same way a noble disciple, quite secluded from sensual pleasures, enters and remains in the first absorption.
They contemplate the phenomena there—included in form, feeling, perception, choices, and consciousness—as impermanent, as suffering, as diseased, as an abscess, as a dart, as misery, as an affliction, as alien, as falling apart, as empty, as not-self.
They turn their mind away from those things,
and apply it to the deathless:
‘This is peaceful; this is sublime—that is, the stilling of all activities, the letting go of all attachments, the ending of craving, fading away, cessation, extinguishment.’
Abiding in that they attain the ending of defilements.
If they don’t attain the ending of defilements, with the ending of the five lower fetters they’re reborn spontaneously, because of their passion and love for that meditation. They are extinguished there, and are not liable to return from that world.
‘The first absorption is a basis for ending the defilements.’
That’s what I said, and this is why I said it.
‘The second absorption is also a basis for ending the defilements.’ …
‘The third absorption is also a basis for ending the defilements.’ …
‘The fourth absorption is also a basis for ending the defilements.’ …
‘The dimension of infinite space is also a basis for ending the defilements.’
That’s what I said, but why did I say it?
Take a mendicant who, going totally beyond perceptions of form, with the ending of perceptions of impingement, not focusing on perceptions of diversity, aware that ‘space is infinite’, enters and remains in the dimension of infinite space.
They contemplate the phenomena there—included in feeling, perception, choices, and consciousness—as impermanent, as suffering, as diseased, as an abscess, as a dart, as misery, as an affliction, as alien, as falling apart, as empty, as not-self.
They turn their mind away from those things,
and apply it to the deathless:
‘This is peaceful; this is sublime—that is, the stilling of all activities, the letting go of all attachments, the ending of craving, fading away, cessation, extinguishment.’
Abiding in that they attain the ending of defilements.
If they don’t attain the ending of defilements, with the ending of the five lower fetters they’re reborn spontaneously, because of their passion and love for that meditation. They are extinguished there, and are not liable to return from that world.
It’s like an archer or their apprentice who first practices on a straw man or a clay model. At a later time they become a long-distance shooter, a marksman, who shatters large objects.
In the same way, take a mendicant who enters and remains in the dimension of infinite space. …
‘The dimension of infinite space is a basis for ending the defilements.’
That’s what I said, and this is why I said it.
‘The dimension of infinite consciousness is a basis for ending the defilements.’ …
‘The dimension of nothingness is a basis for ending the defilements.’
That’s what I said, but why did I say it?
Take a mendicant who, going totally beyond the dimension of infinite consciousness, aware that ‘there is nothing at all’, enters and remains in the dimension of nothingness.
They contemplate the phenomena there—included in feeling, perception, choices, and consciousness—as impermanent, as suffering, as diseased, as an abscess, as a dart, as misery, as an affliction, as alien, as falling apart, as empty, as not-self.
They turn their mind away from those things,
and apply it to the deathless:
‘This is peaceful; this is sublime—that is, the stilling of all activities, the letting go of all attachments, the ending of craving, fading away, cessation, extinguishment.’
Abiding in that they attain the ending of defilements.
If they don’t attain the ending of defilements, with the ending of the five lower fetters they’re reborn spontaneously, because of their passion and love for that meditation. They are extinguished there, and are not liable to return from that world.
It’s like an archer or their apprentice who first practices on a straw man or a clay model. At a later time they become a long-distance shooter, a marksman, who shatters large objects.
In the same way, take a mendicant who, going totally beyond the dimension of infinite consciousness, aware that ‘there is nothing at all’, enters and remains in the dimension of nothingness.
They contemplate the phenomena there—included in feeling, perception, choices, and consciousness—as impermanent, as suffering, as diseased, as an abscess, as a dart, as misery, as an affliction, as alien, as falling apart, as empty, as not-self.
They turn their mind away from those things,
and apply it to the deathless:
‘This is peaceful; this is sublime—that is, the stilling of all activities, the letting go of all attachments, the ending of craving, fading away, cessation, extinguishment.’
Abiding in that they attain the ending of defilements.
If they don’t attain the ending of defilements, with the ending of the five lower fetters they’re reborn spontaneously, because of their passion and love for that meditation. They are extinguished there, and are not liable to return from that world.
‘The dimension of nothingness is a basis for ending the defilements.’
That’s what I said, and this is why I said it.
And so, mendicants, penetration to enlightenment extends as far as attainments with perception.
But the two dimensions that depend on these—
the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception, and the cessation of perception and feeling—are properly explained by mendicants who are skilled in these attainments and skilled in emerging from them, after they’ve entered them and emerged from them.”
Numbered Discourses
The Lion’s Roar
With Samiddhi
Then Venerable Samiddhi went up to Venerable Sāriputta, bowed, and sat to one side.
Venerable Sāriputta said to him:
“Samiddhi, based on what do thoughts arise in a person?”
“Based on name and form, sir.”
“Where do they become diversified?”
“In the elements.”
“What is their origin?”
“Contact is their origin.”
“What is their meeting place?”
“Feeling is their meeting place.”
“What is their chief?”
“Immersion is their chief.”
“What is their ruler?”
“Mindfulness is their ruler.”
“What is their overseer?”
“Wisdom is their overseer.”
“What is their core?”
“Freedom is their core.”
“What is their culmination?”
“They culminate in the deathless.”
“Samiddhi, when you were asked what is the basis on which thoughts arise in a person, you answered ‘name and form’.
When you were asked …
what is their culmination, you answered ‘the deathless’.
Good, good, Samiddhi!
It’s good that you answered each question. But don’t get conceited because of that.”
Numbered Discourses
Mindfulness Meditation
Higher Fetters
“Mendicants, there are five higher fetters.
What five?
Desire for rebirth in the realm of luminous form, desire for rebirth in the formless realm, conceit, restlessness, and ignorance.
These are the five higher fetters.
To give up these five higher fetters you should develop the four kinds of mindfulness meditation. …”
Numbered Discourses
Similarity
Extinguishment in the Present Life
“Reverend, they speak of ‘extinguishment in the present life’.
In what way did the Buddha speak of extinguishment in the present life?”
“First, take a mendicant who, quite secluded from sensual pleasures … enters and remains in the first absorption.
To this extent the Buddha spoke of extinguishment in the present life in a qualified sense. …
Furthermore, take a mendicant who, going totally beyond the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception, enters and remains in the cessation of perception and feeling. And, having seen with wisdom, their defilements come to an end.
To this extent the Buddha spoke of extinguishment in the present life in a definitive sense.”
Numbered Discourses
Mindfulness Meditation
Kinds of Sensual Stimulation
“Mendicants, there are these five kinds of sensual stimulation.
What five?
Sights known by the eye that are likable, desirable, agreeable, pleasant, sensual, and arousing.
Sounds known by the ear …
Smells known by the nose …
Tastes known by the tongue …
Touches known by the body that are likable, desirable, agreeable, pleasant, sensual, and arousing.
These are the five kinds of sensual stimulation.
To give up these five kinds of sensual stimulation you should develop the four kinds of mindfulness meditation. …”
Numbered Discourses
The Great Chapter
The War Between the Gods and the Demons
“Once upon a time, mendicants, a battle was fought between the gods and the demons.
In that battle the demons won and the gods lost.
Defeated, the gods fled north with the demons in pursuit.
Then the gods thought,
‘The demons are still in pursuit.
Why don’t we engage them in battle a second time?’
And so a second battle was fought between the gods and the demons.
And for a second time the demons won and the gods lost.
Defeated, the gods fled north with the demons in pursuit.
Then the gods thought,
‘The demons are still in pursuit.
Why don’t we engage them in battle a third time?’
And so a third battle was fought between the gods and the demons.
And for a third time the demons won and the gods lost.
Defeated and terrified, the gods fled right into the castle of the gods.
When they had entered their castle, they thought,
‘Now we’re in a secure location and the demons can’t do anything to us.’
The demons also thought,
‘Now the gods are in a secure location and we can’t do anything to them.’
Once upon a time, a battle was fought between the gods and the demons.
In that battle the gods won and the demons lost.
Defeated, the demons fled south with the gods in pursuit.
Then the demons thought,
‘The gods are still in pursuit.
Why don’t we engage them in battle a second time?’
And so a second battle was fought between the gods and the demons.
And for a second time the gods won and the demons lost.
Defeated, the demons fled south with the gods in pursuit.
Then the demons thought,
‘The gods are still in pursuit.
Why don’t we engage them in battle a third time?’
And so a third battle was fought between the gods and the demons.
And for a third time the gods won and the demons lost.
Defeated and terrified, the demons fled right into the citadel of the demons.
When they had entered their citadel, they thought,
‘Now we’re in a secure location and the gods can’t do anything to us.’
And the gods also thought,
‘Now the demons are in a secure location and we can’t do anything to them.’
In the same way, a mendicant, quite secluded from sensual pleasures, secluded from unskillful qualities, enters and remains in the first absorption, which has the rapture and bliss born of seclusion, while placing the mind and keeping it connected.
At such a time the mendicant thinks,
‘Now I’m in a secure location and Māra can’t do anything to me.’
And Māra the Wicked also thinks,
‘Now the mendicant is in a secure location and we can’t do anything to them.’
When, as the placing of the mind and keeping it connected are stilled, a mendicant enters and remains in the second absorption …
third absorption …
fourth absorption.
At such a time the mendicant thinks,
‘Now I’m in a secure location and Māra can’t do anything to me.’
And Māra the Wicked also thinks,
‘Now the mendicant is in a secure location and we can’t do anything to them.’
A mendicant, going totally beyond perceptions of form, with the ending of perceptions of impingement, not focusing on perceptions of diversity, aware that ‘space is infinite’, enters and remains in the dimension of infinite space.
At such a time they are called a mendicant who has blinded Māra, put out his eyes without a trace, and gone where the Wicked One cannot see.
A mendicant, going totally beyond the dimension of infinite space, aware that ‘consciousness is infinite’, enters and remains in the dimension of infinite consciousness. …
Going totally beyond the dimension of infinite consciousness, aware that ‘there is nothing at all’, they enter and remain in the dimension of nothingness. …
Going totally beyond the dimension of nothingness, they enter and remain in the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception. …
Going totally beyond the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception, they enter and remain in the cessation of perception and feeling. And, having seen with wisdom, their defilements come to an end.
At such a time they are called a mendicant who has blinded Māra, put out his eyes without a trace, and gone where the Wicked One cannot see. And they’ve crossed over clinging to the world.”
Numbered Discourses
Abodes of Sentient Beings
Progressive Cessations
“Mendicants, there are these nine progressive cessations.
What nine?
For someone who has attained the first absorption, sensual perceptions have ceased.
For someone who has attained the second absorption, the placing of the mind and keeping it connected have ceased.
For someone who has attained the third absorption, rapture has ceased.
For someone who has attained the fourth absorption, breathing has ceased.
For someone who has attained the dimension of infinite space, the perception of form has ceased.
For someone who has attained the dimension of infinite consciousness, the perception of the dimension of infinite space has ceased.
For someone who has attained the dimension of nothingness, the perception of the dimension of infinite consciousness has ceased.
For someone who has attained the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception, the perception of the dimension of nothingness has ceased.
For someone who has attained the cessation of perception and feeling, perception and feeling have ceased.
These are the nine progressive cessations.”
Numbered Discourses
Mindfulness Meditation
Stinginess
“Mendicants, there are these five kinds of stinginess.
What five?
Stinginess with dwellings, families, material possessions, praise, and the teaching.
These are the five kinds of stinginess.
To give up these five kinds of stinginess you should develop the four kinds of mindfulness meditation. …”
Numbered Discourses
A Safe Place
Tranquility
“Reverend, they speak of ‘tranquility’. …”
Numbered Discourses
Abbreviated Texts Beginning with Greed
“For insight into hate …
hostility …
contempt …
stinginess …
deviousness …
obstinacy …
aggression …
arrogance …
for insight into negligence …
complete understanding …
complete ending …
giving up …
fading away …
letting go of negligence …
these nine things should be developed.”
The Book of the Nines is finished.
Numbered Discourses
Right Efforts
Emotional Shackles
“Mendicants, there are these five emotional shackles.
What five?
Firstly, a mendicant isn’t free of greed, desire, fondness, thirst, passion, and craving for sensual pleasures. …
These are the five emotional shackles.
To give up these five emotional shackles you should develop the four right efforts.
What four?
It’s when a mendicant generates enthusiasm, tries, makes an effort, exerts the mind, and strives so that bad, unskillful qualities don’t arise. …
so that unskillful qualities are given up …
so that skillful qualities arise …
They generate enthusiasm, try, make an effort, exert the mind, and strive so that skillful qualities that have arisen remain, are not lost, but increase, mature, and are completed by development.
To give up these five emotional shackles you should develop these four right efforts.”
Numbered Discourses
Abodes of Sentient Beings
The Simile of the Stone Pillar
At one time the Buddha was staying near Rājagaha, in the Bamboo Grove, the squirrels’ feeding ground.
There Venerable Candikāputta addressed the mendicants,
“Reverends, Devadatta teaches the mendicants like this:
‘When a mendicant’s mind is solidified by heart, it’s appropriate for them to say:
“I understand: ‘Rebirth is ended, the spiritual journey has been completed, what had to be done has been done, there is no return to any state of existence.’”’”
When he said this, Venerable Sāriputta said to him,
“Reverend Candikāputta, Devadatta does not teach the mendicants like that.
He teaches like this:
‘When a mendicant’s mind is well consolidated by heart, it’s appropriate for them to say:
“I understand: ‘Rebirth is ended, the spiritual journey has been completed, what had to be done has been done, there is no return to any state of existence.’”’”
For a second time …
And for a third time Venerable Candikāputta addressed the mendicants …
And for a third time, Sāriputta said to him,
“Reverend Candikāputta, Devadatta does not teach the mendicants like that.
He teaches like this:
‘When a mendicant’s mind is well consolidated by heart, it’s appropriate for them to say:
“I understand: ‘Rebirth is ended, the spiritual journey has been completed, what had to be done has been done, there is no return to any state of existence.’”’
And how is a mendicant’s mind well consolidated by heart?
The mind is well consolidated by heart when they know: ‘My mind is without greed.’
… ‘My mind is without hate.’
… ‘My mind is without delusion.’
… ‘My mind is not liable to become greedy.’
… ‘My mind is not liable to become hateful.’
… ‘My mind is not liable to become deluded.’
… ‘My mind is not liable to return to rebirth in the sensual realm.’
… ‘My mind is not liable to return to rebirth in the realm of luminous form.’
… ‘My mind is not liable to return to rebirth in the formless realm.’
When a mendicant’s mind is rightly freed like this, even if compelling sights come into the range of vision they don’t occupy their mind.
The mind remains unaffected. It is steady, imperturbable, observing disappearance.
Suppose there was a stone pillar, sixteen feet long.
Eight feet were buried underground, and eight above ground.
And violent storms were to blow up out of the east, the west, the north, and the south.
They couldn’t make it tremor and tremble and quake.
Why is that?
It’s because that boundary pillar is firmly embedded, with deep foundations.
In the same way, when a mendicant’s mind is rightly freed like this, even if compelling sights come into the range of vision they don’t occupy their mind.
The mind remains unaffected. It is steady, imperturbable, observing disappearance.
If even compelling sounds …
and thoughts come into the range of the mind they don’t occupy the mind.
The mind remains unaffected. It is steady, imperturbable, observing disappearance.”
Numbered Discourses
A Safe Place
Reaching the Deathless
“Reverend, they speak of ‘reaching the deathless’. …”
Numbered Discourses
The Great Chapter
By Ānanda
At one time Venerable Ānanda was staying near Kosambi, in Ghosita’s Monastery.
There Ānanda addressed the mendicants:
“Reverends, mendicants!”
“Reverend,” they replied.
Ānanda said this:
“It’s incredible, reverends, it’s amazing!
How this Blessed One who knows and sees, the perfected one, the fully awakened Buddha, has found an opening in a confined space. It’s in order to purify sentient beings, to get past sorrow and crying, to make an end of pain and sadness, to end the cycle of suffering, and to realize extinguishment.
The eye itself is actually present, and so are those sights. Yet one will not experience that sense-field.
The ear itself is actually present, and so are those sounds. Yet one will not experience that sense-field.
The nose itself is actually present, and so are those smells. Yet one will not experience that sense-field.
The tongue itself is actually present, and so are those tastes. Yet one will not experience that sense-field.
The body itself is actually present, and so are those touches. Yet one will not experience that sense-field.”
When he said this, Venerable Udāyī said to Venerable Ānanda:
“Reverend Ānanda, is one who doesn’t experience that sense-field actually percipient or not?”
“Reverend, one who doesn’t experience that sense-field is actually percipient, not non-percipient.”
“But what does one who doesn’t experience that sense-field perceive?”
“It’s when a mendicant, going totally beyond perceptions of form, with the ending of perceptions of impingement, not focusing on perceptions of diversity, aware that ‘space is infinite’, enters and remains in the dimension of infinite space.
One who doesn’t experience that sense-field perceives in this way.
Furthermore, a mendicant, going totally beyond the dimension of infinite space, aware that ‘consciousness is infinite’, enters and remains in the dimension of infinite consciousness.
One who doesn’t experience that sense-field perceives in this way.
Furthermore, a mendicant, going totally beyond the dimension of infinite consciousness, aware that ‘there is nothing at all’, enters and remains in the dimension of nothingness.
One who doesn’t experience that sense-field perceives in this way.
Reverend, one time I was staying near Sāketa in the deer park in Añjana Wood.
Then the nun Jaṭilagāhikā came up to me, bowed, stood to one side, and said to me:
‘Sir, Ānanda, regarding the immersion that does not lean forward or pull back, and is not held in place by forceful suppression.
Being free, it’s stable. Being stable, it’s content. Being content, one is not anxious.
What did the Buddha say was the fruit of this immersion?’
When she said this, I said to her:
‘Sister, regarding the immersion that does not lean forward or pull back, and is not held in place by forceful suppression.
Being free, it’s stable. Being stable, it’s content. Being content, one is not anxious.
The Buddha said that the fruit of this immersion is enlightenment.’
One who doesn’t experience that sense-field perceives in this way, too.”
Numbered Discourses
Abodes of Sentient Beings
A Wild Colt
“Mendicants, I will teach you about three wild colts and three wild people; three excellent horses and three excellent people; and three fine thoroughbred horses and three fine thoroughbred people.
Listen and pay close attention, I will speak.
And what are the three wild colts?
One wild colt is fast, but not beautiful or well proportioned.
Another wild colt is fast and beautiful, but not well proportioned.
While another wild colt is fast, beautiful, and well proportioned.
These are the three wild colts.
And what are the three wild people?
One wild person is fast, but not beautiful or well proportioned.
Another wild person is fast and beautiful, but not well proportioned.
While another wild person is fast, beautiful, and well proportioned.
And how is a wild person fast, but not beautiful or well proportioned?
It’s when a mendicant truly understands: ‘This is suffering’ … ‘This is the origin of suffering’ … ‘This is the cessation of suffering’ … ‘This is the practice that leads to the cessation of suffering’.
This is how they’re fast, I say.
But when asked a question about the teaching or training, they falter without answering.
This is how they’re not beautiful, I say.
And they don’t receive robes, alms-food, lodgings, and medicines and supplies for the sick.
This is how they’re not well proportioned, I say.
This is how a wild person is fast, but not beautiful or well proportioned.
And how is a wild person fast and beautiful, but not well proportioned?
They truly understand: ‘This is suffering’ … ‘This is the origin of suffering’ … ‘This is the cessation of suffering’ … ‘This is the practice that leads to the cessation of suffering’.
This is how they’re fast, I say.
When asked a question about the teaching or training, they answer without faltering.
This is how they’re beautiful, I say.
But they don’t receive robes, alms-food, lodgings, and medicines and supplies for the sick.
This is how they’re not well proportioned, I say.
This is how a wild person is fast and beautiful, but not well proportioned.
And how is a wild person fast, beautiful, and well proportioned?
They truly understand: ‘This is suffering’ … ‘This is the origin of suffering’ … ‘This is the cessation of suffering’ … ‘This is the practice that leads to the cessation of suffering’.
This is how they’re fast, I say.
When asked a question about the teaching or training, they answer without faltering.
This is how they’re beautiful, I say.
They receive robes, alms-food, lodgings, and medicines and supplies for the sick.
This is how they’re well proportioned, I say.
This is how a wild person is fast, beautiful, and well proportioned.
These are the three wild people.
And what are the three excellent horses?
One excellent horse …
is fast, beautiful, and well proportioned.
These are the three excellent horses.
What are the three excellent people?
One excellent person …
is fast, beautiful, and well proportioned.
And how is an excellent person …
fast, beautiful, and well proportioned?
It’s when a mendicant, with the ending of the five lower fetters, is reborn spontaneously. They’re extinguished there, and are not liable to return from that world.
This is how they’re fast, I say.
When asked a question about the teaching or training, they answer without faltering.
This is how they’re beautiful, I say.
They receive robes, alms-food, lodgings, and medicines and supplies for the sick.
This is how they’re well proportioned, I say.
This is how an excellent person fast, beautiful, and well proportioned.
These are the three excellent people.
And what are the three fine thoroughbred horses?
One fine thoroughbred horse …
is fast, beautiful, and well proportioned.
These are the three fine thoroughbred horses.
And what are the three fine thoroughbred people?
One fine thoroughbred person …
is fast, beautiful, and well proportioned.
And how is a fine thoroughbred person …
fast, beautiful, and well proportioned?
It’s a mendicant who realizes the undefiled freedom of heart and freedom by wisdom in this very life. And they live having realized it with their own insight due to the ending of defilements.
This is how they’re fast, I say.
When asked a question about the teaching or training, they answer without faltering.
This is how they’re beautiful, I say.
They receive robes, alms-food, lodgings, and medicines and supplies for the sick.
This is how they’re well proportioned, I say.
This is how a fine thoroughbred person is fast, beautiful, and well proportioned.
These are the three fine thoroughbred people.”
Numbered Discourses
Similarity
Extinguishment in a Certain Respect
“Reverend, they speak of ‘extinguishment in a certain respect’. …”
Numbered Discourses
The Great Chapter
The Simile of the Bull Elephant in the Forest
“Mendicants, when a wild bull elephant is engrossed in the pasture, but other elephants—males, females, younglings, or cubs—got there first and trampled the grass, the wild bull elephant is horrified, repelled, and disgusted by that.
When the wild bull elephant is engrossed in the pasture, but other elephants—males, females, younglings, or cubs—eat the broken branches that he has dragged down, the wild bull elephant is horrified, repelled, and disgusted by that.
When a wild bull elephant has plunged into the pool, but other elephants—males, females, younglings, or cubs—got there first and stirred up the water with their trunks, the wild bull elephant is horrified, repelled, and disgusted by that.
When a wild bull elephant has come out of the pool and the female elephants bump into him, the wild bull elephant is horrified, repelled, and disgusted by that.
At that time the wild bull elephant thinks:
‘These days I live crowded by other males, females, younglings, and cubs.
I eat the grass they’ve trampled, and they eat the broken branches I’ve dragged down. I drink muddy water, and after my bath the female elephants bump into me.
Why don’t I live alone, withdrawn from the herd?’
After some time he lives alone, withdrawn from the herd, and he eats untrampled grass, and other elephants don’t eat the broken branches he has dragged down. He doesn’t drink muddy water, and the female elephants don’t bump into him after his bath.
At that time the wild bull elephant thinks:
‘Formerly I lived crowded by other males, females, younglings, and cubs.
I ate the grass they’d trampled, and they ate the broken branches I’d dragged down.
I drank muddy water, and after my bath the female elephants bumped into me. Now I live alone, and I’m free of all these things.’ He breaks off a branch and scratches his body, happily relieving his itches.
In the same way, when a mendicant lives crowded by monks, nuns, laymen, and laywomen; by rulers and their ministers, and by teachers of other paths and their disciples, they think:
‘These days I live crowded by monks, nuns, laymen, and laywomen; by rulers and their ministers, and teachers of other paths and their disciples.
Why don’t I live alone, withdrawn from the group?’
They frequent a secluded lodging—a wilderness, the root of a tree, a hill, a ravine, a mountain cave, a charnel ground, a forest, the open air, a heap of straw.
Gone to a wilderness, or to the root of a tree, or to an empty hut, they sit down cross-legged, with their body straight, and establish mindfulness right there.
Giving up desire for the world, they meditate with a heart rid of desire, cleansing the mind of desire.
Giving up ill will and malevolence, they meditate with a mind rid of ill will, full of compassion for all living beings, cleansing the mind of ill will.
Giving up dullness and drowsiness, they meditate with a mind free of dullness and drowsiness, perceiving light, mindful and aware, cleansing the mind of dullness and drowsiness.
Giving up restlessness and remorse, they meditate without restlessness, their mind peaceful inside, cleansing the mind of restlessness and remorse.
Giving up doubt, they meditate having gone beyond doubt, not undecided about skillful qualities, cleansing the mind of doubt.
They give up these five hindrances, corruptions of the heart that weaken wisdom.
Then, quite secluded from sensual pleasures, secluded from unskillful qualities, they enter and remain in the first absorption, which has the rapture and bliss born of seclusion, while placing the mind and keeping it connected.
They happily relieve their itches.
As the placing of the mind and keeping it connected are stilled, they enter and remain in the second absorption …
third absorption …
fourth absorption.
They happily relieve their itches.
Going totally beyond perceptions of form, with the ending of perceptions of impingement, not focusing on perceptions of diversity, aware that ‘space is infinite’, they enter and remain in the dimension of infinite space.
They happily relieve their itches.
Going totally beyond the dimension of infinite space, aware that ‘consciousness is infinite’, they enter and remain in the dimension of infinite consciousness. …
Going totally beyond the dimension of infinite consciousness, aware that ‘there is nothing at all’, they enter and remain in the dimension of nothingness. …
Going totally beyond the dimension of nothingness, they enter and remain in the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception. …
Furthermore, take a mendicant who, going totally beyond the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception, enters and remains in the cessation of perception and feeling. And, having seen with wisdom, their defilements come to an end.
They happily relieve their itches.”
Numbered Discourses
Abodes of Sentient Beings
In Three Particulars
“The humans of Uttarakuru surpass the Gods of the Thirty-Three and the humans of India in three particulars.
What three?
They’re selfless and not possessive. They have a fixed life span. They have a distinctive nature.
The humans of Uttarakuru surpass the Gods of the Thirty-Three and the humans of India in these three particulars.
The Gods of the Thirty-Three surpass the humans of Uttarakuru and India in three particulars.
What three?
Divine life span, beauty, and happiness.
The Gods of the Thirty-Three surpass the humans of Uttarakuru and India in these three particulars.
The humans of India surpass the humans of Uttarakuru and the Gods of the Thirty-Three in three particulars.
What three?
Bravery, mindfulness, and the spiritual life is lived here.
The humans of India surpass the humans of Uttarakuru and the Gods of the Thirty-Three in these three particulars.”
Numbered Discourses
The Lion’s Roar
About Velāma
At one time the Buddha was staying near Sāvatthī in Jeta’s Grove, Anāthapiṇḍika’s monastery.
Then the householder Anāthapiṇḍika went up to the Buddha, bowed, and sat down to one side.
The Buddha said to him,
“Householder, I wonder whether your family gives gifts?”
“It does, sir.
But only coarse gruel with pickles.”
“Householder, someone might give a gift that’s either coarse or fine.
But they give it carelessly, thoughtlessly, not with their own hand. They give the dregs, and they give without consideration for consequences.
Then wherever the result of any such gift manifests, their mind doesn’t incline toward enjoyment of nice food, clothes, vehicles, or the five refined kinds of sensual stimulation.
And their children, wives, bondservants, employees, and workers don’t want to listen to them. They don’t pay attention or try to understand.
Why is that?
Because that is the result of deeds done carelessly.
Someone might give a gift that’s either coarse or fine.
And they give it carefully, thoughtfully, with their own hand. They don’t give the dregs, and they give with consideration for consequences.
Then wherever the result of any such gift manifests, their mind inclines toward enjoyment of nice food, clothes, vehicles, or the five refined kinds of sensual stimulation.
And their children, wives, bondservants, employees, and workers want to listen. They pay attention and try to understand.
Why is that?
Because that is the result of deeds done carefully.
Once upon a time, householder, there was a brahmin named Velāma.
He gave the following gift, a great offering.
84,000 gold bowls filled with silver. 84,000 silver bowls filled with gold. 84,000 bronze bowls filled with gold coins. 84,000 elephants with gold adornments and banners, covered with gold netting. 84,000 chariots upholstered with the hide of lions, tigers, and leopards, and cream rugs, with gold adornments and banners, covered with gold netting. 84,000 milk cows with silken reins and bronze pails. 84,000 maidens bedecked with jeweled earrings. 84,000 couches spread with woolen covers—shag-piled, pure white, or embroidered with flowers—and spread with a fine deer hide, with canopies above and red pillows at both ends. 8,400,000,000 fine cloths of linen, cotton, silk, and wool. And who can say how much food, drink, snacks, meals, refreshments, and beverages? It seemed like an overflowing river.
Householder, you might think:
‘Surely the brahmin Velāma must have been someone else at that time?’
But you should not see it like this.
I myself was the brahmin Velāma at that time.
I gave that gift, a great offering.
But at that event there was no-one worthy of a religious donation, and no-one to purify the religious donation.
It would be more fruitful to feed one person accomplished in view than that great offering of Velāma.
It would be more fruitful to feed one once-returner than a hundred persons accomplished in view.
It would be more fruitful to feed one non-returner than a hundred once-returners.
It would be more fruitful to feed one perfected one than a hundred non-returners.
It would be more fruitful to feed one Buddha awakened for themselves than a hundred perfected ones.
It would be more fruitful to feed one Realized One, a perfected one, a fully awakened Buddha than a hundred Buddhas awakened for themselves.
It would be more fruitful to feed the mendicant Saṅgha headed by the Buddha than to feed one Realized One, a perfected one, a fully awakened Buddha.
It would be more fruitful to build a dwelling especially for the Saṅgha of the four quarters than to feed the mendicant Saṅgha headed by the Buddha.
It would be more fruitful to go for refuge to the Buddha, the teaching, and the Saṅgha with a confident heart than to build a dwelling for the Saṅgha of the four quarters.
It would be more fruitful to undertake the training rules—not to kill living creatures, steal, commit sexual misconduct, lie, or take alcoholic drinks that cause negligence—than to go for refuge to the Buddha, the teaching, and the Saṅgha with a confident heart.
It would be more fruitful to develop a heart of love—even just as long as it takes to pull a cow’s udder—than to undertake the training rules.
It would be more fruitful develop the perception of impermanence—even for as long as a finger-snap—than to do all of these things, including developing a heart of love for as long as it takes to pull a cow’s udder.”
Numbered Discourses
Abodes of Sentient Beings
Second: Dangers and Threats
“Mendicants, when a noble disciple has quelled five dangers and threats, and has the four factors of stream-entry, they may, if they wish, declare of themselves:
‘I’ve finished with rebirth in hell, the animal realm, and the ghost realm. I’ve finished with all places of loss, bad places, the underworld. I am a stream-enterer! I’m not liable to be reborn in the underworld, and am bound for awakening.’
What are the five dangers and threats they have quelled?
Anyone who kills living creatures creates dangers and threats both in the present life and in lives to come, and experiences mental pain and sadness. Anyone who refrains from killing living creatures creates no dangers and threats either in the present life or in lives to come, and doesn’t experience mental pain and sadness.
So that danger and threat is quelled for anyone who refrains from killing living creatures.
Anyone who steals … commits sexual misconduct … lies …
Anyone who uses alcoholic drinks that cause negligence creates dangers and threats both in the present life and in lives to come, and experiences mental pain and sadness. Anyone who refrains from using alcoholic drinks that cause negligence creates no dangers and threats either in the present life or in lives to come, and doesn’t experience mental pain and sadness.
So that danger and threat is quelled for anyone who refrains from using alcoholic drinks that cause negligence.
These are the five dangers and threats they have quelled.
What are the four factors of stream-entry that they have?
When a noble disciple has experiential confidence in the Buddha …
the teaching …
And a noble disciple’s ethical conduct is loved by the noble ones, unbroken, impeccable, spotless, and unmarred, liberating, praised by sensible people, not mistaken, and leading to immersion.
These are the four factors of stream-entry that they have.
When a noble disciple has quelled these five dangers and threats, and has these four factors of stream-entry, they may, if they wish, declare of themselves:
‘I’ve finished with rebirth in hell, the animal realm, and the ghost realm. I’ve finished with all places of loss, bad places, the underworld. I am a stream-enterer! I’m not liable to be reborn in the underworld, and am bound for awakening.’”
Numbered Discourses
Similarity
A Personal Witness
“Reverend, they speak of a person called ‘personal witness’.
What is the personal witness that the Buddha spoke of?”
“First, take a mendicant who, quite secluded from sensual pleasures … enters and remains in the first absorption.
They meditate directly experiencing that dimension in every way.
To this extent the Buddha spoke of the personal witness in a qualified sense.
Furthermore, take a mendicant who, as the placing of the mind and keeping it connected are stilled, enters and remains in the second absorption …
third absorption …
fourth absorption.
They meditate directly experiencing that dimension in every way.
To this extent the Buddha spoke of the personal witness in a qualified sense.
Furthermore, take a mendicant who, going totally beyond perceptions of form, with the ending of perceptions of impingement, not focusing on perceptions of diversity, aware that ‘space is infinite’, enters and remains in the dimension of infinite space.
They meditate directly experiencing that dimension in every way.
To this extent the Buddha spoke of the personal witness in a qualified sense. Furthermore, take a mendicant who enters and remains in the dimension of infinite consciousness … the dimension of nothingness … the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception …
Furthermore, take a mendicant who, going totally beyond the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception, enters and remains in the cessation of perception and feeling. And, having seen with wisdom, their defilements come to an end.
They meditate directly experiencing that dimension in every way.
To this extent the Buddha spoke of the personal witness in a definitive sense.”
Numbered Discourses
Mindfulness Meditation
Emotional Barrenness
“Mendicants, there are five kinds of emotional barrenness.
What five?
Firstly, a mendicant has doubts about the Teacher. They’re uncertain, undecided, and lacking confidence.
This being so, their mind doesn’t incline toward keenness, commitment, persistence, and striving.
This is the first kind of emotional barrenness.
Furthermore, a mendicant has doubts about the teaching …
the Saṅgha …
the training …
A mendicant is angry and upset with their spiritual companions, resentful and closed off.
This being so, their mind doesn’t incline toward keenness, commitment, persistence, and striving.
This is the fifth kind of emotional barrenness.
To give up these five kinds of emotional barrenness you should develop the four kinds of mindfulness meditation. …”
Numbered Discourses
Abodes of Sentient Beings
Consolidated by Wisdom
“Mendicants, when a mendicant’s mind has been well consolidated with wisdom it’s appropriate for them to say:
‘I understand: “Rebirth is ended, the spiritual journey has been completed, what had to be done has been done, there is no return to any state of existence.”’
And how is a mendicant’s mind well consolidated with wisdom?
The mind is well consolidated with wisdom when they know: ‘My mind is without greed.’
… ‘My mind is without hate.’
… ‘My mind is without delusion.’
… ‘My mind is not liable to become greedy.’
… ‘My mind is not liable to become hateful.’
… ‘My mind is not liable to become deluded.’
… ‘My mind is not liable to return to rebirth in the sensual realm.’
… ‘My mind is not liable to return to rebirth in the realm of luminous form.’
… ‘My mind is not liable to return to rebirth in the formless realm.’
When a mendicant’s mind has been well consolidated with wisdom it’s appropriate for them to say:
‘I understand: “Rebirth is ended, the spiritual journey has been completed, what had to be done has been done, there is no return to any state of existence.”’”
Numbered Discourses
Awakening
With Meghiya
At one time the Buddha was staying near Cālikā, on the Cālikā mountain.
Now, at that time Venerable Meghiya was the Buddha’s attendant.
Then Venerable Meghiya went up to the Buddha, bowed, stood to one side, and said to him,
“Sir, I’d like to enter Jantu village for alms.”
“Please, Meghiya, go at your convenience.”
Then Meghiya robed up in the morning and, taking his bowl and robe, entered Jantu village for alms.
After the meal, on his return from alms-round in Jantu village, he went to the shore of Kimikālā river.
As he was going for a walk along the shore of the river he saw a lovely and delightful mango grove.
It occurred to him,
“Oh, this mango grove is lovely and delightful! It’s truly good enough for meditation for a kinsman who wants to meditate.
If the Buddha allows me, I’ll come back to this mango grove to meditate.”
Then Venerable Meghiya went up to the Buddha, bowed, sat down to one side, and told him what had happened, adding,
“If the Buddha allows me, I’ll go back to that mango grove to meditate.”
“We’re alone, Meghiya.
Wait until another mendicant comes.”
For a second time Meghiya said to the Buddha,
“Sir, the Buddha has nothing more to do, and nothing that needs improvement.
But I have.
If you allow me, I’ll go back to that mango grove to meditate.”
“We’re alone, Meghiya. Wait until another mendicant comes.”
For a third time Meghiya said to the Buddha,
“Sir, the Buddha has nothing more to do, and nothing that needs improvement.
But I have.
If you allow me, I’ll go back to that mango grove to meditate.”
“Meghiya, since you speak of meditation, what can I say?
Please, Meghiya, go at your convenience.”
Then Meghiya got up from his seat, bowed, and respectfully circled the Buddha, keeping him on his right. Then he went to that mango grove, and, having plunged deep into it, sat at the root of a certain tree for the day’s meditation.
But while Meghiya was meditating in that mango grove he was beset mostly by three kinds of bad, unskillful thoughts, namely,
sensual, malicious, and cruel thoughts.
Then he thought,
“It’s incredible, it’s amazing!
I’ve gone forth from the lay life to homelessness out of faith,
but I’m still harassed by these three kinds of bad, unskillful thoughts:
sensual, malicious, and cruel thoughts.”
Then Venerable Meghiya went up to the Buddha, bowed, sat down to one side, and told him what had happened.
“Meghiya, when the heart’s release is not ripe, five things help it ripen.
What five?
Firstly, a mendicant has good friends, companions, and associates.
This is the first thing …
Furthermore, a mendicant is ethical, restrained in the monastic code, conducting themselves well and seeking alms in suitable places. Seeing danger in the slightest fault, they keep the rules they’ve undertaken.
This is the second thing …
Furthermore, a mendicant gets to take part in talk about self-effacement that helps open the heart, when they want, without trouble or difficulty. That is, talk about fewness of wishes, contentment, seclusion, aloofness, arousing energy, ethics, immersion, wisdom, freedom, and the knowledge and vision of freedom.
This is the third thing …
Furthermore, a mendicant lives with energy roused up for giving up unskillful qualities and embracing skillful qualities. They are strong, staunchly vigorous, not slacking off when it comes to developing skillful qualities.
This is the fourth thing …
Furthermore, a mendicant is wise. They have the wisdom of arising and passing away which is noble, penetrative, and leads to the complete ending of suffering.
This is the fifth thing that, when the heart’s release is not ripe, helps it ripen.
A mendicant with good friends, companions, and associates can expect to
be ethical …
A mendicant with good friends, companions, and associates can expect to
take part in talk about self-effacement that helps open the heart …
A mendicant with good friends, companions, and associates can expect to be energetic …
A mendicant with good friends, companions, and associates can expect to be wise …
But then, a mendicant grounded on these five things should develop four further things.
They should develop the perception of ugliness to give up greed, love to give up hate, mindfulness of breathing to cut off thinking, and perception of impermanence to uproot the conceit ‘I am’.
When you perceive impermanence, the perception of not-self becomes stabilized.
Perceiving not-self, you uproot the conceit ‘I am’ and attain extinguishment in this very life.”
Numbered Discourses
Right Efforts
Hindrances, Etc.
(This should be expanded in detail as in the chapter on mindfulness meditation.)
Numbered Discourses
The Great Chapter
Extinguishment is Bliss
At one time Venerable Sāriputta was staying near Rājagaha, in the Bamboo Grove, the squirrels’ feeding ground.
There he addressed the mendicants:
“Reverends, extinguishment is bliss!
Extinguishment is bliss!”
When he said this, Venerable Udāyī said to him,
“But Reverend Sāriputta, what’s blissful about it, since nothing is felt?”
“The fact that nothing is felt is precisely what’s blissful about it.
Reverend, there are these five kinds of sensual stimulation.
What five?
Sights known by the eye that are likable, desirable, agreeable, pleasant, sensual, and arousing.
Sounds known by the ear …
Smells known by the nose …
Tastes known by the tongue …
Touches known by the body that are likable, desirable, agreeable, pleasant, sensual, and arousing.
These are the five kinds of sensual stimulation.
The pleasure and happiness that arise from these five kinds of sensual stimulation is called sensual pleasure.
First, take a mendicant who, quite secluded from sensual pleasures … enters and remains in the first absorption.
While a mendicant is in such a meditation, should perceptions and attentions accompanied by sensual pleasures beset them, that’s an affliction for them.
Suppose a happy person were to experience pain; that would be an affliction for them.
In the same way, should perceptions and attentions accompanied by sensual pleasures beset them, that’s an affliction for them.
And affliction has been called suffering by the Buddha.
That’s the way to understand how extinguishment is bliss.
Furthermore, take a mendicant who, as the placing of the mind and keeping it connected are stilled, enters and remains in the second absorption.
While a mendicant is in such a meditation, should perceptions and attentions accompanied by placing of the mind and keeping it connected beset them, that’s an affliction for them.
Suppose a happy person were to experience pain; that would be an affliction for them.
In the same way, should perceptions and attentions accompanied by placing of the mind and keeping it connected beset them, that’s an affliction for them.
And affliction has been called suffering by the Buddha.
That too is a way to understand how extinguishment is bliss.
Furthermore, take a mendicant who, with the fading away of rapture, enters and remains in the third absorption.
While a mendicant is in such a meditation, should perceptions and attentions accompanied by rapture beset them, that’s an affliction for them.
Suppose a happy person were to experience pain; that would be an affliction for them.
In the same way, should perceptions and attentions accompanied by rapture beset them, that’s an affliction for them.
And affliction has been called suffering by the Buddha.
That too is a way to understand how extinguishment is bliss.
Furthermore, take a mendicant who, giving up pleasure and pain, and ending former happiness and sadness, enters and remains in the fourth absorption.
While a mendicant is in such a meditation, should perceptions and attentions accompanied by equanimous bliss beset them, that’s an affliction for them.
Suppose a happy person were to experience pain; that would be an affliction for them.
In the same way, should perceptions and attentions accompanied by equanimous bliss beset them, that’s an affliction for them.
And affliction has been called suffering by the Buddha.
That too is a way to understand how extinguishment is bliss.
Furthermore, take a mendicant who, going totally beyond perceptions of form, with the ending of perceptions of impingement, not focusing on perceptions of diversity, aware that ‘space is infinite’, enters and remains in the dimension of infinite space.
While a mendicant is in such a meditation, should perceptions and attentions accompanied by form beset them, that’s an affliction for them.
Suppose a happy person were to experience pain; that would be an affliction for them.
In the same way, should perceptions and attentions accompanied by form beset them, that’s an affliction for them.
And affliction has been called suffering by the Buddha.
That too is a way to understand how extinguishment is bliss.
Furthermore, take a mendicant who, going totally beyond the dimension of infinite space, aware that ‘consciousness is infinite’, enters and remains in the dimension of infinite consciousness.
While a mendicant is in such a meditation, should perceptions and attentions accompanied by the dimension of infinite space beset them, that’s an affliction for them.
Suppose a happy person were to experience pain; that would be an affliction for them.
In the same way, should perceptions and attentions accompanied by the dimension of infinite space beset them, that’s an affliction for them.
And affliction has been called suffering by the Buddha.
That too is a way to understand how extinguishment is bliss.
Furthermore, take a mendicant who, going totally beyond the dimension of infinite consciousness, aware that ‘there is nothing at all’, enters and remains in the dimension of nothingness.
While a mendicant is in such a meditation, should perceptions and attentions accompanied by the dimension of infinite consciousness beset them, that’s an affliction for them.
Suppose a happy person were to experience pain; that would be an affliction for them.
In the same way, should perceptions and attentions accompanied by the dimension of infinite consciousness beset them, that’s an affliction for them.
And affliction has been called suffering by the Buddha.
That too is a way to understand how extinguishment is bliss.
Furthermore, take a mendicant who, going totally beyond the dimension of nothingness, enters and remains in the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception.
While a mendicant is in such a meditation, should perceptions and attentions accompanied by the dimension of nothingness beset them, that’s an affliction for them.
Suppose a happy person were to experience pain; that would be an affliction for them.
In the same way, should perceptions and attentions accompanied by the dimension of nothingness beset them, that’s an affliction for them.
And affliction has been called suffering by the Buddha.
That too is a way to understand how extinguishment is bliss.
Furthermore, take a mendicant who, going totally beyond the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception, enters and remains in the cessation of perception and feeling. And, having seen with wisdom, their defilements come to an end.
That too is a way to understand how extinguishment is bliss.”
Numbered Discourses
Similarity
In This Very Life
“Reverend, they speak of ‘a teaching visible in this very life’.
In what way did the Buddha speak of a teaching visible in this very life?”
“First, take a mendicant who, quite secluded from sensual pleasures … enters and remains in the first absorption.
To this extent the Buddha spoke of the teaching visible in this very life in a qualified sense. …
Furthermore, take a mendicant who, going totally beyond the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception, enters and remains in the cessation of perception and feeling. And, having seen with wisdom, their defilements come to an end.
To this extent the Buddha spoke of the teaching visible in this very life in a definitive sense.”
Numbered Discourses
Abodes of Sentient Beings
First: Dangers and Threats
Then the householder Anāthapiṇḍika went up to the Buddha, bowed, and sat down to one side.
The Buddha said to him:
“Householder, when a noble disciple has quelled five dangers and threats, and has the four factors of stream-entry, they may, if they wish, declare of themselves:
‘I’ve finished with rebirth in hell, the animal realm, and the ghost realm. I’ve finished with all places of loss, bad places, the underworld. I am a stream-enterer! I’m not liable to be reborn in the underworld, and am bound for awakening.’
What are the five dangers and threats they have quelled?
Anyone who kills living creatures creates dangers and threats both in the present life and in lives to come, and experiences mental pain and sadness. Anyone who refrains from killing living creatures creates no dangers and threats either in the present life or in lives to come, and doesn’t experience mental pain and sadness.
So that danger and threat is quelled for anyone who refrains from killing living creatures.
Anyone who steals …
Anyone who commits sexual misconduct …
Anyone who lies …
Anyone who uses alcoholic drinks that cause negligence creates dangers and threats both in the present life and in lives to come, and experiences mental pain and sadness. Anyone who refrains from using alcoholic drinks that cause negligence creates no dangers and threats either in the present life or in lives to come, and doesn’t experience mental pain and sadness.
So that danger and threat is quelled for anyone who refrains from using alcoholic drinks that cause negligence.
These are the five dangers and threats they have quelled.
What are the four factors of stream-entry that they have?
It’s when a noble disciple has experiential confidence in the Buddha:
‘That Blessed One is perfected, a fully awakened Buddha, accomplished in knowledge and conduct, holy, knower of the world, supreme guide for those who wish to train, teacher of gods and humans, awakened, blessed.’
They have experiential confidence in the teaching:
‘The teaching is well explained by the Buddha—visible in this very life, immediately effective, inviting inspection, relevant, so that sensible people can know it for themselves.’
They have experiential confidence in the Saṅgha:
‘The Saṅgha of the Buddha’s disciples is practicing the way that’s good, direct, methodical, and proper. It consists of the four pairs, the eight individuals. This is the Saṅgha of the Buddha’s disciples that is worthy of offerings dedicated to the gods, worthy of hospitality, worthy of a religious donation, worthy of greeting with joined palms, and is the supreme field of merit for the world.’
And a noble disciple’s ethical conduct is loved by the noble ones, unbroken, impeccable, spotless, and unmarred, liberating, praised by sensible people, not mistaken, and leading to immersion.
These are the four factors of stream-entry that they have.
When a noble disciple has quelled these five dangers and threats, and has these four factors of stream-entry, they may, if they wish, declare of themselves:
‘I’ve finished with rebirth in hell, the animal realm, and the ghost realm. I’ve finished with all places of loss, bad places, the underworld. I am a stream-enterer! I’m not liable to be reborn in the underworld, and am bound for awakening.’”
Numbered Discourses
A Safe Place
A Place Without Fear
“Reverend, they speak of ‘a place without fear’. …”
Numbered Discourses
Similarity
Cramped
At one time Venerable Ānanda was staying near Kosambi, in Ghosita’s Monastery.
Then Venerable Udāyī went up to Venerable Ānanda and exchanged greetings with him.
When the greetings and polite conversation were over, he sat down to one side and said to Ānanda,
“Reverend, this was said by the god Pañcālacaṇḍa:
‘The opening amid confinement
was discovered by the Buddha of vast intelligence,
who woke up to absorption,
the sage, the solitary bull.’
But what is confinement, and what is the opening amid confinement that the Buddha spoke of?”
“Reverend, these five kinds of sensual stimulation are called ‘confinement’ by the Buddha.
What five?
Sights known by the eye that are likable, desirable, agreeable, pleasant, sensual, and arousing.
Sounds known by the ear …
Smells known by the nose …
Tastes known by the tongue …
Touches known by the body that are likable, desirable, agreeable, pleasant, sensual, and arousing.
These are the five kinds of sensual stimulation that are called ‘confinement’ by the Buddha.
Now, take a mendicant who, quite secluded from sensual pleasures … enters and remains in the first absorption.
To this extent the Buddha spoke of creating an opening amid confinement in a qualified sense.
But it is still confined.
Confined by what?
Whatever placing of the mind and keeping it connected has not ceased is the confinement there.
Furthermore, take a mendicant who, as the placing of the mind and keeping it connected are stilled … enters and remains in the second absorption.
To this extent the Buddha spoke of creating an opening amid confinement in a qualified sense.
But it is still confined.
Confined by what?
Whatever rapture has not ceased is the confinement there.
Furthermore, take a mendicant who, with the fading away of rapture … enters and remains in the third absorption.
To this extent the Buddha spoke of creating an opening amid confinement in a qualified sense.
But it is still confined.
Confined by what?
Whatever equanimous bliss has not ceased is the confinement there.
Furthermore, take a mendicant who, giving up pleasure and pain … enters and remains in the fourth absorption.
To this extent the Buddha spoke of creating an opening amid confinement in a qualified sense.
But it is still confined.
Confined by what?
Whatever perception of form has not ceased is the confinement there.
Furthermore, take a mendicant who, going totally beyond perceptions of form, with the ending of perceptions of impingement, not focusing on perceptions of diversity, aware that ‘space is infinite’, enters and remains in the dimension of infinite space.
To this extent the Buddha spoke of creating an opening amid confinement in a qualified sense.
But it is still confined.
Confined by what?
Whatever perception of the dimension of infinite space has not ceased is the confinement there.
Furthermore, a mendicant, going totally beyond the dimension of infinite space, aware that ‘consciousness is infinite’, enters and remains in the dimension of infinite consciousness.
To this extent the Buddha spoke of creating an opening amid confinement in a qualified sense.
But it is still confined.
Confined by what?
Whatever perception of the dimension of infinite consciousness has not ceased is the confinement there.
Furthermore, a mendicant, going totally beyond the dimension of infinite consciousness, aware that ‘there is nothing at all’, enters and remains in the dimension of nothingness.
To this extent the Buddha spoke of creating an opening amid confinement in a qualified sense.
But it is still confined.
Confined by what?
Whatever perception of the dimension of nothingness has not ceased is the confinement there.
Furthermore, take a mendicant who, going totally beyond the dimension of nothingness, enters and remains in the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception.
To this extent the Buddha spoke of creating an opening amid confinement in a qualified sense.
But it is still confined.
Confined by what?
Whatever perception of neither perception nor non-perception has not ceased is the confinement there.
Furthermore, take a mendicant who, going totally beyond the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception, enters and remains in the cessation of perception and feeling. And, having seen with wisdom, their defilements come to an end.
To this extent the Buddha spoke of creating an opening amid confinement in a definitive sense.”
Numbered Discourses
A Safe Place
Progressive Cessation
“Reverend, they speak of ‘progressive cessation’.
What is the progressive cessation that the Buddha spoke of?”
“First, take a mendicant who, quite secluded from sensual pleasures … enters and remains in the first absorption.
To this extent the Buddha spoke of progressive cessation in a qualified sense. …
Furthermore, take a mendicant who, going totally beyond the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception, enters and remains in the cessation of perception and feeling. And, having seen with wisdom, their defilements come to an end.
To this extent the Buddha spoke of progressive cessation in a definitive sense.”
Numbered Discourses
The Lion’s Roar
With Koṭṭhita
Then Venerable Mahākoṭṭhita went up to Venerable Sāriputta, and exchanged greetings with him.
When the greetings and polite conversation were over, he sat down to one side and said to Sāriputta:
“Reverend Sāriputta, is the spiritual life lived under the Buddha for this purpose: ‘May deeds to be experienced in this life be experienced by me in lives to come’?”
“Certainly not, reverend.”
“Then is the spiritual life lived under the Buddha for this purpose: ‘May deeds to be experienced in lives to come be experienced by me in this life’?”
“Certainly not.”
“Is the spiritual life lived under the Buddha for this purpose: ‘May deeds to be experienced as pleasant be experienced by me as painful’?”
“Certainly not.”
“Then is the spiritual life lived under the Buddha for this purpose: ‘May deeds to be experienced as painful be experienced by me as pleasant’?”
“Certainly not.”
“Is the spiritual life lived under the Buddha for this purpose: ‘May deeds to be experienced when ripe be experienced by me when unripe’?”
“Certainly not.”
“Then is the spiritual life lived under the Buddha for this purpose: ‘May deeds to be experienced when unripe be experienced by me when ripe’?”
“Certainly not.”
“Is the spiritual life lived under the Buddha for this purpose: ‘May deeds to be experienced a lot be experienced by me a little’?”
“Certainly not.”
“Then is the spiritual life lived under the Buddha for this purpose: ‘May deeds to be experienced a little be experienced by me a lot’?”
“Certainly not.”
“Is the spiritual life lived under the Buddha for this purpose: ‘May deeds to be experienced by me be not experienced’?”
“Certainly not.”
“Then is the spiritual life lived under the Buddha for this purpose: ‘May deeds not to be experienced be experienced’?”
“Certainly not.”
“Reverend Sāriputta, when you were asked whether the spiritual life was lived under the Buddha so that deeds to be experienced in this life are experienced in lives to come, you said, ‘Certainly not’.
When you were asked whether the spiritual life was lived under the Buddha so that deeds to be experienced in lives to come are experienced in this life …
deeds to be experienced as pleasant are experienced as painful …
deeds to be experienced as painful are experienced as pleasant …
deeds to be experienced when ripe are experienced when unripe …
deeds to be experienced when unripe are experienced when ripe …
deeds to be experienced a lot are experienced a little …
deeds to be experienced a little are experienced a lot …
deeds to be experienced are not experienced …
When you were asked whether the spiritual life was lived under the Buddha so that deeds not to be experienced are experienced, you said, ‘Certainly not.’
Then what exactly is the purpose of leading the spiritual life under the Buddha?”
“Reverend, the spiritual life is lived under the Buddha to know, see, attain, realize, and comprehend that which is unknown, unseen, unattained, unrealized, and uncomprehended.”
“But what is the unknown, unseen, unattained, unrealized, and uncomprehended?”
“‘This is suffering.’ …
‘This is the origin of suffering.’ … ‘This is the cessation of suffering.’ …
‘This is the practice that leads to the cessation of suffering.’ …
This is the unknown, unseen, unattained, unrealized, and uncomprehended.
The spiritual life is lived under the Buddha to know, see, attain, realize, and comprehend this.”
Numbered Discourses
The Lion’s Roar
A Deity
“Mendicants, tonight, several glorious deities, lighting up the entire Jeta’s Grove, came to me, bowed, stood to one side, and said to me:
‘Sir, formerly when we were human beings, renunciates came to our homes.
We politely rose for them, but we didn’t bow.
And so, having not fulfilled our duty, full of remorse and regret, we were reborn in a lesser realm.’
Then several other deities came to me and said:
‘Sir, formerly when we were human beings, renunciates came to our homes.
We politely rose for them and bowed, but we didn’t offer a seat.
And so, having not fulfilled our duty, full of remorse and regret, we were reborn in a lesser realm.’
Then several other deities came to me and said:
‘Sir, formerly when we were human beings, renunciates came to our homes.
We politely rose for them, bowed, and offered a seat, but we didn’t share as best we could. …’
‘… we didn’t sit nearby to listen to the teachings. …’
‘… we didn’t lend an ear to the teachings. …’
‘… we didn’t memorize the teachings. …’
‘… we didn’t examine the meaning of teachings we’d memorized. …’
‘… having understood the meaning and the teaching, we didn’t practice accordingly.
And so, having not fulfilled our duty, full of remorse and regret, we were reborn in a lesser realm.’
Then several other deities came to me and said:
‘Sir, formerly when we were human beings, renunciates came to our homes.
We politely rose, bowed, and offered them a seat. We shared as best we could. We sat nearby to listen to the teachings, lent an ear, memorized them, and examined their meaning. Understanding the teaching and the meaning we practiced accordingly.
And so, having fulfilled our duty, free of remorse and regret, we were reborn in a superior realm.’
Here, mendicants, are these roots of trees, and here are these empty huts.
Practice absorption, mendicants! Don’t be negligent! Don’t regret it later, like those former deities.”
Numbered Discourses
Abodes of Sentient Beings
Getting Rid of Resentment
“Mendicants, there are these nine methods to get rid of resentment.
What nine?
Thinking: ‘They harmed me, but what can I possibly do?’ you get rid of resentment.
Thinking: ‘They are harming me …’ …
‘They will harm me …’ …
‘They harmed someone I love …’ …
‘They are harming someone I love …’
‘They will harm someone I love …’ …
‘They helped someone I dislike …’ …
‘They are helping someone I dislike …’ …
Thinking: ‘They will help someone I dislike, but what can I possibly do?’ you get rid of resentment.
These are the nine methods to get rid of resentment.”
Numbered Discourses
Awakening
Worthy of Offerings Dedicated to the Gods
“Mendicants, these nine people are worthy of offerings dedicated to the gods, worthy of hospitality, worthy of a religious donation, worthy of greeting with joined palms, and are the supreme field of merit for the world.
What nine?
The perfected one and the one practicing for perfection. The non-returner and the one practicing to realize the fruit of non-return. The once-returner and the one practicing to realize the fruit of once-return. The stream-enterer and the one practicing to realize the fruit of stream-entry. And a member of the spiritual family.
These are the nine people who are worthy of offerings dedicated to the gods, worthy of hospitality, worthy of a religious donation, worthy of greeting with joined palms, and are the supreme field of merit for the world.”
Numbered Discourses
Abbreviated Texts Beginning with Greed
“For insight into greed, nine things should be developed.
What nine?
The first absorption, the second absorption, the third absorption, the fourth absorption, the dimension of infinite space, the dimension of infinite consciousness, the dimension of nothingness, the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception, and the cessation of perception and feeling.
For insight into greed, these nine things should be developed.”
Numbered Discourses
Awakening
Supported
Then a mendicant went up to the Buddha, bowed, sat down to one side, and said to him:
“Sir, they speak of being ‘supported’.
How is a mendicant who is supported defined?”
“Mendicant, if a mendicant supported by faith gives up the unskillful and develops the skillful, the unskillful is actually given up by them.
If a mendicant supported by conscience …
If a mendicant supported by prudence …
If a mendicant supported by energy …
If a mendicant supported by wisdom gives up the unskillful and develops the skillful, the unskillful is actually given up by them.
What’s been given up is completely given up when it has been given up by seeing with noble wisdom.
But then, a mendicant grounded on these five things should rely on four things.
What four?
After appraisal, a mendicant uses some things, endures some things, avoids some things, and gets rid of some things.
That’s how a mendicant is supported.”
Numbered Discourses
The Great Chapter
The Nine Progressive Meditative Attainments
“Mendicants, I will teach you the nine progressive meditative attainments …
And what are the nine progressive meditative attainments?
Where sensual pleasures cease, and those who have thoroughly ended sensual pleasures meditate, I say: ‘Clearly those venerables are desireless, extinguished, crossed over, and gone beyond in that respect.’
If someone should say, ‘I do not know or see where sensual pleasures cease’,
they should be told:
‘Reverend, it’s when a mendicant, quite secluded from sensual pleasures, secluded from unskillful qualities, enters and remains in the first absorption, which has the rapture and bliss born of seclusion, while placing the mind and keeping it connected.
That’s where sensual pleasures cease.’
Clearly someone who is not devious or deceitful would approve and agree with that statement.
They’d say ‘Good!’ and bowing down, they’d pay homage with joined palms.
Where the placing of the mind and keeping it connected cease, and those who have thoroughly ended the placing of the mind and keeping it connected meditate, I say: ‘Clearly those venerables are desireless, extinguished, crossed over, and gone beyond in that respect.’
If someone should say, ‘I do not know or see where the placing of the mind and keeping it connected cease’,
they should be told:
‘It’s when a mendicant, as the placing of the mind and keeping it connected are stilled, enters and remains in the second absorption, which has the rapture and bliss born of immersion, with internal clarity and confidence, and unified mind, without placing the mind and keeping it connected.
That’s where the placing of the mind and keeping it connected cease.’
Clearly someone who is not devious or deceitful would approve and agree with that statement.
They’d say ‘Good!’ and bowing down, they’d pay homage with joined palms.
Where rapture ceases, and those who have thoroughly ended rapture meditate, I say: ‘Clearly those venerables are desireless, extinguished, crossed over, and gone beyond in that respect.’
If someone should say, ‘I do not know or see where rapture ceases’,
they should be told:
‘It’s when a mendicant, with the fading away of rapture, enters and remains in the third absorption, where they meditate with equanimity, mindful and aware, personally experiencing the bliss of which the noble ones declare, “Equanimous and mindful, one meditates in bliss”.
That’s where rapture ceases.’
Clearly someone who is not devious or deceitful would approve and agree with that statement.
They’d say ‘Good!’ and bowing down, they’d pay homage with joined palms.
Where equanimous bliss ceases, and those who have thoroughly ended equanimous bliss meditate, I say: ‘Clearly those venerables are desireless, extinguished, crossed over, and gone beyond in that respect.’
If someone should say, ‘I do not know or see where equanimous bliss ceases’,
they should be told:
‘It’s when a mendicant, giving up pleasure and pain, and ending former happiness and sadness, enters and remains in the fourth absorption, without pleasure or pain, with pure equanimity and mindfulness.
That’s where equanimous bliss ceases.’
Clearly someone who is not devious or deceitful would approve and agree with that statement.
They’d say ‘Good!’ and bowing down, they’d pay homage with joined palms.
Where perceptions of form ceases, and those who have thoroughly ended perceptions of form meditate, I say: ‘Clearly those venerables are desireless, extinguished, crossed over, and gone beyond in that respect.’
If someone should say, ‘I do not know or see where perceptions of form ceases’,
they should be told:
‘It’s when a mendicant, going totally beyond perceptions of form, with the ending of perceptions of impingement, not focusing on perceptions of diversity, aware that “space is infinite”, enters and remains in the dimension of infinite space.
That’s where perceptions of form cease.’
Clearly someone who is not devious or deceitful would approve and agree with that statement.
They’d say ‘Good!’ and bowing down, they’d pay homage with joined palms.
Where the perception of the dimension of infinite space ceases, and those who have thoroughly ended the perception of the dimension of infinite space meditate, I say: ‘Clearly those venerables are desireless, extinguished, crossed over, and gone beyond in that respect.’
If someone should say, ‘I do not know or see where the perception of the dimension of infinite space ceases’,
they should be told:
‘It’s when a mendicant, going totally beyond the dimension of infinite space, aware that “consciousness is infinite”, enters and remains in the dimension of infinite consciousness.
That’s where the perception of the dimension of infinite space ceases.’
Clearly someone who is not devious or deceitful would approve and agree with that statement.
They’d say ‘Good!’ and bowing down, they’d pay homage with joined palms.
Where the perception of the dimension of infinite consciousness ceases, and those who have thoroughly ended the perception of the dimension of infinite consciousness meditate, I say: ‘Clearly those venerables are desireless, extinguished, crossed over, and gone beyond in that respect.’
If someone should say, ‘I do not know or see where the perception of the dimension of infinite consciousness ceases’,
they should be told:
‘It’s when a mendicant, going totally beyond the dimension of infinite consciousness, aware that “there is nothing at all”, enters and remains in the dimension of nothingness.
That’s where the perception of the dimension of infinite consciousness ceases.’
Clearly someone who is not devious or deceitful would approve and agree with that statement.
They’d say ‘Good!’ and bowing down, they’d pay homage with joined palms.
Where the perception of the dimension of nothingness ceases, and those who have thoroughly ended the perception of the dimension of nothingness meditate, I say: ‘Clearly those venerables are desireless, extinguished, crossed over, and gone beyond in that respect.’
If someone should say, ‘I do not know or see where the perception of the dimension of nothingness ceases’,
they should be told:
‘It’s when a mendicant, going totally beyond the dimension of nothingness, enters and remains in the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception.
That’s where the perception of the dimension of nothingness ceases.’
Clearly someone who is not devious or deceitful would approve and agree with that statement.
They’d say ‘Good!’ and bowing down, they’d pay homage with joined palms.
Where the perception of the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception ceases, and those who have thoroughly ended the perception of the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception meditate, I say: ‘Clearly those venerables are desireless, extinguished, crossed over, and gone beyond in that respect.’
If someone should say, ‘I do not know or see where the perception of the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception ceases’,
they should be told:
‘It’s when a mendicant, going totally beyond the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception, enters and remains in the cessation of perception and feeling.
That’s where the perception of the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception ceases.’
Clearly someone who is not devious or deceitful would approve and agree with that statement.
They’d say ‘Good!’ and bowing down, they’d pay homage with joined palms.
These are the nine progressive meditative attainments.”
Numbered Discourses
Dependence
With Sandha
At one time the Buddha was staying at Nādika in the brick house.
Then Venerable Sandha went up to the Buddha, bowed, and sat down to one side.
The Buddha said to him:
“Sandha, meditate like a thoroughbred,
not like a wild colt.
And how does a wild colt meditate?
A wild colt, tied up by the feeding trough, meditates: ‘Fodder, fodder!’
Why is that?
Because it doesn’t occur to the wild colt tied up by the feeding trough:
‘What task will the horse trainer have me do today? How should I respond?’
Tied up by the feeding trough they just meditate: ‘Fodder, fodder!’
In the same way, take a certain wild person who has gone to the forest, the root of a tree, or an empty hut. Their heart is overcome and mired in sensual desire, and they don’t truly understand the escape from sensual desire that has arisen.
Harboring sensual desire within they meditate and concentrate and contemplate and ruminate.
Their heart is overcome by ill will …
dullness and drowsiness …
restlessness and remorse …
Harboring doubt within they meditate and concentrate and contemplate and ruminate.
They meditate dependent on earth, water, fire, and air. They meditate dependent on the dimension of infinite space, infinite consciousness, nothingness, or neither perception nor non-perception. They meditate dependent on this world or the other world. They meditate dependent on what is seen, heard, thought, known, attained, sought, or explored by the mind.
That’s how a wild colt meditates.
And how does a thoroughbred meditate?
A fine thoroughbred, tied up by the feeding trough, doesn’t meditate: ‘Fodder, fodder!’
Why is that?
Because it occurs to the fine thoroughbred tied up by the feeding trough:
‘What task will the horse trainer have me do today? How should I respond?’
Tied up by the feeding trough they don’t meditate: ‘Fodder, fodder!’
For that fine thoroughbred regards the use of the goad as a debt, a bond, a loss, a misfortune.
In the same way, take a certain fine thoroughbred person who has gone to the forest, the root of a tree, or an empty hut. Their heart is not overcome and mired in sensual desire, and they truly understand the escape from sensual desire that has arisen.
Their heart is not overcome by ill will …
dullness and drowsiness …
restlessness and remorse …
They don’t meditate dependent on earth, water, fire, and air. They don’t meditate dependent on the dimension of infinite space, infinite consciousness, nothingness, or neither perception nor non-perception. They don’t meditate dependent on this world or the other world. They don’t meditate dependent on what is seen, heard, thought, known, attained, sought, or explored by the mind.
Yet they do meditate.
When a fine thoroughbred meditates like this, the gods together with Indra, Brahmā, and Pajāpati worship them from afar:
‘Homage to you, O thoroughbred!
Homage to you, supreme among men!
We don’t understand
the basis of your absorption.’”
When he said this, Venerable Sandha asked the Buddha,
“But sir, how does that fine thoroughbred meditate?”
“Sandha, for a fine thoroughbred person, the perception of earth has vanished in relation to earth. The perception of water … fire … air has vanished in relation to air. The perception of the dimension of infinite space has vanished in relation to the dimension of infinite space. The perception of the dimension of infinite consciousness … nothingness … neither perception nor non-perception has vanished in relation to the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception. The perception of this world has vanished in relation to this world. The perception of the other world has vanished in relation to the other world. And the perception of what is seen, heard, thought, known, attained, sought, or explored by the mind has vanished.
That’s how that fine thoroughbred person doesn’t meditate dependent on earth, water, fire, and air. They don’t meditate dependent on the dimension of infinite space, infinite consciousness, nothingness, or neither perception nor non-perception. They don’t meditate dependent on this world or the other world.
They don’t meditate dependent on what is seen, heard, thought, known, attained, sought, or explored by the mind.
Yet they do meditate.
When a fine thoroughbred person meditates like this, the gods together with Indra, Brahmā, and Pajāpati worship them from afar:
‘Homage to you, O thoroughbred!
Homage to you, supreme among men!
We don’t understand
the basis of your absorption.’”
Numbered Discourses
The First Fifty
Similarity
“Mendicants, a cowherd with eleven factors can’t maintain and expand a herd of cattle.
What eleven?
It’s when a cowherd doesn’t know form, is unskilled in characteristics, doesn’t pick out flies’ eggs, doesn’t dress wounds, doesn’t smoke out pests, doesn’t know the ford, doesn’t know satisfaction, doesn’t know the trail, is not skilled in pastures, milks dry, and doesn’t show extra respect to the bulls who are fathers and leaders of the herd.
A cowherd with these eleven factors can’t maintain and expand a herd of cattle.
In the same way, a mendicant with eleven qualities can’t meditate observing impermanence in the eye …
suffering …
not-self …
vanishing …
fading away …
cessation …
letting go …”
Numbered Discourses
Dependence
Percipient
Then Venerable Ānanda went up to the Buddha, bowed, sat down to one side, and said to him:
“Could it be, sir, that a mendicant might gain a state of immersion like this? They wouldn’t perceive earth in earth, water in water, fire in fire, or air in air. And they wouldn’t perceive the dimension of infinite space in the dimension of infinite space, the dimension of infinite consciousness in the dimension of infinite consciousness, the dimension of nothingness in the dimension of nothingness, or the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception in the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception. They wouldn’t perceive this world in this world, or the other world in the other world. And they wouldn’t perceive what is seen, heard, thought, known, attained, sought, or explored by the mind. And yet they would still perceive.”
“It could be, Ānanda, that a mendicant might gain a state of immersion like this. They wouldn’t perceive earth in earth, water in water, fire in fire, or air in air. And they wouldn’t perceive the dimension of infinite space in the dimension of infinite space, the dimension of infinite consciousness in the dimension of infinite consciousness, the dimension of nothingness in the dimension of nothingness, or the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception in the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception. They wouldn’t perceive this world in this world, or the other world in the other world. And they wouldn’t perceive what is seen, heard, thought, known, attained, sought, or explored by the mind. And yet they would still perceive.”
“But how could this be, sir?”
“Ānanda, it’s when a mendicant perceives:
‘This is peaceful; this is sublime—that is, the stilling of all activities, the letting go of all attachments, the ending of craving, fading away, cessation, extinguishment.’
That’s how a mendicant might gain a state of immersion like this. They wouldn’t perceive earth in earth, water in water, fire in fire, or air in air. And they wouldn’t perceive the dimension of infinite space in the dimension of infinite space, the dimension of infinite consciousness in the dimension of infinite consciousness, the dimension of nothingness in the dimension of nothingness, or the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception in the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception. They wouldn’t perceive this world in this world, or the other world in the other world. And they wouldn’t perceive what is seen, heard, thought, known, attained, sought, or explored by the mind. And yet they would still perceive.”
And then Ānanda approved and agreed with what the Buddha said. He got up from his seat, bowed, and respectfully circled the Buddha, keeping him on his right. Then he went up to Venerable Sāriputta, and exchanged greetings with him.
When the greetings and polite conversation were over, he sat down to one side and said to Sāriputta:
“Could it be, reverend Sāriputta, that a mendicant might gain a state of immersion like this? They wouldn’t perceive earth in earth … And they wouldn’t perceive what is seen, heard, thought, known, attained, sought, or explored by the mind. And yet they would still perceive.”
“It could be, Reverend Ānanda.”
“But how could this be?”
“Ānanda, it’s when a mendicant perceives:
‘This is peaceful; this is sublime—that is, the stilling of all activities, the letting go of all attachments, the ending of craving, fading away, cessation, extinguishment.’
That’s how a mendicant might gain a state of immersion like this. They wouldn’t perceive earth in earth … And they wouldn’t perceive what is seen, heard, thought, known, attained, sought, or explored by the mind. And yet they would still perceive.”
“It’s incredible, it’s amazing!
How the meaning and the phrasing of the teacher and the disciple fit together and agree without conflict when it comes to the chief matter!
Just now I went to the Buddha and asked him about this matter.
And the Buddha explained it to me in this manner, with these words and phrases, just like Venerable Sāriputta.
It’s incredible, it’s amazing!
How the meaning and the phrasing of the teacher and the disciple fit together and agree without conflict when it comes to the chief matter!”
Numbered Discourses
Recollection
First: Immersion
And then several mendicants went up to the Buddha, bowed, sat down to one side, and said to him:
“Could it be, sir, that a mendicant might gain a state of immersion like this? They wouldn’t perceive earth in earth, water in water, fire in fire, or air in air. And they wouldn’t perceive the dimension of infinite space in the dimension of infinite space, the dimension of infinite consciousness in the dimension of infinite consciousness, the dimension of nothingness in the dimension of nothingness, or the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception in the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception. They wouldn’t perceive this world in this world, or the other world in the other world. And they wouldn’t perceive what is seen, heard, thought, known, attained, sought, or explored by the mind. And yet they would still perceive.”
“It could be, mendicants.”
“But how could this be?”
“It’s when a mendicant perceives:
‘This is peaceful; this is sublime—that is, the stilling of all activities, the letting go of all attachments, the ending of craving, fading away, cessation, extinguishment.’
That’s how a mendicant might gain a state of immersion like this. They wouldn’t perceive earth in earth, water in water, fire in fire, or air in air. And they wouldn’t perceive the dimension of infinite space in the dimension of infinite space, the dimension of infinite consciousness in the dimension of infinite consciousness, the dimension of nothingness in the dimension of nothingness, or the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception in the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception. They wouldn’t perceive this world in this world, or the other world in the other world. And they wouldn’t perceive what is seen, heard, thought, known, attained, sought, or explored by the mind. And yet they would still perceive.”
Numbered Discourses
The First Fifty
Similarity
“… Craving for sights …
craving for sounds …
craving for smells …
craving for tastes …
craving for touches …
craving for thoughts. …”
Numbered Discourses
Recollection
Second: Immersion
There the Buddha addressed the mendicants,
“Mendicants!”
“Venerable sir,” they replied.
The Buddha said this:
“Could it be, mendicants, that a mendicant might gain a state of immersion like this? They wouldn’t perceive earth in earth, water in water, fire in fire, or air in air. And they wouldn’t perceive the dimension of infinite space in the dimension of infinite space, the dimension of infinite consciousness in the dimension of infinite consciousness, the dimension of nothingness in the dimension of nothingness, or the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception in the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception. They wouldn’t perceive this world in this world, or the other world in the other world. And they wouldn’t perceive what is seen, heard, thought, known, attained, sought, or explored by the mind. And yet they would still perceive.”
“Our teachings are rooted in the Buddha.
He is our guide and our refuge.
Sir, may the Buddha himself please clarify the meaning of this. The mendicants will listen and remember it.”
“Well then, mendicants, listen and pay close attention, I will speak.”
“Yes, sir,” they replied.
The Buddha said this:
“A mendicant could gain such a state of immersion.”
“But how could this be?”
“It’s when a mendicant perceives:
‘This is peaceful; this is sublime—that is, the stilling of all activities, the letting go of all attachments, the ending of craving, fading away, cessation, extinguishment.’
That’s how a mendicant might gain a state of immersion like this. They wouldn’t perceive earth in earth, water in water, fire in fire, or air in air. And they wouldn’t perceive the dimension of infinite space in the dimension of infinite space, the dimension of infinite consciousness in the dimension of infinite consciousness, the dimension of nothingness in the dimension of nothingness, or the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception in the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception. They wouldn’t perceive this world in this world, or the other world in the other world. And they wouldn’t perceive what is seen, heard, thought, known, attained, sought, or explored by the mind. And yet they would still perceive.”
Numbered Discourses
The First Fifty
Similarity
“… eye consciousness …
ear consciousness …
nose consciousness …
tongue consciousness …
body consciousness …
mind consciousness. …”
Numbered Discourses
Recollection
The Man From the City of Aṭṭhaka
At one time Venerable Ānanda was staying near Vesālī in the little village of Beluva.
Now at that time the householder Dasama from the city of Aṭṭhaka had arrived at Pāṭaliputta on some business.
He went to the Chicken Monastery, approached a certain mendicant, and said to him,
“Sir, where is Venerable Ānanda now staying?
For I want to see him.”
“Householder, Venerable Ānanda is staying near Vesālī in the little village of Beluva.”
Then the householder Dasama, having concluded his business there, went to the little village of Beluva in Vesālī to see Ānanda.
He bowed, sat down to one side, and said to Ānanda:
“Sir, Ānanda, is there one thing that has been rightly explained by the Blessed One—who knows and sees, the perfected one, the fully awakened Buddha—practicing which a diligent, keen, and resolute mendicant’s mind is freed, their defilements are ended, and they arrive at the supreme sanctuary?”
“There is, householder.”
“And what is that one thing?”
“Householder, it’s when a mendicant, quite secluded from sensual pleasures, secluded from unskillful qualities, enters and remains in the first absorption, which has the rapture and bliss born of seclusion, while placing the mind and keeping it connected.
Then they reflect:
‘Even this first absorption is produced by choices and intentions.’
They understand: ‘But whatever is produced by choices and intentions is impermanent and liable to cessation.’
Abiding in that they attain the ending of defilements.
If they don’t attain the ending of defilements, with the ending of the five lower fetters they’re reborn spontaneously, because of their passion and love for that meditation. They are extinguished there, and are not liable to return from that world.
This is one thing that has been rightly explained by the Blessed One—who knows and sees, the perfected one, the fully awakened Buddha—practicing which a diligent, keen, and resolute mendicant’s mind is freed, their defilements are ended, and they arrive at the supreme sanctuary.
Furthermore, as the placing of the mind and keeping it connected are stilled, they enter and remain in the second absorption …
third absorption …
fourth absorption.
Then they reflect:
‘Even this fourth absorption is produced by choices and intentions.’
They understand: ‘But whatever is produced by choices and intentions is impermanent and liable to cessation.’
Abiding in that they attain the ending of defilements.
If they don’t attain the ending of defilements, with the ending of the five lower fetters they’re reborn spontaneously, because of their passion and love for that meditation. They are extinguished there, and are not liable to return from that world.
This too is one thing that has been rightly explained by the Blessed One—who knows and sees, the perfected one, the fully awakened Buddha—practicing which a diligent, keen, and resolute mendicant’s mind is freed, their defilements are ended, and they arrive at the supreme sanctuary.
Furthermore, a mendicant meditates spreading a heart full of love to one direction, and to the second, and to the third, and to the fourth.
In the same way above, below, across, everywhere, all around, they spread a heart full of love to the whole world—abundant, expansive, limitless, free of enmity and ill will.
Then they reflect:
‘Even this heart’s release by love is produced by choices and intentions.’
They understand: ‘But whatever is produced by choices and intentions is impermanent and liable to cessation.’
Abiding in that they attain the ending of defilements.
If they don’t attain the ending of defilements, with the ending of the five lower fetters they’re reborn spontaneously, because of their passion and love for that meditation. They are extinguished there, and are not liable to return from that world.
This too is one thing that has been rightly explained by the Blessed One …
Furthermore, a mendicant meditates spreading a heart full of compassion …
They meditate spreading a heart full of rejoicing …
They meditate spreading a heart full of equanimity to one direction, and to the second, and to the third, and to the fourth.
In the same way above, below, across, everywhere, all around, they spread a heart full of equanimity to the whole world—abundant, expansive, limitless, free of enmity and ill will.
Then they reflect:
‘Even this heart’s release by equanimity is produced by choices and intentions.’
They understand: ‘But whatever is produced by choices and intentions is impermanent and liable to cessation.’
Abiding in that they attain the ending of defilements.
If they don’t attain the ending of defilements, with the ending of the five lower fetters they’re reborn spontaneously, because of their passion and love for that meditation. They are extinguished there, and are not liable to return from that world.
This too is one thing that has been rightly explained by the Blessed One …
Furthermore, a mendicant, going totally beyond perceptions of form, with the ending of perceptions of impingement, not focusing on perceptions of diversity, aware that ‘space is infinite’, enters and remains in the dimension of infinite space.
Then they reflect:
‘Even this attainment of the dimension of infinite space is produced by choices and intentions.’
They understand: ‘But whatever is produced by choices and intentions is impermanent and liable to cessation.’
Abiding in that they attain the ending of defilements.
If they don’t attain the ending of defilements, with the ending of the five lower fetters they’re reborn spontaneously, because of their passion and love for that meditation. They are extinguished there, and are not liable to return from that world.
This too is one thing that has been rightly explained by the Blessed One …
Furthermore, a mendicant, going totally beyond the dimension of infinite space, aware that ‘consciousness is infinite’, enters and remains in the dimension of infinite consciousness. …
Going totally beyond the dimension of infinite consciousness, aware that ‘there is nothing at all’, they enter and remain in the dimension of nothingness. …
Then they reflect:
‘Even this attainment of the dimension of nothingness is produced by choices and intentions.’
They understand: ‘But whatever is produced by choices and intentions is impermanent and liable to cessation.’
Abiding in that they attain the ending of defilements.
If they don’t attain the ending of defilements, with the ending of the five lower fetters they’re reborn spontaneously, because of their passion and love for that meditation. They are extinguished there, and are not liable to return from that world.
This too is one thing that has been rightly explained by the Blessed One—who knows and sees, the perfected one, the fully awakened Buddha—practicing which a diligent, keen, and resolute mendicant’s mind is freed, their defilements are ended, and they reach the supreme sanctuary.”
When he said this, the householder Dasama said to Venerable Ānanda:
“Sir, suppose a person was looking for an entrance to a hidden treasure. And all at once they’d come across eleven entrances!
In the same way, I was searching for the door to the deathless. And all at once I got to hear of eleven doors to the deathless.
Suppose a person had a house with eleven doors.
If the house caught fire they’d be able to flee to safety through any one of those doors.
In the same way, I’m able to flee to safety through any one of these eleven doors to the deathless.
Sir, those who follow other paths will seek a fee for the teacher.
Why shouldn’t I make an offering to Venerable Ānanda?”
Then the householder Dasama, having assembled the Saṅgha from Vesālī and Pāṭaliputta, served and satisfied them with his own hands with a variety of delicious foods.
He clothed each and every mendicant in a pair of garments, with a set of three robes for Ānanda.
And he had a dwelling worth five hundred built for Ānanda.
Numbered Discourses
The First Fifty
Similarity
“Mendicants, a cowherd with eleven factors can maintain and expand a herd of cattle.
What eleven?
It’s when a cowherd knows form …
In the same way, a mendicant with eleven qualities can meditate observing impermanence in the eye …
meditate observing letting go. …”
Numbered Discourses
Recollection
The Benefits of Love
“Mendicants, you can expect eleven benefits when the heart’s release by love has been cultivated, developed, and practiced, made a vehicle and a basis, kept up, consolidated, and properly implemented.
What eleven?
You sleep at ease. You wake happily. You don’t have bad dreams. Humans love you. Non-humans love you. Deities protect you. You can’t be harmed by fire, poison, or blade. Your mind quickly enters immersion. Your face is clear and bright. You don’t feel lost when you die. If you don’t penetrate any higher, you’ll be reborn in a Brahmā realm.
You can expect eleven benefits when the heart’s release by love has been cultivated, developed, and practiced, made a vehicle and a basis, kept up, consolidated, and properly implemented.”
Numbered Discourses
The First Fifty
Abbreviated Texts Beginning with Greed
“For the complete understanding of greed …
complete ending …
cessation …
letting go of negligence …
these eleven things should be developed.”
Numbered Discourses
Dependence
What’s the Purpose?
So I have heard.
At one time the Buddha was staying near Sāvatthī in Jeta’s Grove, Anāthapiṇḍika’s monastery.
Then Venerable Ānanda went up to the Buddha, bowed, sat down to one side, and said to him:
“Sir, what’s the purpose and benefit of skillful ethics?”
“Ānanda, having no regrets is the purpose and benefit of skillful ethics.”
“But what’s the purpose and benefit of having no regrets?”
“Joy is the purpose and benefit of having no regrets.”
“But what’s the purpose and benefit of joy?”
“Rapture …”
“But what’s the purpose and benefit of rapture?”
“Tranquility …”
“But what’s the purpose and benefit of tranquility?”
“But what’s the purpose and benefit of bliss?”
“Immersion …”
“But what’s the purpose and benefit of immersion?”
“Truly knowing and seeing …”
“But what’s the purpose and benefit of truly knowing and seeing?”
“Disillusionment …”
“But what’s the purpose and benefit of disillusionment?”
“Dispassion …”
“But what’s the purpose and benefit of dispassion?”
“Knowledge and vision of freedom is the purpose and benefit of dispassion.
So, Ānanda, the purpose and benefit of skillful ethics is not having regrets.
Joy is the purpose and benefit of not having regrets.
Rapture is the purpose and benefit of joy.
Tranquility is the purpose and benefit of rapture.
Bliss is the purpose and benefit of tranquility.
Immersion is the purpose and benefit of bliss.
Truly knowing and seeing is the purpose and benefit of immersion.
Disillusionment is the purpose and benefit of truly knowing and seeing.
Dispassion is the purpose and benefit of disillusionment.
And knowledge and vision of freedom is the purpose and benefit of dispassion.
So, Ānanda, skillful ethics progressively lead up to the highest.”
Numbered Discourses
Dependence
Third: Vital Conditions
There Venerable Ānanda addressed the mendicants …
“An unethical person, who lacks ethics, has destroyed a vital condition for not having regrets.
When there are regrets, one who has regrets has destroyed a vital condition for joy.
When there is no joy, one who lacks joy has destroyed a vital condition for rapture.
When there is no rapture, one who lacks rapture has destroyed a vital condition for tranquility.
When there is no tranquility, one who lacks tranquility has destroyed a vital condition for bliss.
When there is no bliss, one who lacks bliss has destroyed a vital condition for right immersion.
When there is no right immersion, one who lacks right immersion has destroyed a vital condition for true knowledge and vision.
When there is no true knowledge and vision, one who lacks true knowledge and vision has destroyed a vital condition for disillusionment.
When there is no disillusionment, one who lacks disillusionment has destroyed a vital condition for dispassion.
When there is no dispassion, one who lacks dispassion has destroyed a vital condition for knowledge and vision of freedom.
Suppose there was a tree that lacked branches and foliage.
Its shoots, bark, softwood, and heartwood would not grow to fullness.
In the same way, an unethical person, who lacks ethics, has destroyed a vital condition for having no regrets.
When there are regrets, one who has regrets has destroyed a vital condition for joy. …
When there is no dispassion, one who lacks dispassion has destroyed a vital condition for knowledge and vision of freedom.
An ethical person, who has fulfilled ethics, has fulfilled a vital condition for not having regrets.
When there are no regrets, one who has no regrets has fulfilled a vital condition for joy.
When there is joy, one who has fulfilled joy has fulfilled a vital condition for rapture.
When there is rapture, one who has fulfilled rapture has fulfilled a vital condition for tranquility.
When there is tranquility, one who has fulfilled tranquility has fulfilled a vital condition for bliss.
When there is bliss, one who has fulfilled bliss has fulfilled a vital condition for right immersion.
When there is right immersion, one who has fulfilled right immersion has fulfilled a vital condition for true knowledge and vision.
When there is true knowledge and vision, one who has fulfilled true knowledge and vision has fulfilled a vital condition for disillusionment.
When there is disillusionment, one who has fulfilled disillusionment has fulfilled a vital condition for dispassion.
When there is dispassion, one who has fulfilled dispassion has fulfilled a vital condition for knowledge and vision of freedom.
Suppose there was a tree that was complete with branches and foliage.
Its shoots, bark, softwood, and heartwood would grow to fullness.
In the same way, an ethical person, who has fulfilled ethics, has fulfilled a vital condition for not having regrets.
When there are no regrets, one who has no regrets has fulfilled a vital condition for joy. …
When there is dispassion, one who has fulfilled dispassion has fulfilled a vital condition for knowledge and vision of freedom.”
Numbered Discourses
Recollection
Fourth: Immersion
There Sāriputta addressed the mendicants:
“Could it be, reverends, that a mendicant might gain a state of immersion like this? They wouldn’t perceive earth in earth, water in water, fire in fire, or air in air. And they wouldn’t perceive the dimension of infinite space in the dimension of infinite space, the dimension of infinite consciousness in the dimension of infinite consciousness, the dimension of nothingness in the dimension of nothingness, or the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception in the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception. They wouldn’t perceive this world in this world, or the other world in the other world. And they wouldn’t perceive what is seen, heard, thought, known, attained, sought, or explored by the mind. And yet they would still perceive.”
“Reverend, we would travel a long way to learn the meaning of this statement in the presence of Venerable Sāriputta.
May Venerable Sāriputta himself please clarify the meaning of this.
The mendicants will listen and remember it.”
“Then listen and pay close attention, I will speak.”
“Yes, friend,” they replied.
Sāriputta said this:
“A mendicant could gain such a state of immersion.”
“But how could this be?”
“It’s when a mendicant perceives:
‘This is peaceful; this is sublime—that is, the stilling of all activities, the letting go of all attachments, the ending of craving, fading away, cessation, extinguishment.’
That’s how a mendicant might gain a state of immersion like this. They wouldn’t perceive earth in earth, water in water, fire in fire, or air in air. And they wouldn’t perceive the dimension of infinite space in the dimension of infinite space, the dimension of infinite consciousness in the dimension of infinite consciousness, the dimension of nothingness in the dimension of nothingness, or the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception in the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception. They wouldn’t perceive this world in this world, or the other world in the other world. And they wouldn’t perceive what is seen, heard, thought, known, attained, sought, or explored by the mind. And yet they would still perceive.”
Numbered Discourses
The First Fifty
Abbreviated Texts Beginning with Greed
“Of hate …
hostility …
contempt …
stinginess …
deviousness …
obstinacy …
aggression …
arrogance …
for insight into negligence …
complete understanding …
complete ending …
cessation …
For the letting go of negligence, these eleven things should be developed.”
That is what the Buddha said.
Satisfied, the mendicants were happy with what the Buddha said.
The Book of the Elevens is finished.
The Numbered Discourses is completed.
Numbered Discourses
The First Fifty
Similarity
“… perception of sights …
perception of sounds …
perception of smells …
perception of tastes …
perception of touches …
perception of thoughts. …”
Numbered Discourses
Recollection
First: With Mahānāma
At one time the Buddha was staying in the land of the Sakyans, near Kapilavatthu in the Banyan Tree Monastery.
At that time several mendicants were making a robe for the Buddha, thinking that
when his robe was finished and the three months of the rains residence had passed the Buddha would set out wandering.
Mahānāma the Sakyan heard about this.
He went up to the Buddha, bowed, sat down to one side, and said to him:
“Sir, I have heard that
several mendicants are making a robe for the Buddha, thinking that
when his robe was finished and the three months of the rains residence had passed the Buddha would set out wandering.
Now, we spend our life in various ways. Which of these should we practice?”
“Good, good, Mahānāma!
It’s appropriate that gentlemen such as you come to me and ask:
‘We spend our life in various ways. Which of these should we practice?’
The faithful succeed, not the faithless.
The energetic succeed, not the lazy.
The mindful succeed, not the unmindful.
Those with immersion succeed, not those without immersion.
The wise succeed, not the witless.
When you’re grounded on these five things, go on to develop six further things.
Firstly, you should recollect the Realized One:
‘That Blessed One is perfected, a fully awakened Buddha, accomplished in knowledge and conduct, holy, knower of the world, supreme guide for those who wish to train, teacher of gods and humans, awakened, blessed.’
When a noble disciple recollects the Realized One their mind is not full of greed, hate, and delusion.
At that time their mind is unswerving, based on the Realized One.
A noble disciple whose mind is unswerving finds joy in the meaning and the teaching, and finds joy connected with the teaching.
When they’re joyful, rapture springs up. When the mind is full of rapture, the body becomes tranquil. When the body is tranquil, they feel bliss. And when they’re blissful, the mind becomes immersed in samādhi.
This is called a noble disciple who lives in balance among people who are unbalanced, and lives untroubled among people who are troubled. They’ve entered the stream of the teaching and developed the recollection of the Buddha.
Furthermore, you should recollect the teaching:
‘The teaching is well explained by the Buddha—visible in this very life, immediately effective, inviting inspection, relevant, so that sensible people can know it for themselves.’
When a noble disciple recollects the teaching their mind is not full of greed, hate, and delusion. …
This is called a noble disciple who lives in balance among people who are unbalanced, and lives untroubled among people who are troubled. They’ve entered the stream of the teaching and developed the recollection of the teaching.
Furthermore, you should recollect the Saṅgha:
‘The Saṅgha of the Buddha’s disciples is practicing the way that’s good, direct, methodical, and proper. It consists of the four pairs, the eight individuals. This is the Saṅgha of the Buddha’s disciples that is worthy of offerings dedicated to the gods, worthy of hospitality, worthy of a religious donation, worthy of greeting with joined palms, and is the supreme field of merit for the world.’
When a noble disciple recollects the Saṅgha their mind is not full of greed, hate, and delusion. …
This is called a noble disciple who lives in balance among people who are unbalanced, and lives untroubled among people who are troubled. They’ve entered the stream of the teaching and developed the recollection of the Saṅgha.
Furthermore, a noble disciple recollects their own ethical conduct, which is unbroken, impeccable, spotless, and unmarred, liberating, praised by sensible people, not mistaken, and leading to immersion.
When a noble disciple recollects their ethical conduct their mind is not full of greed, hate, and delusion. …
This is called a noble disciple who lives in balance among people who are unbalanced, and lives untroubled among people who are troubled. They’ve entered the stream of the teaching and developed the recollection of their ethical conduct.
Furthermore, you should recollect your own generosity:
‘I’m so fortunate, so very fortunate.
Among people with hearts full of the stain of stinginess I live at home rid of stinginess, freely generous, open-handed, loving to let go, committed to charity, loving to give and to share.’
When a noble disciple recollects their own generosity their mind is not full of greed, hate, and delusion. …
This is called a noble disciple who lives in balance among people who are unbalanced, and lives untroubled among people who are troubled. They’ve entered the stream of the teaching and developed the recollection of generosity.
Furthermore, you should recollect the deities:
‘There are the Gods of the Four Great Kings, the Gods of the Thirty-Three, the Gods of Yama, the Joyful Gods, the Gods Who Love to Create, the Gods Who Control the Creations of Others, the Gods of Brahmā’s Host, and gods even higher than these.
When those deities passed away from here, they were reborn there because of their faith, ethics, learning, generosity, and wisdom. I, too, have the same kind of faith, ethics, learning, generosity, and wisdom.’
When a noble disciple recollects the faith, ethics, learning, generosity, and wisdom of both themselves and the deities their mind is not full of greed, hate, and delusion.
At that time their mind is unswerving, based on the deities.
A noble disciple whose mind is unswerving finds joy in the meaning and the teaching, and finds joy connected with the teaching.
When they’re joyful, rapture springs up. When the mind is full of rapture, the body becomes tranquil. When the body is tranquil, they feel bliss. And when they’re blissful, the mind becomes immersed in samādhi.
This is called a noble disciple who lives in balance among people who are unbalanced, and lives untroubled among people who are troubled. They’ve entered the stream of the teaching and developed the recollection of the deities.”
Numbered Discourses
The First Fifty
Similarity
“… intention regarding sights …
intention regarding sounds …
intention regarding smells …
intention regarding tastes …
intention regarding touches …
intention regarding thoughts. …”
Numbered Discourses
The First Fifty
Similarity
“… thoughts about sights …
thoughts about sounds …
thoughts about smells …
thoughts about tastes …
thoughts about touches …
thoughts about thoughts. …”
Numbered Discourses
The First Fifty
Similarity
“… feeling born of eye contact …
feeling born of ear contact …
feeling born of nose contact …
feeling born of tongue contact …
feeling born of body contact …
feeling born of mind contact …
Numbered Discourses
Dependence
Making a Wish
“Mendicants, an ethical person, who has fulfilled ethical conduct, need not make a wish:
‘May I have no regrets!’
It’s only natural that an ethical person has no regrets.
When you have no regrets you need not make a wish:
‘May I feel joy!’
It’s only natural that joy springs up when you have no regrets.
When you feel joy you need not make a wish:
‘May I experience rapture!’
It’s only natural that rapture arises when you’re joyful.
When your mind is full of rapture you need not make a wish:
‘May my body become tranquil!’
It’s only natural that your body becomes tranquil when your mind is full of rapture.
When your body is tranquil you need not make a wish:
‘May I feel bliss!’
It’s only natural to feel bliss when your body is tranquil.
When you feel bliss you need not make a wish:
‘May my mind be immersed in samādhi!’
It’s only natural for the mind to become immersed in samādhi when you feel bliss.
When your mind is immersed in samādhi you need not make a wish:
‘May I truly know and see!’
It’s only natural to truly know and see when your mind is immersed in samādhi.
When you truly know and see you need not make a wish:
‘May I grow disillusioned!’
It’s only natural to grow disillusioned when you truly know and see.
When you’re disillusioned you need not make a wish:
‘May I become dispassionate!’
It’s only natural to grow dispassionate when you’re disillusioned.
When you’re dispassionate you need not make a wish:
‘May I realize the knowledge and vision of freedom!’
It’s only natural to realize the knowledge and vision of freedom when you’re dispassionate.
And so, mendicants, the knowledge and vision of freedom is the purpose and benefit of dispassion. Dispassion is the purpose and benefit of disillusionment. Disillusionment is the purpose and benefit of truly knowing and seeing. Truly knowing and seeing is the purpose and benefit of immersion. Immersion is the purpose and benefit of bliss. Bliss is the purpose and benefit of tranquility. Tranquility is the purpose and benefit of rapture. Rapture is the purpose and benefit of joy. Joy is the purpose and benefit of not having regrets. Not having regrets is the purpose and benefit of skillful ethics.
And so, mendicants, good qualities flow on and fill up from one to the other, for going from the near shore to the far shore.”
Numbered Discourses
Recollection
With Subhūti
And then Venerable Subhūti together with the mendicant Saddha went up to the Buddha, bowed, and sat down to one side.
The Buddha said to him,
“Subhūti, what is the name of this mendicant?”
“Sir, the name of this mendicant is Saddha. He is the son of the layman Saddha, and has gone forth out of faith from the lay life to homelessness.”
“Well, I hope this mendicant Saddha exhibits the outcomes of faith.”
“Now is the time, Blessed One! Now is the time, Holy One!
Let the Buddha to speak on the outcomes of faith.
Now I will find out whether or not this mendicant Saddha exhibits the outcomes of faith.”
“Well then, Subhūti, listen and pay close attention, I will speak.”
“Yes, sir,” Subhūti replied.
The Buddha said this:
“Firstly, a mendicant is ethical, restrained in the monastic code, conducting themselves well and seeking alms in suitable places. Seeing danger in the slightest fault, they keep the rules they’ve undertaken.
When a mendicant is ethical, this is an outcome of faith.
Furthermore, a mendicant is very learned, remembering and keeping what they’ve learned. These teachings are good in the beginning, good in the middle, and good in the end, meaningful and well-phrased, describing a spiritual practice that’s entirely full and pure. They are very learned in such teachings, remembering them, reinforcing them by recitation, mentally scrutinizing them, and comprehending them theoretically.
When a mendicant is learned, this is an outcome of faith.
Furthermore, a mendicant has good friends, companions, and associates.
When a mendicant has good friends, this is an outcome of faith.
Furthermore, a mendicant is easy to admonish, having qualities that make them easy to admonish. They’re patient, and take instruction respectfully.
When a mendicant is easy to admonish, this is an outcome of faith.
Furthermore, a mendicant is deft and tireless in a diverse spectrum of duties for their spiritual companions, understanding how to go about things in order to complete and organize the work.
When a mendicant is skilled and tireless in a diverse spectrum of duties, this is an outcome of faith.
Furthermore, a mendicant loves the teachings and is a delight to converse with, being full of joy in the teaching and training.
When a mendicant loves the teachings, this is an outcome of faith.
Furthermore, a mendicant lives with energy roused up for giving up unskillful qualities and embracing skillful qualities. They are strong, staunchly vigorous, not slacking off when it comes to developing skillful qualities.
When a mendicant is energetic, this is an outcome of faith.
Furthermore, a mendicant gets the four absorptions—blissful meditations in the present life that belong to the higher mind—when they want, without trouble or difficulty.
When a mendicant gets the four absorptions, this is an outcome of faith.
Furthermore, a mendicant recollects many kinds of past lives.
That is:
one, two, three, four, five, ten, twenty, thirty, forty, fifty, a hundred, a thousand, a hundred thousand rebirths; many eons of the world contracting, many eons of the world expanding, many eons of the world contracting and expanding.
They remember: ‘There, I was named this, my clan was that, I looked like this, and that was my food. This was how I felt pleasure and pain, and that was how my life ended. When I passed away from that place I was reborn somewhere else. There, too, I was named this, my clan was that, I looked like this, and that was my food. This was how I felt pleasure and pain, and that was how my life ended. When I passed away from that place I was reborn here.’ And so they recollect their many kinds of past lives, with features and details.
When a mendicant recollects many kinds of past lives, this is an outcome of faith.
Furthermore, with clairvoyance that is purified and superhuman, a mendicant sees sentient beings passing away and being reborn—inferior and superior, beautiful and ugly, in a good place or a bad place.
They understand how sentient beings are reborn according to their deeds.
‘These dear beings did bad things by way of body, speech, and mind. They spoke ill of the noble ones; they had wrong view; and they acted out of that wrong view. When their body breaks up, after death, they’re reborn in a place of loss, a bad place, the underworld, hell. These dear beings, however, did good things by way of body, speech, and mind. They never spoke ill of the noble ones; they had right view; and they acted out of that right view. When their body breaks up, after death, they’re reborn in a good place, a heavenly realm.’ And so, with clairvoyance that is purified and superhuman, they see sentient beings passing away and being reborn—inferior and superior, beautiful and ugly, in a good place or a bad place. They understand how sentient beings are reborn according to their deeds.
When a mendicant has clairvoyance that is purified and superhuman, this is an outcome of faith.
Furthermore, a mendicant has realized the undefiled freedom of heart and freedom by wisdom in this very life, and lives having realized it with their own insight due to the ending of defilements.
When a mendicant has ended the defilements, this is an outcome of faith.”
When he said this, Venerable Subhūti said to the Buddha:
“Sir, the outcomes of faith for a faithful person that the Buddha speaks of are found in this mendicant; he does exhibit them.
This mendicant is ethical …
This mendicant is learned …
This mendicant has good friends …
This mendicant is easy to admonish …
This mendicant is skilled and tireless in a diverse spectrum of duties …
This mendicant loves the teachings …
This mendicant is energetic …
This mendicant gets the four absorptions …
This mendicant recollects their many kinds of past lives …
This mendicant has clairvoyance that is purified and surpasses the human …
This mendicant has ended the defilements …
The outcomes of faith for a faithful person that the Buddha speaks of are found in this mendicant; he does exhibit them.”
“Good, good, Subhūti!
So, Subhūti, you should live together with this mendicant Saddha.
And when you want to see the Realized One, you should come together with him.”
Numbered Discourses
Dependence
Awareness
Then Venerable Ānanda went up to the Buddha, bowed, sat down to one side, and said to him:
“Could it be, sir, that a mendicant might gain a state of immersion like this. They wouldn’t be aware of the eye or sights, ear or sounds, nose or smells, tongue or tastes, or body or touches. They wouldn’t be aware of earth in earth, water in water, fire in fire, or air in air. And they wouldn’t be aware of the dimension of infinite space in the dimension of infinite space, the dimension of infinite consciousness in the dimension of infinite consciousness, the dimension of nothingness in the dimension of nothingness, or the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception in the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception. They wouldn’t be aware of this world in this world, or the other world in the other world. And they wouldn’t be aware of what is seen, heard, thought, known, attained, sought, or explored by the mind.
Yet they would be aware?”
“It could be, Ānanda.”
“But how could this be?”
“Ānanda, it’s when a mendicant is aware:
‘This is peaceful; this is sublime—that is, the stilling of all activities, the letting go of all attachments, the ending of craving, fading away, cessation, extinguishment.’
That’s how a mendicant might gain a state of immersion like this. They wouldn’t be aware of the eye or sights, ear or sounds, nose or smells, tongue or tastes, or body or touches. …
And they wouldn’t be aware of what is seen, heard, thought, known, attained, sought, or explored by the mind.
Yet they would be aware.”
Numbered Discourses
The First Fifty
Abbreviated Texts Beginning with Greed
“For insight into greed, eleven things should be developed.
What eleven?
The first, second, third, and fourth absorptions; the heart’s releases by love, compassion, rejoicing, and equanimity; the dimensions of infinite space, infinite consciousness, and nothingness.
For insight into greed, these eleven things should be developed.”
Numbered Discourses
The First Fifty
Similarity
Numbered Discourses
Dependence
At the Peacocks’ Feeding Ground
At one time the Buddha was staying near Rājagaha, at the monastery of the wanderers in the peacocks’ feeding ground.
There the Buddha addressed the mendicants,
“Mendicants!”
“Venerable sir,” they replied.
The Buddha said this:
“Mendicants, a mendicant who has three qualities has reached the ultimate end, the ultimate sanctuary, the ultimate spiritual life, the ultimate goal. They are best among gods and humans.
What three?
The entire spectrum of an adept’s ethics, immersion, and wisdom.
A mendicant with these three qualities has reached the ultimate end, the ultimate sanctuary, the ultimate spiritual life, the ultimate goal. They are best among gods and humans.
A mendicant who has another three qualities has reached the ultimate end, the ultimate sanctuary, the ultimate spiritual life, the ultimate goal. They are best among gods and humans.
What three?
A demonstration of psychic power, a demonstration of revealing, and a demonstration of instruction.
A mendicant with these three qualities has reached the ultimate end, the ultimate sanctuary, the ultimate spiritual life, the ultimate goal. They are best among gods and humans.
A mendicant who has another three qualities has reached the ultimate end, the ultimate sanctuary, the ultimate spiritual life, the ultimate goal. They are best among gods and humans.
What three?
Right view, right knowledge, and right freedom.
A mendicant with these three qualities has reached the ultimate end, the ultimate sanctuary, the ultimate spiritual life, the ultimate goal. They are best among gods and humans.
A mendicant who has two qualities has reached the ultimate end, the ultimate sanctuary, the ultimate spiritual life, the ultimate goal. They are best among gods and humans.
Knowledge and conduct.
A mendicant with these two qualities has reached the ultimate end, the ultimate sanctuary, the ultimate spiritual life, the ultimate goal. They are best among gods and humans.
Brahmā Sanaṅkumāra also spoke this verse:
‘The aristocrat is first among people
who take clan as the standard.
But one accomplished in knowledge and conduct
is first among gods and humans.’
Now, that verse spoken by Brahmā Sanaṅkumāra is well spoken, not poorly spoken. It’s beneficial, not pointless, and I agree with it.
I also say:
‘The aristocrat is first among people
who take clan as the standard.
But one accomplished in knowledge and conduct
is first among gods and humans.’”
Numbered Discourses
Dependence
Disasters
“Mendicants, any mendicant who abuses and insults their spiritual companions, speaking ill of the noble ones, will, without a doubt, fall into one or other of these eleven disasters.
What eleven?
They don’t achieve the unachieved.
